10-K 1 pld-10k_20181231.htm 10-K
 
 
UNITED ST ATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 
 
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
☑ ANNUAL  REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13  OR 15(d)  OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended  December 31, 2018
or
 
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15(d)  OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from ______________ to ______________         
 
Commission File Number: 001-13545 (Prologis, Inc.) 001-14245 (Prologis, L.P .)
 
 
Prologis, Inc.
Prologis, L.P .
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
Maryland (Prologis, Inc.)
Delaware (Prologis, L.P .)94-3281941 (Prologis, Inc.)
94-3285362 (Prologis, L.P .)
(State or other jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization)(I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
  
Pier 1, Bay 1, San Francisco, California 94111
(Address or principal executive offices) (Zip Code)
 
(415) 394-9000
(Registrant’ s telephone number , including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
 
  Title of Each Class  Name of Each Exchange on Which Registered
Prologis, Inc.  Common Stock, $0.01 par value  New York Stock Exchange
Prologis, L.P .  1.375% Notes due 2020  New York Stock Exchange
Prologis, L.P .  1.375% Notes due 2021  New York Stock Exchange
Prologis, L.P .  3.000% Notes due 2022  New York Stock Exchange
Prologis, L.P .  3.375% Notes due 2024  New York Stock Exchange
Prologis, L.P .  3.000% Notes due 2026  New York Stock Exchange
Prologis, L.P .  2.250% Notes due 2029  New York Stock Exchange
Prologis, L.P .  Floating Rate Notes due 2020  New York Stock Exchange
 
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:
Prologis, Inc. – NONE
Prologis, L.P . – NONE
 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.
Prologis, Inc.:  Yes ☑  No ☐ Prologis, L.P .:  Yes ☑  No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.
Prologis, Inc.:  Yes ☐ No ☑ Prologis, L.P .:  Yes ☐ No ☑
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant: (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the
preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past
90 days. Prologis, Inc.: Yes ☑  No ☐  Prologis, L.P.:  Yes ☑  No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T
during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter periods that the registrant was required to submit such files). Prologis, Inc.: Yes ☑  No ☐ Prologis, L.P.:  Yes ☑  No ☐
 
Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K is not contained herein, and will not be contained, to the best of
registrant’s knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in Part III of this Form 10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K. ☐
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth
company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange
Act (check one):
 
Prologis, Inc.: ☑   Large accelerated filer ☐   Accelerated filer ☐   Smaller reporting company
 ☐   Non-accelerated filer ☐   Emerging growth company
 
Prologis, L.P.: ☐   Large accelerated filer ☐   Accelerated filer ☐   Smaller reporting company
 ☑   Non-accelerated filer ☐   Emerging growth company
 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934).
Prologis, Inc.:  Yes ☐  No ☑ Prologis, L.P.:  Yes ☐  No ☑
 
Based on the closing price of Prologis, Inc.’s common stock on June 30, 2018, the aggregate market value of the voting common equity held by nonaffiliates of Prologis,
Inc. was $34,758,146,078.
 
The number of shares of Prologis, Inc.’s common stock outstanding at February 11, 2019, was approximately 630,350,000.
 
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
 
Portions of Part III of this report are incorporated by reference to the registrant’s definitive proxy statement for the 2019 annual meeting of its stockholders or will be
provided in an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
 
 
EXPLANATORY NOTE
 
This report combines the annual reports on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018, of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P .
Unless stated otherwise or the context otherwise requires, references to “Prologis, Inc.” or the “Parent” mean Prologis, Inc. and its
consolidated subsidiaries; and references to “Prologis, L.P .” or the “Operating Partnership” or the “OP” mean Prologis, L.P ., and its
consolidated subsidiaries. The terms “the Company ,” “Prologis,” “we,” “our” or “us” means the Parent and the OP  collectively .
 
The Parent is a real estate investment trust (a “REIT”) and the general partner of the OP . At December 31, 2018, the Parent owned
97.09% common general partnership interest in the OP  and 100% of the preferred units in the OP . The remaining 2.91% common
limited partnership interests are owned by unaf filiated investors and certain current and former directors and of ficers of the Parent.
 
We operate the Parent and the OP  as one enterprise. The management of the Parent consists of the same members as the
management of the OP . These members are of ficers of the Parent and employees of the OP  or one of its subsidiaries. As sole general
partner , the Parent has control of the OP  through complete responsibility and discretion in the day-to-day management and therefore,
consolidates the OP  for financial reporting purposes. Because the only significant asset of the Parent is its investment in the OP , the
assets and liabilities of the Parent and the OP  are the same on their respective financial statements.
 
We believe combining the annual reports on Form 10-K of the Parent and the OP  into this single report results in the following
benefits:
 
• enhances investors’  understanding of the Parent and the OP  by enabling investors to view the business as a whole in the same
manner as management views and operates the business;
 
• eliminates duplicative disclosure and provides a more streamlined and readable presentation as a substantial portion of the
Company’ s disclosure applies to both the Parent and the OP; and
 
• creates time and cost ef ficiencies through the preparation of one combined report instead of two separate reports.
 
It is important to understand the few dif ferences between the Parent and the OP  in the context of how we operate the Company . The
Parent does not conduct business itself, other than acting as the sole general partner of the OP  and issuing public equity from time to
time. The OP  holds substantially all the assets of the business, directly or indirectly . The OP  conducts the operations of the business
and is structured as a partnership with no publicly traded equity . Except for net proceeds from equity issuances by the Parent, which
are contributed to the OP  in exchange for partnership units, the OP  generates capital required by the business through the OP’ s
operations, incurrence of indebtedness and issuance of partnership units to third parties.
 
The presentation of noncontrolling interests, stockholders’  equity and partners’  capital are the main areas of dif ference between the
consolidated financial statements of the Parent and those of the OP . The dif ferences in the presentations between stockholders’  equity
and partners’  capital result from the dif ferences in the equity and capital issuances in the Parent and in the OP .
                
The preferred stock, common stock, additional paid-in capital, accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) and distributions in
excess of net earnings of the Parent are presented as stockholders’  equity in the Parent’ s consolidated financial statements. These
items represent the common and preferred general partnership interests held by the Parent in the OP  and are presented as general
partner ’s capital within partners’  capital in the OP’ s consolidated financial statements. The common limited partnership interests held
by the limited partners in the OP  are presented as noncontrolling interest within equity in the Parent’ s consolidated financial
statements and as limited partners’  capital within partners’  capital in the OP’ s consolidated financial statements.
 
To highlight the dif ferences between the Parent and the OP , separate sections in this report, as applicable, individually discuss the
Parent and the OP , including separate financial statements and separate Exhibit 31 and 32 certifications. In the sections that combine
disclosure of the Parent and the OP , this report refers to actions or holdings as being actions or holdings of Prologis.
 
 
 
TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
Item  Description  Page
  PART I   
1.  Business  3
  The Company  3
  Operating Segments  4
  Future Growth  5
  Code of Ethics and Business Conduct  7
  Environmental Stewardship, Social Responsibility and Governance  8
  Environmental Matters  8
  Insurance Coverage  8
1A.  Risk Factors  8
1B.  Unresolved Staf f Comments  16
2.  Properties  16
  Geographic Distribution  16
  Lease Expirations  19
  Co-Investment V entures  20
3.  Legal Proceedings  20
4.  Mine Safety Disclosures  20
  PART II   
5.  Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities  20
  Market Information and Holders  20
  Preferred Stock Dividends  21
  Sale of Unregistered Securities  21
  Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans  21
  Other Stockholder Matters  22
6.  Selected Financial Data  22
7.  Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations  22
  Management’ s Overview  22
  Results of Operations  23
  Environmental Matters  31
  Liquidity and Capital Resources  32
  Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements  36
  Contractual Obligations  36
  Critical Accounting Policies  37
  New Accounting Pronouncements  38
  Funds from Operations Attributable to Common Stockholders/Unitholders  38
7A.  Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk  40
8.  Financial Statements and Supplementary Data  41
9.  Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure  41
9A.  Controls and Procedures  41
9B.  Other Information  42
  PART III   
10.  Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance  43
11.  Executive Compensation  43
12.  Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters  43
13.  Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence  43
14.  Principal Accounting Fees and Services  43
  PART IV   
15.  Exhibits, Financial Statements and Schedules  43
16.  Form 10-K Summary  43
 
2
The statements in this report that are not historical facts are forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the
Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. These forward-looking
statements are based on current expectations, estimates and projections about the industry and markets in which we operate as well as
management’s beliefs and assumptions. Such statements involve uncertainties that could significantly impact our financial results. Words
such as “expects,” “anticipates,” “intends,” “plans,” “believes,” “seeks,” and “estimates” including variations of such words and similar
expressions are intended to identify such forward-looking statements, which generally are not historical in nature. All statements that
address operating performance, events or developments that we expect or anticipate will occur in the future — including statements
relating to rent and occupancy growth, development activity, contribution and disposition activity, general conditions in the geographic
areas where we operate, our debt, capital structure and financial position, our ability to form new co-investment ventures and the
availability of capital in existing or new co-investment ventures — are forward-looking statements. These statements are not guarantees
of future performance and involve certain risks, uncertainties and assumptions that are difficult to predict. Although we believe the
expectations reflected in any forward-looking statements are based on reasonable assumptions, we can give no assurance that our
expectations will be attained, and therefore actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in
such forward-looking statements. Some of the factors that may affect outcomes and results include, but are not limited to: (i) national,
international, regional and local economic and political climates; (ii) changes in global financial markets, interest rates and foreign
currency exchange rates; (iii) increased or unanticipated competition for our properties; (iv) risks associated with acquisitions, dispositions
and development of properties; (v) maintenance of REIT status, tax structuring and changes in income tax laws and rates; (vi) availability
of financing and capital, the levels of debt that we maintain and our credit ratings; (vii) risks related to our investments in our co-
investment ventures, including our ability to establish new co-investment ventures; (viii) risks of doing business internationally, including
currency risks; (ix) environmental uncertainties, including risks of natural disasters; and (x) those additional factors discussed under Item
1A. Risk Factors in this report. We undertake no duty to update any forward-looking statements appearing in this report except as may be
required by law.
 
PART I
 
ITEM 1. Business
 
Prologis, Inc. is a self-administered and self-managed REIT  and is the sole general partner of Prologis, L.P . through which it holds
substantially all of its assets. W e operate Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P . as one enterprise and, therefore, our discuss ion and
analysis refers to Prologis, Inc. and its consolidated subsidiaries, including Prologis, L.P ., collectively . We invest in real estate through
wholly owned subsidiaries and other entities through which we co-invest with partners and investors. W e have a significant ownership
in the co-investment ventures, which may be consolidated or unconsolidated based on our level of control of the entity .
 
Prologis, Inc. began operating as a fully integrated real estate company in 1997 and elected to be taxed as a REIT  under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (“Internal Revenue Code”). W e believe the current organization and method of operation will
enable Prologis, Inc. to maintain its status as a REIT . Prologis, L.P . was also formed in 1997.
 
We operate and evaluate our business on an owned and managed (“O&M”) basis, including properties that we wholly-own and
properties that are owned by one of our co-investment ventures. W e make decisions based on the property operations, regardless of
our ownership interest. Our investment consists of our wholly-owned properties and our pro rata (or ownership) share of the properties
owned in ventures.
 
Our corporate headquarters is located at Pier 1, Bay 1, San Francisco, California 94111, and our other principal of fice locations are in
Amsterdam, Denver , Luxembourg, Mexico City , Shanghai, Singapore and Tokyo.
 
Our Internet address is www .prologis.com . All reports required to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”) are
available and can be accessed free of charge through the Investor Relations section of our website. The common stock of Prologis,
Inc. is listed on the New York Stock Exchange (“NYSE”) under the ticker “PLD” and is a component of the Standard & Poor ’s (“S&P”)
500.
 
THE COMPANY
 
Prologis is the global leader in logistics real estate with a focus on key markets in 19 countries on four continents. W e own, manage
and develop well-located, high-quality logistics facilities. Our local teams actively manage our portfolio, which encompasses leasing
and property management, capital deployment and opportunistic dispositions allowing us to recycle capital to self-fund our
development and acquisition activities. The majority of our properties in the United States (“U.S.”) are wholly owned, while our
properties outside the U.S. are generally held in co-investment ventures, to mitigate our exposure to foreign currency movements.
 
Our irreplaceable portfolio is focused on the world’ s most vibrant markets where consumption and supply chain reconfiguration drive
logistics demand. In the developed markets of the U.S., Europe and Japan, key demand drivers include the reconfiguration of supply
chains (strongly influenced by e-commerce trends), the demand for sustainable design features and the operational ef ficiencies that
can be realized from high-quality logistics facilities. In emerging markets, such as Brazil, China and Mexico, growing af fluence and the
rise of a new consumer class have increased the need for modern distribution networks. Our strategy is to own the highest-quality
logistics property portfolio in each of our target markets. These markets are characterized by what is most important for the
consumption side of a logistics supply chain  — large population centers with proximity to labor pools, surrounded by highways, rail
service or ports. Customers turn to us because they know an ef ficient supply chain will make their businesses succeed, and that a
strategic relationship with Prologis will create a competitive advantage.
 
3
On August 22, 2 018, we acquired DCT  Industrial Trust Inc. At acquisition, DCT Industrial Trust Inc. and DCT  Industrial Operating
Partnership LP  (“DCT ,” collectively) merged into Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P ., respectively , which we refer to as the DCT
Transaction. The DCT  Transaction was valued at  $8.5 billion consisting of  the issuance of $6.6 billion of equity and the assu mption of
$1.9 billion of debt, of which $1.8 billion was subsequently paid down. The DCT  portfolio of logistics real es tate assets was highly
complementary to our portfolio in terms of product quality , location and growth potential.  The acquisition expanded our presence in the
high growth U.S. markets of  San Francisco Bay  Area , Seattle , Southern Ca lifornia  and South Florid a. As a result of the closely aligned
portfolios and similar business strategies, we have integrated the properties while adding minimal property management  expenses .
Our results for 2018 include the DCT  portfolio from the date of acquisition . See Note 3 to the Consolidate d Financial Statements in
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data  for more information.
 
At December 31, 2018, we owned or had investments in properties, on a wholly-owned basis or through ventures, in the following
regions (dollars in billions, based on gross book value and total expected investment (as defined below) and square feet in millions):
 
 
Throughout this discussion, we reflect amounts in U.S. dollars, our reporting currency . Included in these amounts are consolidated
and unconsolidated investments denominated in foreign currencies, principally the British pound sterling, euro and Japanese yen that
are impacted by fluctuations in exchange rates when translated to U.S. dollars. W e mitigate our exposure to foreign currency
fluctuations by investing outside the U.S. through co-investment ventures, borrowing in the functional currency of our consolidated
subsidiaries and utilizing derivative financial instruments.
 
OPERATING SEGMENTS
 
Our business comprises two operating segments: Real Estate Operations and Strategic Capital.
 
Below is information summarizing consolidated activity within our segments over the last three years (in millions):
 
 
 
4
(1)  Net operating income (“ NOI”) is not a U.S. generally accepted accounting principle (“GAAP”) financial measure. NOI  from Real
Estate Operations  is calculated directly from our Consolidated Financial S tatements as Rental Revenues , Rental Recoveries
and Development Management and Other Revenues less Rental Expenses  and Other Expenses.  See Item 7. Management’ s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations for a reconciliation of NOI to Operating Income, the
most directly comparable GAAP  measure.
 
(2) A developed property moves into the operating portfolio when it meets our definition of stabilization, which is the earlier of one
year after completion or reaching 90% occupancy . Amounts represent our total expected investment (“TEI”), which includes the
estimated cost of development or expansion, including land, construction and leasing costs.
 
 
Real Estate Operations
 
Rental.  Rental operations comprise the largest component of our operating segments and generally contribute 85% to 90% of our
consolidated revenues, earnings and funds from operations (“FFO”). FFO is a non-GAAP  financial measure. See Item 7.
Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations for more information. W e collect rent from
our customers through long-term operating leases, including reimbursements for the majority of our property operating costs. W e
expect to generate long-term internal growth by increasing rents, maintaining high occupancy rates and controlling expenses. The
primary driver of our revenue growth will be rolling in-place leases to current market rents coupled with increasing market rents. W e
believe our active portfolio management, combined with the skills of our property , leasing, maintenance, capital, energy , sustainability
and risk management teams, will allow us to maximize rental revenues across our portfolio. A significant amount of our rental
revenues, NOI and cash flows are generated in the U.S.
 
Development.  We develop properties to meet our customers’  needs, deepen our market presence and refresh our portfolio quality .
We believe we have a competitive advantage due to (i) the strategic locations of our land bank; (ii) the development expertise of our
local teams; and (iii) the depth of our customer relationships. Successful development and redevelopment ef forts provide significant
earnings growth as projects lease up and generate income and increase the net asset value of our Real Estate Operations segment.
Based on our current estimates, our consolidated land bank, excluding land we have under option contracts, has the potential to
support the development of $7.7 billion of TEI of new logistics space. Generally , we develop properties in the U.S. for long-term hold
and outside the U.S. for contribution to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
Strategic Capital
 
Real estate is a capital-intensive business that requires new capital to grow . Our strategic capital business gives us access to third-
party capital, both private and public, allowing us to diversify our sources of capital and providing us with a broad range of options to
fund our growth, while reducing our exposure to foreign currency movements for investments outside of the U.S. W e partner with
some of the world’ s largest institutional investors to grow our business and provide incremental revenues, with a focus on long-term
and open-ended ventures. W e also access alternative sources of equity through two publicly traded vehicles: Nippon Prologis REIT ,
Inc. in Japan and FIBRA  Prologis in Mexico. W e align our interests with those of our partners by holding significant ownership
interests in all of our unconsolidated co-investment ventures (ranging from 15% to 50%).
 
This segment produces stable, long-term cash flows and generally contributes 10% to 15% of our consolidated revenues, earnings
and FFO. W e generate strategic capital revenues or fees from our unconsolidated co-investment ventures, principally through asset
and property management services. Substantially all of these revenues and fees are earned from long-term and open-ended
ventures. W e earn additional revenues by providing leasing, acquisition, construction, development, financing, legal and disposition
services. In certain ventures, we also have the ability to earn revenues through incentive fees (“promotes” or “promote revenues”)
periodically during the life of a venture or upon liquidation. W e plan to profitably grow this business by increasing our assets under
management in existing or new ventures. Most of the strategic capital revenues are generated outside the U.S. NOI in this segment is
calculated directly from our Consolidated Financial Statements as Strategic Capital Revenues  less Strategic Capital Expenses  and
excludes property-related NOI.
 
FUTURE GROWTH
 
We believe the quality and scale of our global portfolio, the expertise of our team, the depth of our customer relationships and the
strength of our balance sheet give us unique competitive advantages to grow revenues, NOI, earnings, FFO and cash flows.
 
 
5
 
• Rent Growth.  We expect market rents to continue to grow over the next few years, driven by demand for the location and
quality of our properties. Due to strong market rent growth over the last several years, our in-place leases have considerable
upside potential. W e estimate that our leases are more than 15% below current market rent on the basis of our weighted
average ownership at December 31, 2018. Therefore, even if market rents remain flat, a lease renewal will translate into
increased future rental income, on a consolidated basis or through the earnings we recognize from our unconsolidated co-
investment ventures based on our ownership. W e have experienced positive rent change on rollover (comparing the net
effective rent of the new lease to the prior lease for the same space) every quarter since 2013. W e expect this trend to continue
for several more years due to our current in-place rents being below market as well as increasing market rents.
 
• Value Creation from Development.  A successful development and redevelopment program involves maintaining control of
well-located and entitled land. W e believe the carrying value of our land bank is below its current fair value. Due to the strategic
nature of our land bank and development expertise of our teams, we expect to realize future value creation as we build out the
land bank. W e measure the estimated development value as the margin above our anticipated cost to develop. W e calculate the
margin using estimated yield and capitalization rates from our underwriting models. As properties under development stabilize,
we expect to realize the value creation principally through contributions to the unconsolidated co-investment ventures and
increases in the NOI of our operating portfolio.
 
• Economies of Scale from Growth.  In 2018, we grew our consolidated real estate assets by 67 million square feet (or
approximately 20%), primarily through the DCT  Transaction, while lowering our general and administrative (“G&A”) expenses as
a percentage of our average consolidated real estate investment. W e believe we can continue to grow NOI and strategic capital
revenues organically and through accretive acquisition and development, while strengthening our balance sheet and minimizing
G&A expense growth.
 
Competition
 
Real estate ownership is generally fragmented, and we therefore face competition from many owners and operators. Competitively
priced logistics space could impact our occupancy rates and have an adverse ef fect on how much rent we can charge, which in turn
could af fect our operating results. W e may face competition regarding our capital deployment activities, including local, regional and
national operators or developers. W e also face competition from investment managers for institutional capital within our strategic
capital business.
 
Despite the competition we may face, our strategic focus over the years has given us distinct competitive advantages.
 
These competitive advantages encompass the following:
 
• a portfolio of properties strategically located in markets characterized by large population densities and growing consumption,
typically near large labor pools and extensive transportation infrastructure ;
 
• the development of logistics facilities with sustainable design features that will continue to meet customer needs for high-quality
buildings that can enable them to run their operations ef ficiently;
 
• established relationships with customers served by our experienced and responsive local and regional teams;
 
• the ability to leverage our organizational scale and structure to provide a single point of contact for our focus customers through
our in-house global customer solutions team;
 
• an investment across the portfolio in environmental stewardship, social responsibility and governance (“ESG”) practices that
enhance asset value while improving sustainability performance;
 
• proven property management and leasing expertise;
 
• relationships and track record with current and prospective investors in our strategic capital business;
 
• a strategically located land bank;
 
• local teams with development expertise; and
 
• a strong balance sheet and credit ratings, coupled with significant liquidity .
 
Customers
 
Our broad customer base represents a spectrum of international, national, regional and local logistics users. At December 31, 2018, in
our Real Estate Operations segment representing our consolidated properties, we had more than 3,000 customers occupying 356
million square feet of logistics operating properties.
 
6
The following table details our top 25 customers for our consolidated real estate properties  at December 31, 2018 (square feet in
millions):
 
Top Customers % of NER (1)   Total Occupied Square Feet  
1.   Amazon  5.3   16 
2.   FedEx  1.9   4 
3.   Home Depot  1.8   6 
4.   UPS  1.4   4 
5.   W al-Mart  0.9   3 
6.   Geodis  0.9   3 
7.   XPO Logistics  0.8   3 
8.   NFI  0.8   2 
9.   DHL  0.7   2 
10. U.S. Government  0.6   1 
Top 10 Customers  15.1   44 
11. PepsiCo  0.6   3 
12. Of fice Depot  0.6   2 
13. Kimberly-Clark  0.6   3 
14. Ingram Micro  0.5   2 
15. DSV Air and Sea  0.5   2 
16. APL Logistics  0.5   2 
17. Kuehne + Nagel  0.4   1 
18. Georgia-Pacific  0.4   1 
19. Kellogg's  0.3   2 
20. C&S Wholesale Grocers  0.3   1 
21. International Paper  0.3   2 
22. Penske  0.3   1 
23. Essendant  0.3   2 
24. Best Buy  0.3   1 
25. Ford Motor  0.3   1 
Top 25 Customers  21.3   70
 
 
(1) Net ef fective rent (“NER”) is calculated using the estimated total cash to be received over the term of the lease (including base
rent and expense reimbursements) divided by the lease term to determine the amount of rent and expense reimbursements
received per year . Amounts derived in a currency other than the U.S. dollar have been translated using the average rate from
the previous twelve months.
 
In our Strategic Capital segment, we view our partners and investors as our customers. At December 31, 2018, in our co-investment
ventures, we partnered with approximately 120 investors, several of which invest in multiple ventures.
 
Employees
 
The following table summarizes our total number of employees at December 31, 2018:
 
Regions     
U.S. (1)   878 
Other Americas   136 
Europe   375 
Asia   228 
Total   1,617
 
 
(1) This includes employees who were based in the U.S. but also support other regions.
 
We allocate the employee costs to provide property management and leasing functions to our Real Estate Operations and Strategic
Capital segments based on the square footage of the respective portfolios. The employee costs to perform only Strategic Capital
functions are allocated directly to that segment.
 
We believe we have good relationships with our employees. Prologis employees are not organized under collective bargaining
agreements, other than in Brazil, although some employees in Europe are represented by statutory W orks Councils and as such,
benefit from applicable labor agreements.
 
CODE OF ETHICS AND BUSINESS CONDUCT
 
We maintain a Code of Ethics and Business Conduct applicable to our board of directors (the “Board”) and all of our of ficers and
employees, including the principal executive of ficer, the principal financial of ficer and the principal accounting of ficer, and other people
7
performing similar functions. A copy of our Code of Ethics and Business Conduct is available on our website, www .prologis.com . In
addition to being accessible through our website, copies of our Code of Ethics and Business Conduct can be obtai ned, free of charge,
upon written request to Investor Relations, Pier 1, Bay 1, San Francisco, California 94111. Any amendments to or waivers of our Code
of Ethics and Business Conduct that apply to the principal executive of ficer, the principal financial officer, the principal accounting
officer, or other people performing similar functions, and that relate to any matter enumerated in Item 406(b) of Regulation S-K, will be
disclosed on our website.
 
ENVIRONMENTAL STEWARDSHIP, SOCIAL RESPONSIBILITY AND GOVERNANCE
 
The principles of ESG are a natural fit in our business strategy . ESG creates value for our company by strengthening our relationships
with our customers, investors, employees and the communities in which we do business — delivering a strategic business advantage
while positively impacting the environment. W e invest in sustainable design features and practices that result in cost-savings and
operational ef ficiency for our customers and reduce energy and water consumption, as well as decrease greenhouse gas emissions
across our portfolio and corporate operations. W e are committed to social responsibility and strengthening relationships important to
our business through customer partnerships, investor outreach, community involvement, labor solutions and inclusion and diversity
initiatives, as well as a focus on our and our customers’  employees through health and wellness programs and building design.
Through our community workforce initiative, for example, we partner with local community organizations to provide logistics training
and help our customers with their labor pain points, while benefitting local economies and providing new career opportunities. Our
strong governance and oversight ensures the resilience of our business, creating a culture of uncompromising integrity through our
Board independence and diversity , open communication with our stockholders and a risk management framework that supports our
investment and process decisions. Our approach is reinforced by our Code of Ethics and Business Conduct, as described above.
 
ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS
 
We are exposed to various environmental risks that may result in unanticipated losses and af fect our operating results and financial
condition. Either the previous owners or we have conducted environmental reviews on a majority of the properties we have acquired,
including land. While some of these assessments have led to further investigation and sampling, none of the environmental
assessments have revealed an environmental liability that we believe would have a material adverse ef fect on our business, financial
condition or results of operations. See further discussion in Item 1A. Risk Factors and Note 16 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
 
INSURANCE COVERAGE
 
We carry insurance coverage on our properties. W e determine the type of coverage and the policy specifications and limits based on
what we deem to be the risks associated with our ownership of properties and our business operations in specific markets. Such
coverage typically includes property damage and rental loss insurance resulting from such perils as fire, windstorm, flood, earthquake
and terrorism; commercial general liability insurance; and environmental insurance. Insurance is maintained through a combination of
commercial insurance, self-insurance and a wholly-owned captive insurance entity . The costs to insure our properties are primarily
covered through reimbursements from our customers. W e believe our insurance coverage contains policy specifications and insured
limits that are customary for similar properties, business activities and markets and we believe our properties are adequately insured.
See further discussion in Item 1A. Risk Factors.
 
ITEM 1A. Risk Factors
 
Our operations and structure involve various risks that could adversely af fect our business and financial condition, including but not
limited to, our financial position, results of operations, cash flow , ability to make distributions and payments to security holders and the
market value of our securities. These risks relate to Prologis as well as our investments in consolidated and unconsolidated entities
and include among others, (i) general risks; (ii) risks related to our business; (iii) risks related to financing and capital; and (iv) income
tax risks.
 
General Risks
 
As a global company , we are subject to social, political and economic risks of doing business in many countries.
 
We conduct a significant portion of our business and employ a substantial number of people outside of the U.S. During 2018, we
generated approximately $557 million or 19.8% of our revenues from operations outside the U.S. Circumstances and developments
related to international operations that could negatively af fect us include, but are not limited to, the following factors:
 
• difficulties and costs of staf fing and managing international operations in certain regions, including dif fering employment
practices and labor issues;
 
• local businesses and cultural factors that dif fer from our usual standards and practices;
 
• volatility in currencies and currency restrictions, which may prevent the transfer of capital and profits to the U.S.;
 
8
• challenges in establishing ef fective controls and procedures to regulate operations in dif ferent reg ions and to monitor
compliance with applicable regulations, such as the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the United Kingdom (“U.K.”) Bribery Act and
other similar laws;  
 
• unexpected changes in regulatory requirements, taxes, tarif fs, trade wars and laws within the countries in which we operate;
 
• potentially adverse tax consequences;
 
• the responsibility of complying with multiple and potentially conflicting laws, e.g., with respect to corrupt practices, employment
and licensing;
 
• the impact of regional or country-specific business cycles and economic instability , including government shutdowns, uncertainty
in the U.K., or further withdrawals from, the European Union or other international trade alliances or agreements;
 
• political instability , uncertainty over property rights, civil unrest, drug traf ficking, political activism or the continuation or escalation
of terrorist or gang activities;
 
• foreign ownership restrictions in operations with the respective countries; and
 
• access to capital may be more restricted, or unavailable on favorable terms or at all in certain locations.
 
In addition, we may be impacted by the ability of our non-U.S. subsidiaries to dividend or otherwise transfer cash among our
subsidiaries due to currency exchange control regulations, transfer pricing regulations and potentially adverse tax consequences,
among other factors.
 
Disruptions in the global capital and credit markets may adversely af fect our operating results and financial condition.
 
To the extent there is turmoil in the global financial markets, this turmoil has the potential to adversely af fect (i) the value of our
properties; (ii) the availability or the terms of financing that we have or may anticipate utilizing; (iii) our ability to make principal and
interest payments on, or refinance any outstanding debt when due; and (iv) the ability of our customers to enter into new leasing
transactions or satisfy rental payments under existing leases. Disruptions in the capital and credit markets may also adversely af fect
our ability to make distributions and payments to our security holders and the market price of our securities.
 
Our business and operations could suf fer in the event of system failures or cyber security attacks.
 
Despite system redundancy , the implementation of security measures and the existence of a disaster recovery plan for our internal
and hosted information technology systems, our systems are vulnerable to damages from any number of sources, including energy
blackouts, natural disasters, terrorism, war , telecommunication failures and cyber security attacks, such as computer viruses or
unauthorized access. Any system failure or accident that causes interruptions in our operations could result in a material disruption to
our business. W e may also incur additional costs to remedy damages caused by such disruptions. Any compromise of our security
could result in a violation of applicable privacy and other laws, unauthorized access to information of ours and others, significant legal
and financial exposure, damage to our reputation, loss or misuse of the information and a loss of confidence in our security measures,
which could harm our business.
 
Risks associated with our dependence on key personnel.
 
We depend on the deep industry knowledge and the ef forts of our executive of ficers and other key employees. From time to time, our
personnel and their roles may change. While we believe that we are able to retain our key talent and find suitable employees to meet
our personnel needs, the loss of key personnel, any change in their roles or the limitation of their availability could adversely af fect our
business. If we are unable to continue to attract and retain our executive of ficers, or if compensation costs required to attract and
retain key employees become more expensive, our performance and competitive position could be materially adversely af fected.
 
Our business could be adversely impacted if we have deficiencies in our disclosure controls and procedures or internal
control over financial reporting.
 
The design and ef fectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting may not prevent
all errors, misstatements or misrepresentations. While management continually reviews the ef fectiveness of our disclosure controls
and procedures and internal control over financial reporting, there can be no guarantee that our internal control over financial reporting
will be ef fective in accomplishing all control objectives all of the time. Deficiencies, including any material weakness, in our internal
control over financial reporting that may occur in the future could result in misstatements or restatements of our financial statements or
a decline in the price of our securities.
 
The depreciation in the value of the foreign currency in countries where we have a significant investment may adversely
affect our results of operations and financial position.
 
We hold significant real estate investments in international markets where the U.S. dollar is not the functional currency . At December
31, 2018, approximately $7.3 billion or 19.1% of our total consolidated assets were invested in a currency other than the U.S. dollar ,
principally the British pound sterling, euro and Japanese yen. For the year ended December 31, 2018, $509 million or 18.2% of our
total
9
consolidated revenue was denominated in foreign currencies. As a result, we are subject to foreign currency risk due to potential
fluctuations in exchange rates between foreign currencies and the U.S. dollar . A signi ficant change in the value of the foreign currency
of one or more countries where we have a significant investment may have a material adverse ef fect on our business and, specifically ,
our U.S. dollar reported financial position and results of operations. We attempt to mitigate our risk by borrowing in the currencies in
which we have significant investments thereby providing a natural hedge. W e may also enter into derivative financial instruments that
we designate as net investment hedges, as these amounts offset the translation adjustments on the underlying net assets of our
foreign investments.  We enter into other foreign currency contracts, such as forwards, to reduce fluctuations in foreign currency cash
flow associ ated with the translation of  future earnings  of our international subsidiaries. At December 31, 2018, after consideration of
our derivative and nonderivative financial instruments, we had minimal net equity denominated in a currency other than the U.S.
dollar . Although we attempt to mitigate  the potential adverse ef fects of changes in foreign currency rates there can be no assurance
that those attempts will be successful.
 
Our hedging of foreign currency and interest rate risk may not ef fectively limit our exposure to other risks.
 
Hedging arrangements involve risks, such as the risk of fluctuation in the relative value of the foreign currency or interest rates and the
risk that counterparties may fail to honor their obligations under these arrangements. The funds required to settle such arrangements
could be significant depending on the stability and movement of the hedged foreign currency or the size of the underlying financing
and the applicable interest rates at the time of the breakage. The failure to hedge ef fectively against foreign exchange changes or
interest rate changes may adversely af fect our business.
 
Compliance or failure to comply with regulatory requirements could result in substantial costs.
 
We are required to comply with many regulations in dif ferent countries, including (but not limited to) the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act,
the U.K. Bribery Act and similar laws and regulations. Our properties are also subject to various federal, state and local regulatory
requirements, such as the Americans with Disabilities Act and state and local fire and life-safety requirements. Noncompliance could
result in the imposition of governmental fines or the award of damages to private litigants. While we believe that we are currently in
material compliance with these regulatory requirements, the requirements may change or new requirements may be imposed that
could require significant unanticipated expenditures by us.
 
Risks Related to our Business
 
Real estate investments are not as liquid as certain other types of assets, which may reduce economic returns to investors.
 
Real estate investments are not as liquid as certain other types of investments and this lack of liquidity may limit our ability to react
promptly to changes in economic or other conditions. Significant expenditures associated with real estate investments, such as
secured mortgage debt payments, real estate taxes and maintenance costs, are generally not reduced when circumstances cause a
reduction in income from the investments. As a REIT , under the Internal Revenue Code, we are only able to hold property for sale in
the ordinary course of business through taxable REIT  subsidiaries in order to not incur punitive taxation on any tax gain from the sale
of such property . We may dispose of certain properties that have been held for investment to generate liquidity . If we do not satisfy
certain safe harbors or we believe there is too much risk of incurring the punitive tax on any tax gain from the sale, we may not pursue
such sales.
 
We may decide to sell properties to certain of our unconsolidated co-investment ventures or third parties to generate proceeds to fund
our capital deployment activities. Our ability to sell properties on advantageous terms is af fected by: (i) competition from other owners
of properties that are trying to dispose of their properties; (ii) market conditions, including the capitalization rates applicable to our
properties; and (iii) other factors beyond our control. If our competitors sell assets similar to assets we intend to divest in the same
markets or at valuations below our valuations for comparable assets, we may be unable to divest our assets at favorable pricing or at
all. The unconsolidated co-investment ventures or third parties who might acquire our properties may need to have access to debt and
equity capital, in the private and public markets, in order to acquire properties from us. Should they have limited or no access to
capital on favorable terms, then dispositions could be delayed.
 
If we do not have suf ficient cash available to us through our operations, sales or contributions of properties or available credit facilities
to continue operating our business as usual, we may need to find alternative ways to increase our liquidity . Such alternatives may
include, without limitation, divesting properties, whether or not they otherwise meet our strategic objectives to keep in the long term, at
less than optimal terms, incurring debt, entering into leases with new customers at lower rental rates or less than optimal terms or
entering into lease renewals with our existing customers without an increase in rental rates. There can be no assurance, however , that
such alternative ways to increase our liquidity will be available to us. Additionally , taking such measures to increase our liquidity may
adversely af fect our business, and in particular , our distributable cash flow and debt covenants.
 
Our investments are concentrated in the logistics sector and our business would be adversely af fected by an economic
downturn in that sector .
 
Our investments in real estate assets are concentrated in the logistics sector . This concentration may expose us to the risk of
economic downturns in this sector to a greater extent than if our business activities were more diversified.
 
10
General economic conditions and o ther events or occurrences that af fect areas in which our properties are geographically
concentrated, may impact financial results.
 
We are exposed to general economic conditions, local, regional, national and international economic conditions and other events and
occurrences that af fect the markets in which we own properties. Our operating performance is further impacted by the economic
conditions of the specific markets in which we have concentrations of properties.
 
At December 31, 2018, 34.7% of our consolidated operating properties or $10.7 billion (based on consolidated gross book value, or
investment before depreciation) were located in California (Central V alley, San Francisco Bay Area and Southern California markets),
which represented 28.0% of the aggregate square footage of our operating properties and 32.5% of our NOI. Our revenues from, and
the value of, our properties located in California may be af fected by local real estate conditions (such as an oversupply of or reduced
demand for logistics properties) and the local economic climate. Business layof fs, downsizing, industry slowdowns, changing
demographics and other factors may adversely impact California’ s economic climate. Because of the investment we have located in
California, a downturn in California’ s economy or real estate conditions could adversely af fect our business.
 
In addition to California, we also have significant holdings (defined as more than 3% of total consolidated investment before
depreciation) in operating properties in certain markets located in Atlanta, Central and Eastern Pennsylvania, Chicago, Dallas/Fort
Worth, Houston, New Jersey/New York City , Seattle and South Florida. Of these markets, no single market contributed more than 10%
of our total consolidated investment before depreciation. Our operating performance could be adversely af fected if conditions become
less favorable in any of the markets in which we have a concentration of properties. Conditions such as an oversupply of logistics
space or a reduction in demand for logistics space, among other factors, may impact operating conditions. Any material oversupply of
logistics space or material reduction in demand for logistics space could adversely af fect our overall business.  
 
Our O&M portfolio, which includes our wholly-owned properties and properties included in our co-investment ventures, has
concentrations of properties in the same markets mentioned above, as well as in markets in France, Japan, Mexico and the U.K., and
are subject to the economic conditions in those markets.
 
A number of our investments, both wholly-owned and owned through co-investment ventures, are located in areas that are known to
be subject to earthquake activity . U.S. properties located in active seismic areas include properties in our markets in California and
Seattle. International properties located in active seismic areas include Japan and Mexico. W e generally carry earthquake insurance
on our properties located in areas historically subject to seismic activity , subject to coverage limitations and deductibles, if we believe
it is commercially reasonable. W e evaluate our earthquake insurance coverage annually in light of current industry practice through an
analysis prepared by outside consultants and in some specific instances have elected to self-insure our earthquake exposure based
on this analysis. W e have elected not to carry earthquake insurance for our assets in Japan based on this analysis.
 
Furthermore, a number of our properties are located in areas that are known to be subject to hurricane or flood risk. W e carry
hurricane and flood hazard insurance on all of our properties located in areas historically subject to such activity , subject to coverage
limitations and deductibles, if we believe it is commercially reasonable. W e evaluate our insurance coverage annually in light of
current industry practice through an analysis prepared by outside consultants.
 
Investments in real estate properties are subject to risks that could adversely af fect our business.
 
Investments in real estate properties are subject to varying degrees of risk. While we seek to minimize these risks through geographic
diversification of our portfolio, market research and our asset management capabilities, these risks cannot be eliminated. Factors that
may af fect real estate values and cash flows include:
 
• local conditions, such as oversupply or a reduction in demand;
 
• technological changes, such as reconfiguration of supply chains, autonomous vehicles, robotics, 3D printing or other
technologies;
 
• the attractiveness of our properties to potential customers and competition from other available properties;
 
• increasing costs of maintaining, insuring, renovating and making improvements to our properties;
 
• our ability to rehabilitate and reposition our properties due to changes in the business and logistics needs of our customers;
 
• our ability to control rents and variable operating costs; and
 
• governmental regulations and the associated potential liability under , and changes in, environmental, zoning, usage, tax, tarif fs
and other laws.
 
Our customers may be unable to meet their lease obligations or we may be unable to lease vacant space or renew leases or
re-lease space on favorable terms as leases expire.
 
Our operating results and distributable cash flow would be adversely af fected if a significant number of our customers were unable to
meet their lease obligations. At December 31, 2018, our top 10 customers totaled 15.1% of our NER. In the event of default by a
significant number of customers, we may experience delays and incur substantial costs in enforcing our rights as landlord, and we
may
11
be unable to re-lease spaces. A customer may experience a downturn in its business, which m ay cause the loss of the customer or
may weaken its financial condition, resulting in the customer ’s failure to make rental payments when due or requiring a restructuring
that might reduce cash flow from the lease. In addition, a customer may seek the prot ection of bankruptcy , insolvency or similar laws,
which could result in the rejection and termination of such customer ’s lease and thereby cause a reduction in our available cash flow .
 
We are also subject to the risk that, upon the expiration of leases they may not be renewed by existing customers, the space may not
be re-leased to new customers or the terms of renewal or re-leasing (including the cost of required renovations or concessions to
customers) may be less favorable to us than current lease terms. Our competitors may of fer space at rental rates below current
market rates or below the rental rates we currently charge our customers, we may lose potential customers, and we may be pressured
to reduce our rental rates below those we currently charge to retain customers when leases expire.
 
We may acquire properties, which involves risks that could adversely af fect our business and financial condition.  
 
We have acquired properties and will continue to acquire properties, both through the direct acquisition of real estate and through the
acquisition of entities that own the real estate and through additional investments in co-investment ventures that acquire properties.
The acquisition of properties involves risks, including the risk that the acquired property will not perform as anticipated and that any
actual costs for rehabilitation, repositioning, renovation and improvements identified in the pre-acquisition due diligence process will
exceed estimates. When we acquire properties, we may face risks associated with a lack of market knowledge or understanding of
the local economy , forging new business relationships in the area and unfamiliarity with local government and permitting procedures.
Additionally , there is, and it is expected there will continue to be, significant competition for properties that meet our investment criteria
as well as risks associated with obtaining financing for acquisition activities. The acquired properties or entities may be subject to
liabilities, which may be without any recourse, or with only limited recourse, with respect to unknown liabilities. As a result, if a liability
were asserted against us based on ownership of any of these entities or properties, then we may have to pay substantial sums to
settle it.
 
Our real estate development strategies may not be successful.
 
Our real estate development strategy is focused on monetizing land in the future through development of logistics facilities to hold for
long-term investment, contribution or sale to a co-investment venture or third party , depending on market conditions, our liquidity
needs and other factors. W e may increase our investment in the development, renovation and redevelopment business and we
expect to complete the build-out and leasing of our current development portfolio. W e may also develop, renovate and redevelop
properties within existing or newly formed co-investment ventures. The real estate development, renovation and redevelopment
business includes the following significant risks:
 
• we may not be able to obtain financing for development projects on favorable terms or at all;
 
• we may explore development opportunities that may be abandoned and the related investment impaired;
 
• we may not be able to obtain, or may experience delays in obtaining, all necessary zoning, land-use, building, occupancy and
other governmental permits and authorizations;
 
• we may have construction costs that exceed our estimates and projects may not be completed, delivered or stabilized as
planned due to defects or other issues;
 
• we may not be able to attract third-party investment in new development co-investment ventures or suf ficient customer demand
for our product;
 
• we may have properties that perform below anticipated levels, producing cash flow below budgeted amounts;
 
• we may seek to sell certain land parcels and not be able to find a third party to acquire such land or the sales price will not allow
us to recover our investment, resulting in impairment charges;
 
• we may not be able to lease properties we develop on favorable terms or at all;
 
• we may not be able to capture the anticipated enhanced value created by our value-added properties on expected timetables or
at all;
 
• we may experience delays (temporary or permanent) if there is public or government opposition to our activities; and
 
• we may have substantial renovation, new development and redevelopment activities, regardless of their ultimate success, that
require a significant amount of management’ s time and attention, diverting their attention from our day-to-day operations.
 
We are subject to risks and liabilities in connection with forming co-investment ventures, investing in new or existing co-
investment ventures, attracting third-party investment and managing properties through co-investment ventures.
 
At December 31, 2018, we had investments in real estate of approximately 406 million square feet held through co-investment
ventures, both public and private. Our organizational documents do not limit the amount of available funds that we may invest in these
12
ventures, and we may and currently intend to develop and acquire properties through co-investment ventures and investments in
other entities when warranted by the circumstances. However , there can be no assurance that we will be able to form new co-
investment ventures, or attract third-party investment or that additional investments in new or existing ventures to develop or acquire
properties will be successful. Further , there can be no assurance that we are able to realize value from such investments.
 
Our co-investment ventures involve certain additional risks that we do not otherwise face, including:
 
• our partners may share certain approval rights over major decisions made on behalf of the ventures;
 
• if our partners fail to fund their share of any required capital contributions, then we may choose to contribute such capital;
 
• our partners might have economic or other business interests or goals that are inconsistent with our business interests or goals
that would af fect our ability to operate the property;
 
• the venture or other governing agreements often restrict the transfer of an interest in the co-investment venture or may
otherwise restrict our ability to sell the interest when we desire or on advantageous terms;
 
• our relationships with our partners are generally contractual in nature and may be terminated or dissolved under the terms of the
agreements, and in such event, we may not continue to manage or invest in the assets underlying such relationships resulting in
reduced fee revenues or obtaining direct ownership of the properties through acquisition; and
 
• disputes between us and our partners may result in litigation or arbitration that would increase our expenses and prevent our
officers and directors from focusing their time and ef fort on our business and result in subjecting the properties owned by the
applicable co-investment venture to additional risk.
 
We generally seek to maintain suf ficient influence over our co-investment ventures to permit us to achieve our business objectives;
however , we may not be able to continue to do so indefinitely . We have formed publicly traded investment vehicles, such as NPR and
FIBRA  Prologis, for which we serve as sponsor or manager . We have contributed, and may continue to contribute, assets into such
vehicles. There is a risk that our managerial relationship may be terminated. 
 
We are exposed to various environmental risks, which may result in unanticipated losses that could af fect our business and
financial condition.
 
Under various federal, state and local laws, ordinances and regulations, a current or previous owner , developer or operator of real
estate may be liable for the costs of removal or remediation of certain hazardous or toxic substances. The costs of removal or
remediation of such substances could be substantial. Such laws often impose liability without regard to whether the owner or operator
knew of, or was responsible for , the release or presence of such hazardous substances. In addition, third parties may sue the owner
or operator of a site for damages based on personal injury , property damage or other costs, including investigation and clean-up
costs, resulting from the environmental contamination.
 
Environmental laws in some countries, including the U.S., also require that owners or operators of buildings containing asbestos
properly manage and maintain the asbestos, adequately inform or train those who may come into contact with asbestos and
undertake special precautions, including removal or other abatement, in the event that asbestos is disturbed during building
renovation or demolition. These laws may impose fines and penalties on building owners or operators who fail to comply with these
requirements and may allow third parties to seek recovery from owners or operators for personal injury associated with exposure to
asbestos. Some of our properties are known to contain asbestos-containing building materials.
 
In addition, some of our properties are leased or have been leased, in part, to owners and operators of businesses that use, store or
otherwise handle petroleum products or other hazardous or toxic substances, creating a potential for the release of such hazardous or
toxic substances. Furthermore, certain of our properties are on, adjacent to or near other properties that have contained or currently
contain petroleum products or other hazardous or toxic substances, or upon which others have engaged, are engaged or may engage
in activities that may release such hazardous or toxic substances. From time to time, we may acquire properties, or interests in
properties, with known adverse environmental conditions for which we believe that the environmental liabilities associated with these
conditions are quantifiable and that the acquisition will yield a superior risk-adjusted return. In connection with certain divested
properties, we have agreed to remain responsible for , and to bear the cost of, remediating or monitoring certain environmental
conditions on the properties.
 
We are exposed to the potential impacts of future climate change, which may result in unanticipated losses that could af fect
our business and financial condition.
 
We are also exposed to potential physical risks from possible future changes in climate. Our logistics facilities may be exposed to rare
catastrophic weather events, such as severe storms or floods. If the frequency of extreme weather events increases, our exposure to
these events could increase. W e do not currently consider ourselves to be exposed to regulatory risks related to climate change, as
the operation of our buildings typically does not generate a significant amount of greenhouse gas emissions. However , we may be
adversely impacted as a real estate developer in the future by potential impacts to the supply chain or stricter energy ef ficiency
standards or greenhouse gas regulations for the commercial building sectors. W e cannot give any assurance that other such
conditions do not exist or may not arise in the future. The potential impacts of future climate change on our real estate properties
could adversely af fect our ability to lease, develop or sell such properties or to borrow using such properties as collateral.
13
 
Our insurance coverage does not include all potential losses.
 
We and our unconsolidated co-investment ventures carry insurance coverage including property damage and rental loss insurance
resulting from certain perils such as fire and additional perils as covered under an extended coverage policy , namely windstorm, flood,
earthquake and terrorism; commercial general liability insurance; and environmental insurance, as appropriate for the markets where
each of our properties and business operations are located. The insurance coverage contains policy specifications and insured limits
customarily carried for similar properties, business activities and markets. W e believe our properties and the properties of our co-
investment ventures are adequately insured. Certain losses, however , including losses from floods, earthquakes, acts of war , acts of
terrorism or riots, generally are not insured against or not fully insured against because it is not deemed economically feasible or
prudent to do so. If an uninsured loss or a loss in excess of insured limits occurs with respect to one or more of our properties, we
could experience a significant loss of capital invested and future revenues in these properties and could potentially remain obligated
under any recourse debt associated with the property .
 
Furthermore, we cannot be sure that the insurance companies will be able to continue to of fer products with suf ficient coverage at
commercially reasonable rates. If we experience a loss that is uninsured or that exceeds insured limits with respect to one or more of
our properties or if the insurance companies fail to meet their coverage commitments to us in the event of an insured loss, then we
could lose the capital invested in the damaged properties, as well as the anticipated future revenues from those properties and, if
there is recourse debt, then we would remain obligated for any mortgage debt or other financial obligations related to the properties.
Any such losses or higher insurance costs could adversely af fect our business.  
 
Risks Related to Financing and Capital
 
We may be unable to refinance our debt or our cash flow may be insuf ficient to make required debt payments.
 
We are subject to risks normally associated with debt financing, including the risk that our cash flow will be insuf ficient to meet
required payments of principal and interest. There can be no assurance that we will be able to refinance any maturing indebtedness,
that such refinancing would be on terms as favorable as the terms of the maturing indebtedness, or that we will be able to otherwise
obtain funds by selling assets or raising equity to make required payments on maturing indebtedness. If we are unable to refinance
our indebtedness at maturity or meet our payment obligations, our business and financial condition will be negatively impacted and, if
the maturing debt is secured, the lender may foreclose on the property securing such indebtedness. Our credit facilities and certain
other debt bears interest at variable rates. Increases in interest rates would increase our interest expense under these agreements.
 
Covenants in our credit agreements could limit our flexibility and breaches of these covenants could adversely af fect our
financial condition.
 
The terms of our various credit agreements, including our credit facilities, the indentures under which our senior notes and term loans
are issued and other note agreements, require us to comply with a number of customary financial covenants, such as maintaining
debt service coverage, leverage ratios, fixed charge ratios and other operating covenants including maintaining insurance coverage.
These covenants may limit our flexibility to run our business, and breaches of these covenants could result in defaults under the
instruments governing the applicable indebtedness. If we default under the covenant provisions and are unable to cure the default,
refinance the indebtedness or meet payment obligations, our business and financial condition generally and, in particular , the amount
of our distributable cash flow could be adversely af fected.  
 
Adverse changes in our credit ratings could negatively af fect our financing activity .
 
The credit ratings of our senior notes and preferred stock are based on our operating performance, liquidity and leverage ratios,
overall financial position and other factors employed by the credit rating agencies in their rating analyses of us. Our credit ratings can
affect the amount of capital we can access, as well as the terms and pricing of any debt we may incur . There can be no assurance
that we will be able to maintain our current credit ratings, and in the event our credit ratings are downgraded, we would likely incur
higher borrowing costs and may encounter dif ficulty in obtaining additional financing. Also, a downgrade in our credit ratings may
trigger additional payments or other negative consequences under our credit facilities and other debt instruments. Adverse changes in
our credit ratings could negatively impact our business and, in particular , our refinancing and other capital market activities, our ability
to manage debt maturities, our future growth and our development and acquisition activity .
 
At December 31, 2018, our credit ratings were A3 from Moody’ s and A- from S&P , both with stable outlook. A securities rating is not a
recommendation to buy , sell or hold securities and is subject to revision or withdrawal at any time by the rating organization.
 
In order to meet REIT distribution requirements we may need access to external sources of capital.
 
To qualify as a REIT , we are required each year to distribute at least 90% of our REIT  taxable income (determined without regard to
the dividends-paid deduction and by excluding any net capital gain) to our stockholders and we may be subject to tax to the extent our
taxable income is not fully distributed. Historically , we have satisfied these distribution requirements by making cash distributions to
our stockholders, however , we may elect to pay a portion of the distribution in shares of our stock. Assuming we continue to satisfy
these distribution requirements with cash, we may not be able to fund all future capital needs, including acquisition and development
activities, from cash retained from operations and may have to rely on third-party sources of capital. Furthermore, to maintain our
REIT  status and not have to pay federal income and excise taxes, we may need to borrow funds on a short-term basis to meet the
REIT  distribution requirements even if the then-prevailing market conditions are not favorable for these borrowings. These short-term
14
borrowing needs could result from dif ferences in timing between the actual receipt of cash and inclusion o f income for federal income
tax purposes, or the ef fect of nondeductible capital expenditures, the creation of reserves or required debt or amortization payments.
Our ability to access debt and equity capital on favorable terms or at all depends on a numbe r of factors, including general market
conditions, the market’ s perception of our growth potential, our current and potential future earnings and cash distributions and the
market price of our securities.
 
Our stockholders may experience dilution if we issue additional common stock or units in the OP .
 
Any additional future issuance of common stock or OP  units will reduce the percentage of our common stock and units owned by
investors. In most circumstances, stockholders and unitholders will not be entitled to vote on whether or not we issue additional
common stock or units. In addition, depending on the terms and pricing of any additional of fering of our common stock or units and the
value of the properties, our stockholders and unitholders may experience dilution in both book value and fair value of their common
stock or units.
 
Income Tax Risks
 
The failure of Prologis, Inc. to qualify as a REIT would have serious adverse consequences.
 
Prologis, Inc. elected to be taxed as a REIT  under Sections 856 through 860 of the Internal Revenue Code commencing with the
taxable year ended December 31, 1997. W e believe Prologis, Inc. has been organized and operated to qualify as a REIT  under the
Internal Revenue Code and believe that the current organization and method of operation comply with the rules and regulations
promulgated under the Internal Revenue Code to enable Prologis, Inc. to continue to qualify as a REIT . However , it is possible that we
are organized or have operated in a manner that would not allow Prologis, Inc. to qualify as a REIT , or that our future operations could
cause Prologis, Inc. to fail to qualify . Qualification as a REIT  requires us to satisfy numerous requirements (some annually and others
on a quarterly basis) established under highly technical and complex sections of the Internal Revenue Code for which there are only
limited judicial and administrative interpretations and involves the determination of various factual matters and circumstances not
entirely within our control. For example, to qualify as a REIT , Prologis, Inc. must derive at least 95% of its gross income in any year
from qualifying sources. In addition, Prologis, Inc. must pay dividends to its stockholders aggregating annually at least 90% of its
taxable income (determined without regard to the dividends paid deduction and by excluding capital gains) and must satisfy specified
asset tests on a quarterly basis. Historically , we have satisfied these distribution requirements by making cash distributions to our
stockholders, but we may choose to satisfy these requirements by making distributions of cash or other property , including, in limited
circumstances, our own stock. For distributions with respect to taxable years that end on or before December 31, and in some cases
declared as late as December 31, a REIT  can satisfy up to 90% of the distribution requirements discussed above through the
distribution of other property or shares of our stock if certain conditions are met . The provisions of the Internal Revenue Code and
applicable Treasury regulations regarding qualification as a REIT  are more complicated for Prologis, Inc. because we hold
substantially all of our assets through the OP .
 
If Prologis, Inc. fails to qualify as a REIT  in any taxable year , we will be required to pay federal income tax (including, for taxable years
prior to 2018, any applicable alternative minimum tax) on taxable income at regular corporate rates. Unless we are entitled to relief
under certain statutory provisions, Prologis, Inc. would be disqualified from treatment as a REIT  for the four taxable years following the
year in which it lost the qualification. If Prologis, Inc. lost its REIT  status, our net earnings would be significantly reduced for each of
the years involved.
 
Furthermore, we own a direct or indirect interest in certain subsidiary REIT s that elected to be taxed as REIT s under Sections 856
through 860 of the Internal Revenue Code. Provided that each subsidiary REIT  qualifies as a REIT , our interest in such subsidiary
REIT  will be treated as a qualifying real estate asset for purposes of the REIT  asset tests, and any dividend income or gains derived
by us from such subsidiary REIT  will generally be treated as income that qualifies for purposes of the REIT  95% gross income test. To
qualify as a REIT , the subsidiary REIT  must independently satisfy all of the REIT  qualification requirements. If such subsidiary REIT
were to fail to qualify as a REIT , and certain relief provisions did not apply , it would be treated as a regular taxable corporation and its
income would be subject to U.S. federal income tax. In addition, a failure of the subsidiary REIT  to qualify as a REIT  would have an
adverse ef fect on the ability of Prologis, Inc. to comply with the REIT  income and asset tests, and thus its ability to qualify as a REIT .
 
Certain property transfers may generate prohibited transaction income, resulting in a penalty tax on gain attributable to the
transaction.
 
From time to time, we may transfer or otherwise dispose of some of our properties, including by contributing properties to our co-
investment ventures. Under the Internal Revenue Code, any gain resulting from transfers of properties we hold as inventory or
primarily for sale to customers in the ordinary course of business is treated as income from a prohibited transaction subject to a 100%
penalty tax. W e do not believe that our transfers or disposals of property or our contributions of properties into our co-investment
ventures are prohibited transactions. However , whether property is held for investment purposes is a question of fact that depends on
all the facts and circumstances surrounding the particular transaction. The Internal Revenue Service may contend that certain
transfers or dispositions of properties by us or contributions of properties into our co-investment ventures are prohibited transactions.
While we believe that the Internal Revenue Service would not prevail in any such dispute, if the Internal Revenue Service were to
argue successfully that a transfer , disposition or contribution of property constituted a prohibited transaction, we would be required to
pay a 100% penalty tax on any gain allocable to us from the prohibited transaction. In addition, income from a prohibited transaction
might adversely af fect our ability to satisfy the income tests for qualification as a REIT .
 
15
Legislative or regulatory action could adversely af fect us.
 
In recent years, numerous legislative, judicial and administrative changes have been made to the U.S. and foreign income tax laws
applicable to investments in real estate, REIT s, similar entities and investments. Additional changes are likely to continue to occur in
the future, both in and outside of the U.S. and may impact our taxation or that of our stockholders.
 
ITEM 1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments
 
None.
 
ITEM 2. Properties
 
GEOGRAPHIC DISTRIBUTION
 
We predominately invest in logistics facilities. Our properties are typically used for distribution, storage, packaging, assembly and light
manufacturing of consumer products. The vast majority of our operating properties are used by our customers for bulk distribution.
 
The following tables provide details of our consolidated operating properties, investment in land and development portfolio and our
O&M portfolio. The O&M portfolio includes the properties we consolidate and the properties owned by our unconsolidated co-
investment ventures reflected at 100% of the amount included in the ventures’  financial statements as calculated on a GAAP  basis,
not our proportionate share.
16
 
Included in the operating property information below for our consolidated operating properties are 395 buildings owned primarily by
one co-investment venture that we consolidate but of which we own less than 100% of the equity . No individual property or market
amounted to 10% or more of our consolidated total assets at December 31, 2018, or generated revenue equal to 10% or more of our
consolidated total revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018, with the exception of the Southern California and New
Jersey/New York City markets. Dollars and square feet in the following tables are in millions:
 
  Consolidated Operating Properties   O&M  
Region  Rentable Square
Footage   Gross Book
Value   Encumbrances
(1)   Rentable Square
Footage   Gross Book
Value  
U.S.:                     
Atlanta   23  $ 1,343  $ 27   26  $ 1,507 
Baltimore/Washington D.C.   6   622   13   9   977 
Central and Eastern Pennsylvania   17   1,247   -   20   1,460 
Central Valley   13   859   10   14   972 
Chicago   34   2,558   50   42   3,179 
Dallas/Fort Worth   25   1,529   36   31   1,959 
Houston   12   995   19   18   1,492 
New Jersey/New York City   28   2,834   99   34   3,667 
San Francisco Bay Area   19   2,560   26   23   2,988 
Seattle   11   1,463   8   18   2,120 
South Florida   10   1,257   34   16   1,777 
Southern California   65   7,044   113   82   8,818 
Remaining Markets – U.S. (17 markets) (2)  61   3,765   73   81   5,043 
Subtotal U.S.   324   28,076   508   414   35,959 
Other Americas:                     
Brazil   7   434   -   10   607 
Canada   9   720   143   9   720 
Mexico   3   159   -   39   2,298 
Subtotal Other Americas   19   1,313   143   58   3,625 
Europe:                     
Belgium   -   -   -   3   200 
Czech Republic   -   -   -   12   856 
France   1   30   -   29   2,355 
Germany  *   17   -   22   1,807 
Hungary   -   -   -   6   388 
Italy   -   -   -   10   635 
Netherlands   -   -   -   20   1,741 
Poland   -   -   -   20   1,206 
Slovakia   -   -   -   4   261 
Spain   2   110   -   7   636 
Sweden  *   36   -   5   399 
U.K.  *   30   -   23   3,184 
Subtotal Europe   3   223   -   161   13,668 
Asia:                     
China  *   10   -   22   1,188 
Japan   1   244   -   31   5,560 
Singapore   1   138   -   1   138 
Subtotal Asia   2   392   -   54   6,886 
Total operating portfolio (3)   348   30,004   651   687   60,138 
Value-added properties (4)   8   773   -   9   867 
Total operating properties   356  $ 30,777  $ 651   696  $ 61,005 
                     
Items notated by ‘*’  indicate an amount less than one million that rounds to zero.  
17
 
  Consolidated – Investment in Land   Consolidated – Development Portfolio 
Region  Acres  Estimated Build
Out Potential
(square feet) (5)  Current
Investment  Rentable Square
Footage Upon
Completion   TEI (6)  
U.S.:                     
Atlanta   218   3  $ 17   1  $ 49 
Baltimore/Washington D.C.   -   -   -  *   50 
Central and Eastern Pennsylvania   29  *   8   -   - 
Central Valley   1,017   20   137   1   129 
Chicago   161   2   19   3   179 
Dallas/Fort Worth   24   1   7   1   52 
Houston   172   3   23   -   - 
New Jersey/New York City   20  *   14   2   152 
San Francisco Bay Area   16  *   8   1   126 
Seattle   36   1   42   2   266 
South Florida   141   3   92  *   75 
Southern California   92   2   79   5   484 
Remaining Markets – U.S. (17 markets)   311   5   56   4   331 
Subtotal U.S.   2,237   40   502   20   1,893 
Other Americas:                     
Brazil   531   12   153   -   - 
Canada   109   2   28   1   94 
Mexico   519   9   103   2   114 
Subtotal Other Americas   1,159   23   284   3   208 
Europe:                     
Belgium   45  *   14   -   - 
Czech Republic   68   2   11   1   77 
France   264   4   41   1   79 
Germany   13  *   2   2   193 
Hungary   188   3   11   -   - 
Italy   28   1   2   1   61 
Netherlands   25   1   10   2   158 
Poland   376   7   46  *   21 
Slovakia   189   4   21   1   40 
Spain   70   2   20  *   42 
Sweden   -   -   -  *   27 
U.K.   166   3   93  *   23 
Subtotal Europe   1,432   27   271   8   721 
Asia:                     
Japan   101   6   135   5   790 
Subtotal Asia   101   6   135   5   790 
Total land and development portfolio   4,929   96  $ 1,192   36  $ 3,612 
                     
Items notated by ‘*’  indicate an amount less than one million that rounds to zero.  
 
(1) Certain of our consolidated properties are pledged as security under secured mortgage debt and assessment bonds. For
purposes of this table, the total principal balance of a debt issuance that is secured by a pool of properties is allocated among
the properties in the pool based on each property’ s investment balance. In addition to the amounts reflected here, we also have
$136 million of encumbrances related to a prestabilized development property not included in consolidated operating properties.
 
(2) No remaining market within the U.S. represented more than 2% of the total gross book value of the consolidated operating
properties.
 
(3) Included in our consolidated operating properties are properties that we consider to be held for contribution and are presented
as Assets Held for Sale or Contribution  in the Consolidated Balance Sheets. W e include these properties in our operating
portfolio as they are expected to be contributed to our co-investment ventures and remain in our O&M  operating portfolio. At
December 31, 2018, we had net investments in real estate properties that were expected to be contributed to our
unconsolidated co-investment ventures totaling $145 million and aggregating 1 million square feet. See Note 6 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data for further information on our
Assets Held for Sale or Contribution.
 
(4) Value-added properties are properties we have either acquired at a discount and believe we could provide greater returns post-
stabilization or properties we expect to repurpose to a higher and better use.
 
(5) Represents the estimated finished square feet available for lease upon completion of a building on existing parcels of land.
 
(6) TEI is based on current projections and is subject to change. As noted in the table below , our current investment is $2.1 billion,
leaving approximately $1.5 billion of additional required investment. At December 31, 2018, based on TEI, approximately 27% of
18
the properties in the development portfolio were already completed but not yet stabilized and approximately 67% of the
properties under development in the development portfolio were expected to be completed by December 31, 201 9. The
remainder of  our properties under development were expected to be completed before July 2020 .
 
The following table summarizes our investment in consolidated real estate properties at December 31, 2018 (in millions):
 
  Investment Before
Depreciation  
Operating properties, excluding assets held for sale or contribution  $ 30,632  
Development portfolio, including cost of land   2,143  
Land   1,192  
Other real estate investments (1)   620 
Total consolidated real estate properties  $ 34,587
 
 
(1) Included in other real estate investments were: (i) land parcels that are ground leased to third parties; (ii) non-logistics real
estate; (iii) our corporate headquarters; (iv) costs related to future development projects, including purchase options on land; (v)
earnest money deposits associated with potential acquisitions; and (vi) infrastructure costs related to projects we are developing
on behalf of others.
 
LEASE EXPIRATIONS
 
We generally lease our properties on a long-term basis (the average term for leases commenced in 2018 was 64 months). The
following table summarizes the lease expirations of our consolidated operating portfolio for leases in place at December 31, 2018
(dollars and square feet in millions):
                     
          NER  
  Number of
Leases   Occupied
Square Feet   Dollars   % of
Total   Dollars Per
Square Foot  
2019   624   41  $ 216   11.0% $ 5.26 
2020   711   40   224   11.5%  5.59 
2021   809   53   298   15.2%  5.59 
2022   660   52   288   14.7%  5.57 
2023   591   46   275   14.1%  5.94 
2024   282   30   178   9.1%  5.92 
2025   125   17   103   5.3%  6.11 
2026   63   12   75   3.8%  6.32 
2027   74   10   64   3.3%  6.16 
2028   67   12   81   4.1%  7.07 
Thereafter   75   23   154   7.9%  6.79 
   4,081    336  $1,956    100.0 % $ 5.83 
Month to month   94   3             
Total consolidated   4,175    339            
 
 
 
19
CO-INVESTMENT VENTURES
 
Included in our O&M portfolio are consolidated and unconsolidated co-investment ventures that hold investments in real estate
properties, primarily logistics facilities that we also manage. Our unconsolidated co-investment ventures are accounted for under the
equity method. The amounts included for the unconsolidated ventures are reflected at 100% of the amount included in the ventures’
financial statements as calculated on a GAAP  basis, not our proportionate share. The following table summarizes our consolidated
and unconsolidated co-investment ventures at December 31, 2018 (in millions):  
 
  Operating Properties          
  Square Feet   Gross
Book V alue   Investment
in Land   Development
Portfolio – TEI  
Consolidated Co-Investment V entures                 
U.S.:                 
Prologis U.S. Logistics V enture (“USL V”)   66  $ 6,073   $ 19  $ 108 
Total   66  $ 6,073   $ 19  $ 108 
                 
Unconsolidated Co-Investment V entures                 
U.S.:                 
Prologis Targeted U.S. Logistics Fund (“USLF”)   91  $ 7,907   $ -  $ - 
Other Americas:                 
FIBRA  Prologis   36   2,140    8   - 
Brazil joint ventures   3   172   -   - 
Subtotal Other Americas   39   2,312    8   - 
Europe:                 
Prologis European Logistics Fund (“PELF”)   107   9,400    10   16 
Prologis European Logistics Partners Sàrl (“PELP”)   49   3,676    26   19 
Prologis UK Logistics V enture (“UKL V”)   3   439   94   249 
Subtotal Europe   159   13,515    130   284 
Asia:                 
Nippon Prologis REIT , Inc. (“NPR”)   29   5,316    -   - 
Prologis China Logistics V enture   22   1,178    59   963 
Subtotal Asia   51   6,494    59   963 
Total   340  $ 30,228   $ 197  $ 1,247  
                
 
In January 2019, we formed Prologis Brazil Logistics V enture (“PBL V”), a Brazilian unconsolidated co-investment venture, with one
partner . We contributed an initial portfolio of real estate properties to PBL V consisting of 14 operating properties totaling 7 million
square feet and 371 acres of land. W e received cash proceeds and units for our 20% equity interest.
 
For more information regarding our unconsolidated and consolidated co-investment ventures, see Notes 5 and 11 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
 
ITEM 3. Legal Proceedings
 
From time to time, we and our co-investment ventures are parties to a variety of legal proceedings arising in the ordinary course of
business. W e believe that, with respect to any such matters to which we are currently a party , the ultimate disposition of any such
matter will not result in a material adverse ef fect on our business, financial position or results of operations.
 
ITEM 4. Mine Safety Disclosures
 
Not Applicable.
 
PART II
 
ITEM 5. Market for Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases
of Equity Securities
 
MARKET INFORMATION AND HOLDERS
 
Our common stock is listed on the NYSE under the symbol “PLD.”
 
20
Stock Performance Graph
 
The following line graph compares the change in Prologis, Inc. cumulative total stockholder ’s return on shares of its common stock
from December 31, 2013, to the cumulative total return of the S&P  500 Stock Index and the Financial Times and Stock Exchange
NAREIT  Equity REIT s Index from December 31, 2013, to December 31, 2018. The graph assumes an initial investment of $100 in our
common stock and each of the indices on December 31, 2013, and, as required by the SEC, the reinvestment of all dividends. The
return shown on the graph is not necessarily indicative of future performance.
 
This graph and the accompanying text are not “soliciting material,” are not deemed filed with the SEC and are not to be incorporated
by reference in any filing by the Company under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended, whether made before or after the date hereof and irrespective of any general incorporation language in any such filing.
 
PREFERRED STOCK DIVIDENDS
 
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, we had 1.4 million shares of the Series Q preferred stock with a liquidation preference of $50 per
share that will be redeemable at our option on or after November 13, 2026. Dividends payable per share were $4.27 for the years
ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively .
  
For more information regarding dividends, see Note 9 to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and
Supplementary Data.
 
SALES OF UNREGISTERED SECURITIES
 
During 2018, we did not issue shares of common stock of Prologis, Inc. in connection with the redemption of common units of
Prologis, L.P . If issued, the issuance of the shares of common stock would be issued in reliance on the exemption from registration
requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, af forded by Section 4(a)(2) thereof.
 
SECURITIES AUTHORIZED FOR ISSUANCE UNDER EQUITY COMPENSATION PLANS
 
For information regarding securities authorized for issuance under our equity compensation plans, see Notes 9 and 12 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
 
21
OTHER STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
 
Common Stock Plans
 
Further information relative to our equity compensation plans will be provided in our 2019 Proxy Statement or in an amendment filed
on Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 6. Selected Financial Data
 
The following table summarizes selected financial data related to our historical financial condition and results of operations for both
Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P . (in millions, except for per share and unit amounts):
 
 2018   2017   2016   2015   2014  
Operating Data:                    
Total revenues $2,804   $2,618   $2,533   $2,197   $1,761  
Gains on real estate transactions, net $ 841  $1,183   $ 757  $ 759  $ 726 
Consolidated net earnings $1,823   $1,761   $1,293   $ 926  $ 739 
Net earnings per share attributable to common stockholders
     and unitholders – Basic $2.90  $3.10  $2.29  $1.66  $1.25 
Net earnings per share attributable to common stockholders
     and unitholders – Diluted $2.87  $3.06  $2.27  $1.64  $1.24 
Dividends per common share and distributions per common unit $1.92  $1.76  $1.68  $1.52  $1.32 
Consolidated Balance Sheet Data:                    
Total assets $38,418   $29,481   $30,250   $31,395   $25,775  
Total debt $11,090   $9,413   $10,608   $11,627   $9,337  
FFO (1):                    
Reconciliation of net earnings to FFO:                    
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders $1,643   $1,642   $1,203   $ 863  $ 622 
Total NAREIT  defined adjustments  707   101   534   461   299 
Total our defined adjustments  (118 )  52   (35)  (15)  (33)
FFO, as modified by Prologis (1) $2,232   $1,795   $1,702   $1,309   $ 888 
Total core defined adjustments  (444 )  (244 )  (302 )  (128 )  65 
Core FFO (1) $1,788   $1,551   $1,400   $1,181   $ 953
 
 
(1)FFO; FFO, as modified by Prologis and Core FFO are non-GAAP  measures. See Item 7. Management’ s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations for our definition of FFO measures and a complete reconciliation to
net earnings.
 
ITEM 7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
 
The following discussion should be read in conjunction with the Consolidated Financial Statements included in Item 8. Financial
Statements and Supplementary Data of this report and the matters described under Item 1A. Risk Factors.
 
MANAGEMENT’S OVERVIEW
 
Summary of 2018
 
During the year ended December 31, 2018, operating fundamentals remained strong for our O&M portfolio and we ended the year
with occupancy of 97.5%. See below for the results of our two business segments and details of operating activity of our O&M
portfolio.
 
In 2018, we completed the following significant activities as further described in the accompanying Notes to the Consolidated
Financial Statements:
 
• On August 22, 2018, we completed the DCT  Transaction for $8.5 billion through the issuance of $6.6 billion of equity and the
assumption of $1.9 billion of debt. In the third quarter , we repaid $1.8 billion of the assumed debt using the proceeds from the
debt issuances discussed below . See Notes 3 and 8 to our Consolidated Financial Statements for more information on this
transaction.
 
• We issued the following senior notes, primarily for the refinancing of the assumed DCT  debt, as discussed above, as well as for
general corporate purposes, including the repayment or repurchase of other indebtedness:
 
 oIn January , we issued €400 million ($494 million) of senior notes bearing a floating rate of Euribor plus 0.3%, maturing in
January 2020.
 
22
 oIn June, we issued $700 million of senior notes that bear interest rates ranging from 3.9% to 4.4%, maturing from
September 2028 through 2048.
 
 oIn July , we issued €700 million ($819 million) of senior notes that bear an interest rate of 1.9% and mature in January
2029.
 
 oIn September , we issued ¥55 billion ($489 million) of senior notes that bear interest rates ranging from 0.7% to 1.5%,
maturing from September 2025 through 2038.
 
This debt activity resulted in extending our debt maturities to 76 months and lowering our ef fective interest rate to 2.7%, both on
a weighted-average basis.
 
• We generated net proceeds of $2.8 billion and realized net gains of $841 million from the contribution of properties to our
unconsolidated co-investment ventures, principally in Europe and Japan, and the disposition of non-strategic operating
properties, principally in Europe and the U.S. With these dispositions, we completed our O&M disposition program of non-
strategic assets that began in 2011. Through this program we generated approximately $14 billion in proceeds resulting in our
O&M operating portfolio being focused on the highest-quality properties in the best markets.
 
• We earned promotes aggregating $118 million in Strategic Capital Revenues  ($80 million net of related expenses), principally
from the Prologis China Logistics V enture and PELP .
 
In January 2019, we formed PBL V, a Brazilian unconsolidated co-investment venture, with one partner . We contributed an initial
portfolio of real estate properties to PBL V consisting of 14 operating properties totaling 7 million square feet and 371 acres of land. W e
received cash proceeds and units for our 20% equity interest.
 
We ended 2018 with vacancies at historic lows, strong customer and investor demand, leases signed with record long terms and a
strong balance sheet. W e have seen no signs of slowness based on our operating metrics and remain positive on our outlook.
However , given the current market volatility caused by current trade and tarif f disputes and uncertainty with regard to the withdrawal of
the U.K. from the European Union, we will continue to be prudent in running our business.
 
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
 
We evaluate our business operations based on the NOI of our two operating segments: Real Estate Operations and Strategic Capital.
NOI by segment is a non-GAAP  financial measure that is calculated using revenues and expenses directly from our financial
statements. W e consider NOI by segment to be an appropriate supplemental measure of our performance because it helps
management and investors understand our core operations.
 
Below is a reconciliation of our NOI by segment to Operating Income  per the Consolidated Financial Statements (in millions). Each
segment’ s NOI is reconciled to a line item in the Consolidated Financial Statements in the respective segment discussion below .
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Real Estate Operations – NOI  $ 1,784   $ 1,662   $ 1,646  
Strategic Capital – NOI   249   219   175 
General and administrative expenses   (239 )  (231 )  (222 )
Depreciation and amortization expenses   (947 )  (879 )  (931 )
Operating income  $ 847  $ 771  $ 668 
            
 
See Note 17 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information on our segments and a reconciliation of each business
segment’ s NOI to Operating Income  and Earnings Before Income T axes.
 
Real Estate Operations
 
This operating segment principally includes rental revenues, rental recoveries and rental expenses recognized from our consolidated
properties. W e allocate the costs of our property management and leasing functions to the Real Estate Operations segment through
Rental Expenses and the Strategic Capital segment through Strategic Capital Expenses based on the square footage of the relative
portfolios. The operating fundamentals in the markets in which we operate continue to be strong, which has increased rents, kept
occupancies high and fueled development activity . In addition, this segment is impacted by our development, acquisition and
disposition activities.
 
23
Below are the components of Real Estate Operations revenues, expenses and NOI (in millions), derived directly from line items in the
Cons olidated Financial Statements.
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Rental revenues  $ 1,859   $ 1,738   $ 1,735  
Rental recoveries   530   487   486 
Development management and other revenues   9   19   8 
Rental expenses   (601 )  (570 )  (569 )
Other expenses   (13)  (12)  (14)
Real Estate Operations – NOI  $ 1,784   $ 1,662   $ 1,646
 
 
The change in Real Estate Operations NOI during these periods was impacted by the following items (dollars in millions):
       
 
(1) Acquisition activity increased NOI from this segment in 2018, compared to 2017, primarily due to the DCT  Transaction on
August 22, 2018.
 
(2) During these periods, we experienced increased occupancy and positive rent rate growth. Rent rate growth (or rent change) is a
combination of the rollover of existing leases and increases in certain rental rates from contractual rent increases on existing
leases. If a lease has a contractual rent increase that is not known at the time the lease commences, such as the consumer
price index or a similar metric, the rent increase is not included in rent leveling and therefore, impacts the rental revenues we
recognize. See below for key metrics on occupancy and rent change on rollover for the consolidated operating portfolio.
 
(3) We calculate changes in NOI from development completions period over period by comparing the change in NOI generated on
the pool of developments that completed on or after January 1, 2017 through December 31, 2018 for the period 2018 from 2017
and on or after January 1, 2016 through December 31, 2017 for the period 2017 from 2016.
 
(4) Included in contribution and disposition activity for both periods was the contribution of the Prologis North American Industrial
Fund (“NAIF”) operating properties to USLF in July 2017.
 
(5) Other items include property tax expense recoveries, noncash adjustments for the amortization of above or below market
leases, non-recoverable expenses and changes in foreign currency exchange rates.
 
Below are key operating metrics of our consolidated operating portfolio. Beginning January 1, 2018, we modified certain definitions of
our operating metrics to align methodologies with members of the industrial REIT  group. These changes were retroactively applied for
all prior periods presented.
 
   
 
24
(1) In August 2018, we completed the DCT  Transaction and acquired a portfolio of logistics real estate assets.
 
(2) Consolidated square feet of leases commenced and weighted average rent change were calculated for leases with initial terms
of one year or greater .
 
Development Start Activity
 
The following table summarizes consolidated development starts (dollars and square feet in millions):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Number of new development projects during the period   67   74   73 
Square feet   26   25   22 
TEI  $ 2,408   $ 2,261   $ 1,754  
Percentage of build-to-suits based on TEI   40.8%  48.5%  42.2%
 
Development Stabilization Activity
 
The following table summarizes consolidated development stabilization activity (dollars and square feet in millions):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Number of development projects stabilized during the period   60   76   75 
Square feet   21   24   27 
TEI  $ 1,824   $ 1,949   $ 2,178  
Weighted average stabilized yield (1)   6.5%  6.5%  6.6%
Estimated value at completion  $ 2,459   $ 2,509   $ 2,723  
Estimated weighted average margin   34.8%  28.8%  25.0%
 
(1) We calculate the weighted average stabilized yield as estimated NOI assuming stabilized occupancy divided by TEI.
 
At December 31, 2018, our development portfolio, including properties under development and prestabilized properties, was 50.8%
leased and expected to be completed before July 2020. For additional information on our development portfolio at December 31,
2018, see Item 2. Properties.
 
Capital Expenditures
 
We capitalize costs incurred in renovating and improving our operating properties as part of the investment basis. The following graph
summarizes our total capital expenditures and capital expenditures per average square foot of our consolidated operating properties
during each year:
 
 
Strategic Capital
 
This operating segment includes revenues from asset and property management and other fees for services performed, as well as
promote revenues earned from the unconsolidated ventures. Revenues associated with the Strategic Capital segment fluctuate
because of changes in the number of real estate assets through acquisitions and dispositions and the fair value of the properties
owned by the ventures, the transactional activity in the ventures, foreign currency exchange rates and the timing of promotes. These
revenues are reduced generally by the direct costs associated with the asset and property-level management expenses for the
properties owned by these ventures. W e allocate the costs of our property management and leasing functions to the Strategic Capital
segment through Strategic Capital Expenses and to the Real Estate Operations segment through Rental Expenses based on the
square footage of the relative portfolios.
 
25
Below are the components of Strategic Capital revenues,  expenses and NOI, derived directly from the line items in the Consolidated
Financial Statements (in millions):  
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Strategic capital revenues  $ 406  $ 374  $ 304 
Strategic capital expenses   (157 )   (155 )   (129 )
Strategic Capital – NOI  $ 249  $ 219  $ 175 
             
Below is additional detail of our Strategic Capital revenues, expenses and NOI (in millions):
 
  U.S. (1)   Other Americas  Europe   Asia   Total  
  2018  2017  2016  2018  2017  2016  2018  2017  2016  2018  2017  2016  2018  2017  2016 
Strategic capital revenues
($)                                                             
Recurring fees (2)   65   47   33   23   23   21   95   88   84   48   39   38   231   197   176 
Transactional fees (3)   9   10   6   3   2   2   23   15   14   22   22   17   57   49   39 
Promote revenues (4)   1   120   -   6   4   -   57   4   89   54   -   -   118   128   89 
Total strategic capital
revenues ($)   75   177   39   32   29   23   175   107   187   124   61   55   406   374   304 
Strategic capital expense
($)   (70)  (70)  (41)  (12)  (12)  (10)  (39)  (39)  (43)  (36)  (34)  (35)  (157)  (155)  (129)
Strategic Capital – NOI
($)   5   107   (2)  20   17   13   136   68   144   88   27   20   249   219   175 
                                                            
 
(1) The U.S. expenses include compensation and personnel costs for employees who were based in the U.S. but also support other
regions.
 
(2) Recurring fees include asset and property management fees.
 
(3) Transactional fees include leasing commission, acquisition, development and other fees.
 
(4) The promote revenues represent the third-party partners’  share based on the venture’ s cumulative returns to investors over a
certain time-period, generally three years. Approximately 40% of promote revenues are paid to our employees as a combination
of cash and stock awards pursuant to the terms of the Prologis Promote Plan and expensed through Strategic Capital
Expenses , as vested.
 
The following real estate investments were held through our unconsolidated co-investment ventures based on historical cost at
December 31 (dollars and square feet in millions):
 
  U.S.   Other Americas   Europe   Asia   Total  
  2018  2017  2016  2018  2017  2016  2018  2017  2016  2018  2017  2016  2018  2017  2016 
Ventures   1   1   1   2   2   2   3   3   4   2   2   2   8   8   9 
Operating
properties   566   552   369   209   205   213   669   707   700   125   95   85   1,569   1,559   1,367 
Square
feet   91   88   50   39   37   42   159   166   163   51   41   36   340   332   291 
Total
assets ($)   7,303   7,062   4,238   2,137   2,118   2,793   13,028   13,586   10,853   7,089   6,133   5,173   29,557   28,899   23,057 
                                                            
 
See Note 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information on our unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
G&A Expenses
 
G&A expenses were $239 million, $231 million and $222 million for 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively . G&A  expenses increased
marginally over the last three years due to inflationary increases and higher compensation expenses based on our performance.
 
We capitalize certain internal costs directly related to our development and leasing activities. Capitalized G&A  expenses primarily
included salaries and related costs. The following table summarizes capitalized G&A  amounts (in millions):  
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Building and land development activities  $ 63  $ 63  $ 61 
Leasing activities (1)   21   24   24 
Operating building improvements and other   16   15   16 
Total capitalized G&A  expenses  $ 100  $ 102  $ 101 
Capitalized salaries and related costs as a percent of total salaries and related costs   24.5%  24.4%  26.0%
 
(1) Based on new accounting guidance, beginning January 1, 2019, we will no longer capitalize internal costs associated with
leasing activities and will record these costs to Rental Expense  in the Consolidated Statements of Income. See Note 2 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information.
 
Depreciation and Amortization Expenses
 
Depreciation and amortization expenses were $947 million, $879 million and $931 million for 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively .
 
26
The following table highlights the key changes in depreciation and amortization ex penses during these periods ( dollars  in millions ):
    
 
(1) The acquisition of properties increased depreciation and amortization expense in 2018 from 2017, primarily due to the DCT
Transaction through which we acquired operating properties and the related intangible assets.
 
(2) The disposition and contribution of properties decreased depreciation and amortization expense during both periods, primarily
due to the contribution of the consolidated NAIF operating properties to USLF in July 2017.
 
Our O&M Operating Portfolio
 
We manage our business and review our operating fundamentals on an O&M basis, which includes properties wholly owned by us or
owned by one of our co-investment ventures. W e believe reviewing these fundamentals this way allows management to understand
the entire impact to the financial statements, as it will af fect both the Real Estate Operations and Strategic Capital segments, as well
as the net earnings we recognize from our unconsolidated co-investment ventures based on our ownership. W e do not control the
unconsolidated co-investment ventures for purposes of GAAP  and the presentation of the ventures’  operating information does not
represent a legal claim.
 
Our O&M operating portfolio does not include value-added properties or properties held for sale to third parties and was as follows at
December 31 (square feet in millions):
 
 2018   2017   2016  
 Number of
Properties   Square
Feet   Percentage
Occupied   Number of
Properties   Square
Feet   Percentage
Occupied   Number of
Properties   Square
Feet   Percentage
Occupied  
Consolidated  1,835    348   97.2%  1,532    297   97.3%  1,777    332   97.0%
Unconsolidated  1,561    339   97.8%  1,557    331   97.1%  1,359    290   97.2%
Total  3,396    687   97.5%  3,089    628   97.2%  3,136    622   97.1%
 
Below are the key operating metrics summarizing the leasing activity of our O&M operating portfolio. Beginning January 1, 2018, we
modified certain definitions of our operating metrics to align methodologies with members of the industrial REIT  group. These changes
were retroactively applied for all prior periods presented.  
 
     
27
 
(1) Square feet of leases commenced and weighted average rent change were calculated for leases with initial terms of one year or
greater . We retained more than 70% of our customers, based on the total square feet of leases commenced, for each year
during the three-year period ended December 31, 2018.
 
(2) Turnover costs are defined as leasing commissions and tenant improvements and represent the obligations incurred in
connection with the lease commencement for leases greater than one year . In 2018 turnover costs per square foot increased,
however , due to the longer terms on leases commenced, this resulted in a lower cost as a percentage of lease value.
 
Same Store Analysis
 
Our same store metrics are non-GAAP  financial measures, which are commonly used in the real estate industry and expected from
the financial community , on both a net-ef fective and cash basis. W e evaluate the performance of the operating properties we own and
manage using a “same store” analysis because the population of properties in this analysis is consistent from period to period, which
allows us to analyze our ongoing business operations.
 
We define our same store population for the three months ended December 31, 2018 as our O&M properties that were in the
operating portfolio at January 1, 2017 and owned throughout the end of the same three-month period in both 2018 and 2017. The
same store population excludes non-industrial real estate properties and properties held for sale to third parties, along with
development properties that were not stabilized at the beginning of the period (January 1, 2017) and properties acquired or disposed
of to third parties during the period. Beginning January 1, 2018, we modified our definition of same store to align on consistent
methodologies with members of the industrial REIT  group. This did not materially change our historical amounts reported. To derive an
appropriate measure of period-to-period operating performance, we remove the ef fects of foreign currency exchange rate movements
by using the reported period end exchange rate to translate from local currency into the U.S. dollar , for both periods. W e believe the
factors that af fect rental revenues, rental recoveries, rental expenses and NOI in the same store portfolio are generally the same as
for our consolidated portfolio.
 
As same store is a non-GAAP  financial measure, it has certain limitations as an analytical tool and may vary among real estate
companies. As a result, we provide a reconciliation of rental revenues, rental recoveries and rental expenses from our Consolidated
Financial Statements prepared in accordance with GAAP  to same store property NOI. In addition, we further remove certain noncash
items (straight-line rent adjustments and amortization of lease intangibles) included in the financial statements prepared in accordance
with GAAP  to reflect a cash same store number . To clearly label these metrics, they are categorized as same store portfolio NOI – net
effective and same store portfolio NOI – cash.
 
We evaluate the results of our same store portfolio on a quarterly basis. The following is a reconciliation of our consolidated rental
revenues, rental recoveries, rental expenses and property NOI for each quarter in 2018 and 2017 to the full year , as included in the
Consolidated Statements of Income and within Note 19 to the Consolidated Financial Statements and to the respective amounts in
our same store portfolio analysis for the three months ended December 31 (dollars in millions):
 
  Three Months Ended      
  March 31,   June 30,   September 30,   December 31,   Full Year  
2018                     
Rental revenues  $ 428  $ 427  $ 477  $ 527  $ 1,859  
Rental recoveries   128   118   132   152   530 
Rental expenses   (143 )  (133 )  (147 )  (178 )  (601 )
Property NOI  $ 413  $ 412  $ 462  $ 501  $ 1,788  
2017                     
Rental revenues  $ 440  $ 448  $ 416  $ 434  $ 1,738  
Rental recoveries   127   128   115   117   487 
Rental expenses   (153 )  (148 )  (129 )  (140 )  (570 )
Property NOI  $ 414  $ 428  $ 402  $ 411  $ 1,655
 
28
 
  2018   2017   % Change  
Rental revenues             
Rental revenues (per the quarterly information table above)  $ 527  $ 434     
Rental recoveries (per the quarterly information table above)   152   117     
Total rental revenues (1)   679   551     
Adjustments to derive same store results:             
Properties not included in the same store portfolio and other adjustments (1) (2)   (187 )  (75)    
Unconsolidated co-investment ventures (1)   537   516     
Same store portfolio – rental revenues – net effective  $ 1,029   $ 992   3.7%
Straight-line rent and fair value lease adjustments   (9)  (12)    
Same store portfolio – rental revenues – cash  $ 1,020   $ 980   4.2%
             
Rental expenses             
Rental expenses (per the quarterly information table above) (1)  $ 178  $ 140     
Adjustments to derive same store results:             
Properties not included in the same store portfolio and other adjustments (1) (3)   (47)  (13)    
Unconsolidated co-investment ventures (1)   123   119     
Same store portfolio – rental expenses – net effective and cash  $ 254  $ 246   3.2%
             
NOI             
Property NOI (per the quarterly information table above) (1)  $ 501  $ 411     
Adjustments to derive same store results:             
Properties not included in the same store portfolio and other adjustments (1) (2) (3)   (140 )  (62)    
Unconsolidated co-investment ventures (1)   414   397     
Same store portfolio – NOI – net effective  $ 775  $ 746   3.9%
Same store portfolio – NOI – cash  $ 766  $ 734   4.5%
 
(1) We include 100% of the same store NOI from the properties in our same store portfolio. During the periods presented, certain
properties owned by us were contributed to a co-investment venture and are included in the same store portfolio. Neither our
consolidated results nor those of the co-investment ventures, when viewed individually , would be comparable on a same store
basis because of the changes in composition of the respective portfolios from period to period (e.g. the results of a contributed
property are included in our consolidated results through the contribution date and in the results of the unconsolidated entities
subsequent to the contribution date). As a result, only line items labeled “same store portfolio” are comparable period over
period.
 
(2) We exclude non-industrial real estate properties and properties held for sale to third parties, along with development properties
that were not stabilized at the beginning of the reporting period and properties acquired or disposed of to third parties during the
period. W e also exclude net termination and renegotiation fees to allow us to evaluate the growth or decline in each property’ s
rental revenues without regard to one-time items that are not indicative of the property’ s recurring operating performance. Net
termination and renegotiation fees represent the gross fee negotiated to allow a customer to terminate or renegotiate their
lease, of fset by the write-of f of the asset recorded due to the adjustment to straight-line rents over the lease term.
 
(3) Rental expenses include the direct operating expenses of the property such as property taxes, insurance and utilities. In
addition, we include an allocation of the property management expenses for our consolidated properties based on the property
management services provided to each property (generally , based on a percentage of revenues). On consolidation, these
amounts are eliminated and the actual costs of providing property management services are recognized as part of our
consolidated rental expenses.
 
Other Components of Income (Expense)
 
Earnings from Unconsolidated Entities, Net
 
We recognized net earnings from unconsolidated entities, which are accounted for using the equity method, of $298 million, $249
million and $206 million during 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively . The earnings we recognize can be impacted by: (i) variances in
revenues and expenses of each venture; (ii) the size and occupancy rate of the portfolio of properties owned by each venture; (iii)
gains or losses from the dispositions of properties and extinguishment of debt; (iv) our ownership interest in each venture; and (v)
fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates used to translate our share of net earnings to U.S. dollars.
 
See the discussion of our co-investment ventures above in the Strategic Capital segment discussion and in Note 5 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements for a further breakdown of our share of net earnings recognized.
 
29
Interest Expense
 
The following table details our net interest expense (dollars in millions):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Gross interest expense  $ 269  $ 328  $ 383 
Amortization of debt discount (premium) and debt issuance costs, net   12   1   (15)
Capitalized amounts   (52)  (55)  (65)
Net interest expense  $ 229  $ 274  $ 303 
Weighted average ef fective interest rate during the year   3.0%  3.2%  3.3%
 
Our overall debt increased by $1.7 billion from December 31, 2017 to December 31, 2018, primarily due to the acquisition of DCT  on
August 22, 2018. Subsequent to the acquisition of DCT , we paid down $1.8 billion of the assumed debt through the issuance of senior
notes at significantly lower interest rates than the assumed debt. Gross interest expense decreased in 2018, from the same period in
2017, principally due to lower interest rates and average debt balances during the period. Gross interest expense decreased in 2017,
from the same period in 2016, principally due to decreased secured mortgage debt as a result of the USLF contribution and pay
downs, and lower interest rates due to the change in the composition of our senior notes.
 
See Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements and the Liquidity and Capital Resources section, for further discussion of our
debt and borrowing costs.
 
Gains on Real Estate Transactions, net
 
During 2018, 2017 and 2016, we recognized gains on real estate transactions, net of $841 million, $1.2 billion and $757 million,
respectively . We utilized the proceeds from both contributions and dispositions to fund our capital investments during the three-year
period ended December 31, 2018.
 
Over the last three years, we contributed properties, generally that we developed, to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures,
principally in Europe, Japan and Mexico. W e also sold properties to third parties, primarily from our operating portfolio in the U.S. In
2017, we contributed a significant portfolio of operating properties to USLF . As of the year ended December 31, 2018, we completed
our O&M disposition program of non-strategic assets that began in 2011. Through this program we generated approximately $14
billion in proceeds resulting in our O&M operating portfolio being focused on the highest-quality properties in the best markets.  We
expect to continue to develop and contribute properties to our co-investment ventures, depending on market conditions and other
factors.
 
Beginning January 1, 2018, under the new revenue recognition standard, as discussed in Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements we recognized the entire gain attributed to contributions of real estate properties to unconsolidated co-investment
ventures. W e previously recognized a gain to the extent of the third-party ownership in the unconsolidated co-investment ventures
acquiring the property . For deferred gains from sales recorded prior to the adoption, we will continue to recognize these gains over the
lives of the underlying real estate properties or at the time of disposition to a third party .
 
See Notes 4 and 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on the gains we recognized.
 
Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net
 
The following table details our foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net included in earnings (in millions):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Realized foreign currency and derivative gains (losses):             
Gains (losses) on the settlement of undesignated derivative transactions  $(3) $13  $3 
Losses on the settlement of transactions (1)   -   (2)  (3)
Total realized foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net   (3)  11   - 
             
Unrealized foreign currency and derivative gains (losses):             
Gains (losses) on the change in fair value of undesignated derivatives and unhedged nonderivative
     net investment hedges (2)   125   (74)  10 
Gains (losses) on remeasurement of certain assets and liabilities (1)   (5)  5   (2)
Total unrealized foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net   120   (69)  8 
Total foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net  $117  $(58) $8
 
 
(1) Unrealized gains or losses were primarily related to the remeasurement of assets and liabilities that are denominated in
currencies other than the functional currency of the entity , such as short-term intercompany loans between the U.S. parent and
certain foreign consolidated subsidiaries and tax receivables and payables. Realized gains or losses are recognized upon
settlement.
 
30
(2) We borrow in the functional currencies of the countries where we invest  and may designate these borrowings as nonderivative
net investment hedges . We recognize gains or losses on the remeasurement of the unhedged portion of this debt and the
related accrued interest.  
 
See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information about our foreign currency and derivative financial
instrument policies and Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information about our derivative and nonderivative
transactions.
 
Gains (Losses) on Early Extinguishment of Debt, Net
 
In 2018, we recognized a loss of $2 million upon extinguishment of the $1.8 billion of debt assumed in the DCT  Transaction. The loss
represents the excess of the prepayment penalties of $49 million over the $47 million premium recorded upon assumption of this debt.
We repurchased and redeemed portions of several series of senior notes, term loans and secured mortgage debt that resulted in the
recognition of a $68 million loss in 2017 and a $2 million gain in 2016. Through these activities, over the last three years, we reduced
our ef fective interest rate and lengthened the maturities of our debt. See Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements and the
Liquidity and Capital Resources section, for more information regarding our debt repurchases.
 
Income Tax Expense
 
We recognize income tax expense related to our taxable REIT  subsidiaries and in the local, state and foreign jurisdictions in which we
operate. Our current income tax expense fluctuates from period to period based primarily on the timing of our taxable income.
Deferred income tax expense (benefit) is generally a function of the period’ s temporary dif ferences and the utilization of net operating
losses generated in prior years that had been previously recognized as deferred income tax assets in taxable subsidiaries.
 
The following table summarizes our income tax expense (benefit) (in millions):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Current income tax expense:             
Income tax expense  $ 44  $ 39  $ 36 
Income tax expense on dispositions   17   19   24 
Income tax expense on dispositions related to acquired tax liabilities   1   2   - 
Total current income tax expense   62   60   60 
             
Deferred income tax expense (benefit):             
Income tax expense (benefit)   2   (3)  (5)
Income tax benefit on dispositions related to acquired tax liabilities   (1)  (2)  - 
Total deferred income tax expense (benefit)   1   (5)  (5)
Total income tax expense  $ 63  $ 55  $ 55
 
 
Our income taxes are discussed in more detail in Note 13 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
Net Earnings Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests
 
This amount represents the third-party investors’  share of the earnings generated in consolidated entities in which we do not own
100% of the equity , reduced by the third-party share of fees or promotes payable to us and earned during the period.  We had net
earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests of $174 million, $109 million and $83 million in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively .
Included in these amounts were $49 million, $45 million and $35 million in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively , of net earnings
attributable to the common limited partnership unitholders of Prologis, L.P .
 
See Note 11 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on our noncontrolling interests.
 
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
 
See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information about our foreign currency and derivative financial
instrument policies and Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more information about our derivative and nonderivative
transactions and other comprehensive income (loss).
 
ENVIRONMENTAL MATTERS
 
See Note 16 in the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information about environmental liabilities.
 
31
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
 
Overview
 
We consider our ability to generate cash from operating activities, distributions from our co-investment ventures, contributions and
dispositions of properties and available financing sources to be adequate to meet our anticipated future development, acquisition,
operating, debt service, dividend and distribution requirements.
 
Near-Term Principal Cash Sources and Uses
 
In addition to dividends and distributions, we expect our primary cash needs will consist of the following:
 
• completion of the development and leasing of the properties in our consolidated development portfolio (at December 31, 2018,
100 properties in our development portfolio were 50.8% leased with a current investment of $2.1 billion and a TEI of $3.6 billion
when completed and leased, leaving $1.5 billion of estimated additional required investment);
 
• development of new properties for long-term investment or contributions to unconsolidated co-investment ventures, including
the acquisition of land in certain markets;
 
• capital expenditures and leasing costs on properties in our operating portfolio;
 
• repayment of debt and scheduled principal payments of $273 million in 2019;
 
• additional investments in current unconsolidated co-investment ventures or new investments in future unconsolidated co-
investment ventures;
 
• acquisition of operating properties or portfolios of operating properties (depending on market and other conditions) for direct,
long-term investment in our consolidated portfolio (this might include acquisitions from our co-investment ventures); and
 
• repurchase of our outstanding debt or equity securities (depending on prevailing market conditions, our liquidity , contractual
restrictions and other factors) through cash purchases, open-market purchases, privately negotiated transactions, tender of fers
or otherwise.
 
We expect to fund our cash needs principally from the following sources (subject to market conditions):
 
• available unrestricted cash balances ($344 million at December 31, 2018);
 
• net cash flow from property operations;
 
• fees earned for services performed on behalf of the co-investment ventures, including promotes;
 
• distributions received from the co-investment ventures;
 
• proceeds from the disposition of properties, land parcels or other investments to third parties;
 
• proceeds from the contributions of properties to current or future co-investment ventures;
 
• proceeds from the sale of a portion of our investments in co-investment ventures to achieve long-term ownership targets;
 
• borrowing capacity under our current credit facility arrangements, other facilities or borrowing arrangements ($3.4 billion
available at December 31, 2018, which increased to $3.9 billion available in January 2019 after we upsized our global senior
credit facility (the “Global Facility”), as discussed below); and
 
• proceeds from the issuance of debt.
 
We may also generate proceeds from the issuance of equity securities, subject to market conditions.
32
 
Debt
 
The following table summarizes information about our consolidated debt by currency at December 31 (dollars in millions):
 
  2018   2017  
  Weighted
Average
Interest Rate   Amount
Outstanding   % of
Total   Weighted
Average
Interest Rate   Amount
Outstanding   % of
Total  
British pound sterling   2.3% $ 636   5.8%  2.3% $ 672   7.1%
Canadian dollar   3.6%  266   2.4%  3.3%  451   4.8%
Euro   2.2%  4,894    44.1%  2.6%  3,840    40.8%
Japanese yen   0.9%  1,952    17.6%  0.9%  1,306    13.9%
U.S. dollar   4.5%  3,342    30.1%  4.1%  3,144    33.4%
Total debt (1)   2.7% $ 11,090        2.9% $ 9,413     
 
 
(1) The weighted average maturity for total debt outstanding at December 31, 2018 and 2017 was 76 months and 67 months,
respectively .
 
We had the following significant consolidated debt activity during 2018, which resulted in extending our debt maturities and lowering
our weighted average interest rate (principal in millions):
 
   Principal          
 Borrowing
Currency  Borrowing
Currency   USD   Stated Interest
Rate   Fixed/V ariable  Maturity
Repurchase of and payments on debt (1)              
2015 Canadian Term Loan CAD  $ 201  $159  CDOR + 1.5%   Variable  February 2023
                  
Issuance of debt (1)                  
Senior notes EUR  € 400  $494  Euribor + 0.3%   Variable  January 2020
Senior notes USD  $ 700  $700  3.9% – 4.4%   Fixed  September 2028 – 2048
Senior notes EUR  € 700  $819  1.9%   Fixed  January 2029
Senior notes JPY  ¥ 55,100   $489  0.7% – 1.5%   Fixed  September 2025 – 2038
December 2018 Yen Term
     Loan JPY  ¥ 20,000   $182  1.2% and Yen
LIBOR + 0.7%   Fixed/V ariable  December 2031 –
June 2033
 
(1) Excludes the debt assumed in the DCT  Transaction of $1.9 billion and repayment of $1.8 billion during 2018. See Note 8 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements for more information.
 
At December 31, 2018, we had credit facilities with an aggregate borrowing capacity of $3.5 billion, of which $3.4 billion was available
for borrowing. In January 2019, we upsized our Global Facility to $3.5 billion with maturity in January 2023, bringing our total
aggregate borrowing capacity to $4.0 billion.
 
Our credit ratings at December 31, 2018, were A3 from Moody’ s and A- from S&P , both with stable outlook. These ratings allow us to
borrow at an advantageous rate. Adverse changes in our credit ratings could negatively impact our business and, in particular , our
refinancing and other capital market activities, our ability to manage debt maturities, our future growth and our development and
acquisition activity . A securities rating is not a recommendation to buy , sell or hold securities and is subject to revision or withdrawal at
any time by the rating organization.
 
At December 31, 2018, we were in compliance with all of our financial debt covenants. These covenants include customary financial
covenants for total debt, encumbered debt and fixed charge coverage ratios.
 
See Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further discussion on our debt.
 
Equity Commitments Related to Certain Co-Investment Ventures
 
Certain co-investment ventures have equity commitments from us and our venture partners. Our venture partners fulfill their equity
commitment with cash. W e may fulfill our equity commitment through contributions of properties or cash.
 
33
The following table summarizes the remaining equity commitments at December  31, 2018 (in millions):
 
  Prologis   Venture Partners   Total   Expiration Date
Prologis Targeted U.S. Logistics Fund  $ -  $ 433  $ 433  2019 – 2020
Prologis European Logistics Fund (1)   -   1,067    1,067   2019 – 2020
Prologis UK Logistics V enture (2)   18   99   117  2021
Prologis China Logistics V enture   224   1,272    1,496   2020 – 2024
Total  $ 242  $ 2,871   $ 3,113    
 
(1) Equity commitments are denominated in euro and reported in U.S. dollars based on an exchange rate of $1.15 U.S. dollars to
the euro.
 
(2) Equity commitments are denominated in British pounds sterling and reported in U.S. dollars based on an exchange rate of $1.28
U.S. dollars to the British pound sterling.
 
As discussed above, in January 2019 we formed PBL V with one venture partner for total equity commitments of R$3.3 billion ($878
million). At closing, a majority of the initial commitments were satisfied through an acquisition of a portfolio of properties from us. 
 
See the Cash Flow Summary below for more information about our investment activity in the co-investment ventures.
 
Cash Flow Summary
 
The following table summarizes our cash flow activity (in millions):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Net cash provided by operating activities  $1,804   $1,687   $1,417  
Net cash provided by (used in) investing activities  $ (664 ) $ 543  $1,252  
Net cash used in financing activities  $(1,232 ) $(2,607 ) $(2,125 )
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents, including the ef fect of foreign
    currency exchange rates on cash  $ (103 ) $ (360 ) $ 543
 
 
Operating Activities
 
Cash provided by operating activities, exclusive of changes in receivables and payables, was impacted by the following significant
activities:
 
• Real estate operations. We receive the majority of our operating cash through the net revenues of our Real Estate Operations
segment. See the Results of Operations section above for further explanation on our Real Estate Operations segment. The
revenues from this segment include noncash adjustments for straight-lined rents and amortization of above and below market
leases of $67 million, $81 million and $94 million for 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively .
 
• Strategic capital.  We also generate operating cash through our Strategic Capital segment by providing management services
to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures. See the Results of Operations section above for the key drivers of the net
revenues from our Strategic Capital segment. Included in Strategic Capital Revenues  is the third-party investors’  share of the
total promote revenue, which is recognized in operating activities in the period it is received.
 
• G&A  expenses and equity-based compensation awards.  We incurred $239 million, $231 million and $222 million of G&A
costs in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively . Included in these amounts are equity-based, noncash compensation expenses of
$76 million, $77 million and $60 million in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively , which were recorded to Rental Expenses in the
Real Estate Operations segment, Strategic Capital Expenses in the Strategic Capital segment and G&A Expenses.
 
• Operating distributions from unconsolidated entities.  We received $350 million, $307 million and $287 million of
distributions from our unconsolidated entities in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively . Certain unconsolidated co-investment
ventures distribute the total promote, including our share which is recorded to Investment In and Advances to Unconsolidated
Entities  and included in operating activities in the period it is received.  
 
• Cash paid for interest and income taxes, net.  We paid combined amounts for interest and income taxes, net of amounts
received, of $266 million, $325 million and $352 million in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively . See Notes 8 and 13 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on this activity .
 
Investing Activities
 
Cash provided by investing activities is primarily driven by proceeds from contributions and dispositions of real estate properties. Cash
used in investing activities is principally driven by our investments in real estate development, acquisitions and capital expenditures.
See Note 4 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for further information on these activities. In addition, the following significant
transactions also impacted our cash provided by or used in investing activities:  
34
 
• DCT T ransaction, net of cash acquired.  We paid net cash of $46 million to complete the DCT  Transaction in 2018, primarily
due to transaction costs. The acquisition was financed through the issuance of equity and assumption of debt. See Notes 3 and
18 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more detail on the DCT  Transaction.
 
• Investments in and advances to.  We invested cash in our unconsolidated co-investment ventures and other ventures, which
represented our proportionate share of $160 million, $250 million and $266 million in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively . The
ventures used the funds for the acquisition of properties, development and repayment of debt. See Note 5 to the Consolidated
Financial Statements for more detail on our unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
• Acquisition of a controlling interest. We paid net cash of $375 million to acquire a controlling interest in certain joint ventures
in Brazil in 2017.
 
• Return of investment. We received distributions from unconsolidated entities as a return of investment of $360 million, $209
million and $777 million during 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively . Included in these amounts were proceeds from the sale or
redemption of our investment in these entities and properties sold by certain unconsolidated entities.
 
• Repayment of notes receivable backed by real estate.  We received $34 million, $32 million and $203 million for the
repayment of notes received in connection with the disposition of real estate to third parties in 2018, 2017 and 2016,
respectively .
 
• Settlement of net investment hedges . We received net proceeds of $18 million, $2 million and $80 million from the settlement
of net investment hedges during 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively . See Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for
further information on our derivative transactions.
 
Financing Activities
 
Cash provided by and used in financing activities is primarily driven by proceeds from and payments on credit facilities and other debt,
along with dividends paid on common and preferred stock and noncontrolling interest contributions and distributions. The following
significant transactions impacted our cash provided by or used in financing activities:  
 
• Settlement of noncontrolling interests. We paid net cash of $710 million to acquire our partner ’s interest in NAIF and $80
million to acquire our partner ’s interest in the Prologis Brazil Logistics Partners Fund I, L.P . in 2017.
 
• Other debt activity . Our repurchase of and payments on debt and proceeds from the issuance of debt consisted of the
following activity (in millions):
 
   2018   2017   2016  
 Repurchase of and payments on debt (including extinguishment costs) (1)             
 Regularly scheduled debt principal payments and payments at maturity  $ 201  $ 238  $ 233 
 Senior notes   973   1,567    - 
 Term loans   2,484    1,236    1,612  
 Secured mortgage debt   508   538   457 
 Total  $ 4,166   $ 3,579   $ 2,302  
              
 Proceeds from the issuance of debt             
 Senior notes  $ 2,493   $ 645  $ - 
 Term loans   2,178    1,735    973 
 Secured mortgage debt   229   40   397 
 Total  $ 4,900   $ 2,420   $ 1,370  
              
 (1) We completed the DCT  Transaction in 2018 and assumed $1.9 billion of debt, of which $1.8 billion was paid of f with the
proceeds from the issuance of senior notes. The assumption of $1.9 billion of debt is excluded from the table above. See
Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for more detail on debt.
 
35
OFF-BALANCE SHEET ARRANGEMENTS
 
Unconsolidated Co-Investment Venture Debt
 
We had investments in and advances to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures, at December 31, 2018, of $5.4 billion. The
ventures listed below had total third-party debt of $8.1 billion at December 31, 2018. Certain of our ventures do not have third-party
debt and are therefore excluded. This debt is non-recourse to Prologis and other investors in the co-investment ventures, matures and
bears interest as follows at December 31, 2018 (dollars in millions):
 
  Debt (1)   Weighted Average Interest
Rate   Gross Book V alue (1)   Ownership %  
Prologis Targeted U.S. Logistics
Fund  $2,094   4.2%   $ 7,907   27.4%  
FIBRA  Prologis   838  4.3%    2,140   46.7%  
Prologis European Logistics Fund   2,238   2.5%    9,400   27.9%  
Prologis UK Logistics V enture   310  3.4%    439  15.0%  
Nippon Prologis REIT   1,957   0.7%    5,316   15.1%  
Prologis China Logistics V enture   711  5.6%    1,178   15.0%  
Total  $8,148       $ 26,380      
                
 
(1) The weighted average loan-to-value ratio for all unconsolidated co-investment ventures was 27.0% at December 31, 2018.
Loan-to-value, a non-GAAP  measure, was calculated as the percentage of total third-party debt to the gross book value of real
estate for each venture and weighted based on the cumulative gross book value of all unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
At December 31, 2018, we did not guarantee any third-party debt of the unconsolidated co-investment ventures. In our role as the
manager or sponsor , we work with the co-investment ventures to maintain suf ficient liquidity and refinance their maturing debt. There
can be no assurance that the co-investment ventures will be able to refinance any maturing indebtedness on terms as favorable as
the maturing debt, or at all. If the ventures are unable to refinance the maturing indebtedness with newly issued debt, they may be
able to obtain funds by voluntary capital contributions from us and our partners or by selling assets. Certain of our ventures also have
credit facilities, or unencumbered properties, both of which may be used to obtain funds.
 
CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATIONS
 
Long-Term Contractual Obligations
 
The following table summarizes our long-term contractual obligations at December 31, 2018 (in millions):
 
 Payments Due by Period  
 Less than
1 Year   1 to 3
Years   3 to 5
Years   More than
5 Years   Total  
Debt obligations, other than credit facilities $ 273  $ 2,672   $ 2,740   $ 5,426   $11,111  
Interest on debt obligations, other than credit facilities  281   488   391   726   1,886  
Unfunded commitments on the development portfolio (1)  1,214    214   -   -   1,428  
Operating lease payments (2)  39   73   62   670   844 
Total $ 1,807   $ 3,447   $ 3,193   $ 6,822   $15,269
 
 
(1) We had properties in our consolidated development portfolio (completed and under development) at December 31, 2018, with a
TEI of $3.6 billion. The unfunded commitments presented include not only those costs that we are obligated to fund under
construction contracts, but all costs necessary to place the property into service, including the estimated costs of tenant
improvements, marketing and leasing costs that we expect to incur as the property is leased.
 
(2) Due to a new accounting standard ef fective January 1, 2019, as a lessee we are required to record both a right-of-use asset and
lease liability for our ground and of fice space leases that we expect to approximate the present value of our future minimum
lease payments at December 31, 2018. See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements for additional information.
 
Distribution and Dividend Requirements
 
Our dividend policy on our common stock is to distribute a percentage of our cash flow to ensure that we will meet the dividend
requirements of the Internal Revenue Code, relative to maintaining our REIT  status, while still allowing us to retain cash to fund capital
improvements and other investment activities.
 
Under the Internal Revenue Code, REIT s may be subject to certain federal income and excise taxes on our undistributed taxable
income. The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, enacted on December 22, 2017, did not modify our current distribution policy . See Note 13 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements for more information on the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act.
 
We paid quarterly cash dividends of $0.48, $0.44 and $0.42 per common share in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively . Our future
common stock dividends, if and as declared, may vary and will be determined by the Board upon the circumstances prevailing at the
36
time, including our financial condition, operating results and REIT  distribution requirements, and may be adju sted at the discretion of
the Board during the year .
 
We make distributions on the common limited partnership units outstanding at the same per unit amount as our common stock
dividend. The Class A Units in the OP  are entitled to a quarterly distribution equal to $0.64665 per unit so long as the common units
receive a quarterly distribution of at least $0.40 per unit. W e paid a quarterly distribution of $0.64665 per Class A Unit in 2018, 2017
and 2016.
 
At December 31, 2018, we had 1.4 million shares of Series Q preferred stock outstanding with a liquidation preference of $50 per
share. The annual dividend rate is 8.54% per share and dividends are payable quarterly in arrears. Pursuant to the terms of our
preferred stock, we are restricted from declaring or paying any dividend with respect to our common stock unless and until all
cumulative dividends with respect to the preferred stock have been paid and suf ficient funds have been set aside for dividends that
have been declared for the relevant dividend period with respect to the preferred stock.
 
Other Commitments
 
On a continuing basis, we are engaged in various stages of negotiations for the acquisition or disposition of individual properties or
portfolios of properties.
 
CRITICAL ACCOUNTING POLICIES
 
A critical accounting policy is one that involves an estimate or assumption that is subjective and requires judgment on the part of
management about the ef fect of a matter that is inherently uncertain and is material to an entity’ s financial condition and results of
operations. Estimates are prepared using management’ s best judgment, after considering past and current economic conditions and
expectations for the future. Changes in estimates could af fect our financial position and specific items in our results of operations that
are used by stockholders, potential investors, industry analysts and lenders in their evaluation of our performance. Of the significant
accounting policies discussed in Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, those presented below have been identified by us
as meeting the criteria to be considered critical accounting policies. Refer to Note 2 for more information on these critical accounting
policies.
 
Acquisitions
 
We generally account for an acquisition of a single property or portfolio of properties as an asset acquisition. W e measure the real
estate assets acquired through an asset acquisition based on their cost or total consideration exchanged and any excess
consideration or bargain purchase amount is allocated to the real estate properties, excluding those identified as held for sale, on a
relative fair value basis.
 
We make estimates as part of our valuation of the assumed assets and liabilities at the acquisition date. The components of an
acquisition typically include buildings, land, improvements, intangible assets or liabilities related to the acquired leases, debt, deferred
tax liabilities and other assumed assets and liabilities. The purchase price allocation is based on the expected future cash flows of the
property and various characteristics of the markets where the property is located utilizing an income approach methodology , which
may be a discounted cash flow analysis or applying a capitalization rate to the estimated NOI of a property . Key assumptions include
market rents, growth rates, and discount and capitalization rates. Estimates of future cash flows are based on a number of factors
including historical operating results, known trends and market and economic conditions. W e determine discount and capitalization
rates by market based on recent transactions and other market data. The fair value of land is generally based on relevant market
data, such as a comparison of the subject site to similar parcels that have recently been sold or are currently being of fered on the
market for sale. The use of dif ferent assumptions to value the acquired properties and intangible assets and assumed liabilities could
affect the future revenues and expenses we recognize over the estimated remaining useful life or lease term.
 
Recoverability of Real Estate Assets
 
We assess the carrying values of our respective long-lived assets whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the
carrying amounts of these assets may not be fully recoverable.
 
Recoverability of real estate assets is measured by comparison of the carrying amount of the asset to the estimated future
undiscounted cash flows. To review our real estate assets for recoverability , we consider current market conditions, as well as our
intent with respect to holding or disposing of the asset. Our intent with regard to the underlying assets might change as market
conditions change. Fair value is determined through various valuation techniques, including discounted cash flow models, applying a
capitalization rate to the estimated NOI of a property , quoted market values and third-party appraisals, where considered necessary .
The use of projected future cash flows is based on assumptions that are consistent with our estimates of future expectations and the
strategic plan we use to manage our underlying business. If our analysis indicates that the carrying value of a property that we expect
to hold is not recoverable on an undiscounted cash flow basis, we recognize an impairment charge for the amount by which the
carrying value exceeds the current estimated fair value of the property . Assumptions and estimates used in the recoverability analyses
for future cash flows, including market rents, discount rates and capitalization rates are complex and subjective. Changes in economic
and operating conditions or our intent with regard to our investment that occurs subsequent to our impairment analyses could impact
these assumptions and result in future impairment.
 
37
NEW ACCOUNTING PRONOUNCEMENTS
 
See Note 2 to the Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
FUNDS FROM OPERATIONS ATTRIBUTABLE TO COMMON STOCKHOLDERS/UNITHOLDERS
 
FFO is a non-GAAP  financial measure that is commonly used in the real estate industry . The most directly comparable GAAP
measure to FFO is net earnings.
 
The National Association of Real Estate Investment Trusts (“NAREIT”) defines FFO as earnings computed under GAAP  to exclude
historical cost depreciation and gains and losses from the sales, along with impairment charges, of previously depreciated properties.
We also exclude the gains on revaluation of equity investments upon acquisition of a controlling interest and the gain recognized from
a partial sale of our investment, as these are similar to gains from the sales of previously depreciated properties. W e exclude similar
adjustments from our unconsolidated entities and the third parties’  share of our consolidated co-investment ventures.
 
Our FFO Measures
 
Our FFO measures begin with NAREIT’ s definition and we make certain adjustments to reflect our business and the way that
management plans and executes our business strategy . While not infrequent or unusual, the additional items we adjust for in
calculating FFO, as modified by Prologis and Core FFO , both as defined below , are subject to significant fluctuations from period to
period. Although these items may have a material impact on our operations and are reflected in our financial statements, the removal
of the ef fects of these items allows us to better understand the core operating performance of our properties over the long term. These
items have both positive and negative short-term ef fects on our results of operations in inconsistent and unpredictable directions that
are not relevant to our long-term outlook.
 
We calculate our FFO measures, as defined below , based on our proportionate ownership share of both our unconsolidated and
consolidated ventures. W e reflect our share of our FFO measures for unconsolidated ventures by applying our average ownership
percentage for the period to the applicable reconciling items on an entity by entity basis. W e reflect our share for consolidated
ventures in which we do not own 100% of the equity by adjusting our FFO measures to remove the noncontrolling interests share of
the applicable reconciling items based on our average ownership percentage for the applicable periods.
 
These FFO measures are used by management as supplemental financial measures of operating performance and we believe that it
is important that stockholders, potential investors and financial analysts understand the measures management uses. W e do not use
our FFO measures as, nor should they be considered to be, alternatives to net earnings computed under GAAP , as indicators of our
operating performance, as alternatives to cash from operating activities computed under GAAP  or as indicators of our ability to fund
our cash needs.
 
We analyze our operating performance principally by the rental revenues of our real estate and the revenues from our strategic capital
business, net of operating, administrative and financing expenses. This income stream is not directly impacted by fluctuations in the
market value of our investments in real estate or debt securities.
 
FFO, as modified by Prologis attributable to common stockholders/unitholders (“FFO, as modified by Prologis”)
 
To arrive at FFO, as modified by Prologis , we adjust the NAREIT  defined FFO measure to exclude the impact of foreign currency
related items and deferred tax, specifically:
 
• deferred income tax benefits and deferred income tax expenses recognized by our subsidiaries;
 
• current income tax expense related to acquired tax liabilities that were recorded as deferred tax liabilities in an acquisition, to the
extent the expense is of fset with a deferred income tax benefit in earnings that is excluded from our defined FFO measure;
 
• unhedged foreign currency exchange gains and losses resulting from debt transactions between us and our foreign
consolidated subsidiaries and our foreign unconsolidated entities;
 
• foreign currency exchange gains and losses from the remeasurement (based on current foreign currency exchange rates) of
certain third-party debt of our foreign consolidated and unconsolidated entities; and
 
• mark-to-market adjustments associated with derivative financial instruments.
 
We use FFO, as modified by Prologis , so that management, analysts and investors are able to evaluate our performance against
other REIT s that do not have similar operations or operations in jurisdictions outside the U.S.
 
Core FFO attributable to common stockholders/unitholders (“Core FFO”)
 
In addition to FFO, as modified by Prologis , we also use Core FFO.  To arrive at Core FFO, we adjust FFO, as modified by Prologis , to
exclude the following recurring and nonrecurring items that we recognized directly in FFO, as modified by Prologis :
 
• gains or losses from the disposition of land and development properties that were developed with the intent to contribute or sell;
38
 
• income tax expense related to the sale of investments in real estate;
 
• impairment charges recognized related to our investments in real estate generally as a result of our change in intent to
contribute or sell these properties;
 
• gains or losses from the early extinguishment of debt and redemption and repurchase of preferred stock; and
 
• expenses related to natural disasters.
 
We use Core FFO , including by segment and region, to: (i) assess our operating performance as compared to other real estate
companies; (ii) evaluate our performance and the performance of our properties in comparison with expected results and results of
previous periods; (iii) evaluate the performance of our management; (iv) budget and forecast future results to assist in the allocation of
resources; (v) provide guidance to the financial markets to understand our expected operating performance; and (vi) evaluate how a
specific potential investment will impact our future results.
 
Limitations on the use of our FFO measures
 
While we believe our modified FFO measures are important supplemental measures, neither NAREIT’ s nor our measures of FFO
should be used alone because they exclude significant economic components of net earnings computed under GAAP  and are,
therefore, limited as an analytical tool. Accordingly , these are only a few of the many measures we use when analyzing our business.
Some of the limitations are:
 
• The current income tax expenses that are excluded from our modified FFO measures represent the taxes and transaction costs
that are payable.
 
• Depreciation and amortization of real estate assets are economic costs that are excluded from FFO. FFO is limited, as it does
not reflect the cash requirements that may be necessary for future replacements of the real estate assets. Furthermore, the
amortization of capital expenditures and leasing costs necessary to maintain the operating performance of logistics facilities are
not reflected in FFO.
 
• Gains or losses from non-development property dispositions and impairment charges related to expected dispositions represent
changes in value of the properties. By excluding these gains and losses, FFO does not capture realized changes in the value of
disposed properties arising from changes in market conditions.
 
• The deferred income tax benefits and expenses that are excluded from our modified FFO measures result from the creation of a
deferred income tax asset or liability that may have to be settled at some future point. Our modified FFO measures do not
currently reflect any income or expense that may result from such settlement.
 
• The foreign currency exchange gains and losses that are excluded from our modified FFO measures are generally recognized
based on movements in foreign currency exchange rates through a specific point in time. The ultimate settlement of our foreign
currency-denominated net assets is indefinite as to timing and amount. Our FFO measures are limited in that they do not reflect
the current period changes in these net assets that result from periodic foreign currency exchange rate movements.
 
• The gains and losses on extinguishment of debt or preferred stock that we exclude from our Core FFO, may provide a benefit or
cost to us as we may be settling our obligation at less or more than our future obligation.
 
• The natural disaster expenses that we exclude from Core FFO are costs that we have incurred.
 
39
We compensate for these limitations by using our FFO measures only in conjunction with net earnings computed under GAAP  when
making our decisions. This information should be read with our complete Consolidated Financial Statements prepared under GAAP .
To assist investors in compensating for these limitations, we reconcile our modified FFO measures to our net earnings computed
under GAAP  (in millions).
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Reconciliation of net earnings to FFO measures:             
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders  $ 1,643   $ 1,642   $ 1,203  
             
Add (deduct) NAREIT  defined adjustments:             
Real estate related depreciation and amortization   913   848   900 
Gains on real estate transactions, net (excluding development properties and land)   (371 )  (855 )  (423 )
Reconciling items related to noncontrolling interests   23   (39)  (105 )
Our share of reconciling items included in earnings from unconsolidated entities   142   147   162 
NAREIT defined FFO   2,350    1,743    1,737  
             
Add (deduct) our modified adjustments:             
Unrealized foreign currency and derivative losses (gains), net   (120 )  69   (8)
Deferred income tax expense (benefit)   1   (5)  (5)
Current income tax expense related to acquired tax liabilities   1   2   - 
Reconciling items related to noncontrolling interests   -   -   1 
Our share of reconciling items included in earnings from unconsolidated entities   -   (14)  (23)
FFO, as modified by Prologis   2,232    1,795    1,702  
             
Adjustments to arrive at Core FFO:             
Gains on dispositions of development properties and land, net   (470 )  (328 )  (334 )
Current income tax expense on dispositions   17   19   24 
Acquisition expenses   -   -   4 
Losses (gains) on early extinguishment of debt and repurchase of preferred stock, net   3   72   (2)
Reconciling items related to noncontrolling interests   6   -   4 
Our share of reconciling items included in earnings from unconsolidated entities   -   (7)  2 
Core FFO  $ 1,788   $ 1,551   $ 1,400
 
 
ITEM 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk
 
We are exposed to the impact of foreign exchange-related variability and earnings volatility on our foreign investments and interest
rate changes. See our risk factors in Item 1A. Risk Factors, specifically:  The depreciation in the value of the foreign currency in
countries where we have a significant investment may adversely affect our results of operations and financial position and we may be
unable to refinance our debt or our cash flow may be insufficient to make required debt payments.  See also Notes 2 and 15 in the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data for more information about our foreign
operations and derivative financial instruments.
 
We monitor our market risk exposures using a sensitivity analysis. Our sensitivity analysis estimates the exposure to market risk
sensitive instruments assuming a hypothetical 10% adverse change in foreign currency exchange rates or interest rates at December
31, 2018. The results of the sensitivity analysis are summarized in the following sections. The sensitivity analysis is of limited
predictive value. As a result, revenues and expenses, as well as our ultimate realized gains or losses with respect to foreign currency
exchange rate and interest rate fluctuations will depend on the exposures that arise during a future period, hedging strategies at the
time and the prevailing foreign currency exchange rates and interest rates.
 
Foreign Currency Risk
 
We are exposed to foreign currency exchange variability related to investments in and earnings from our foreign investments. Foreign
currency market risk is the possibility that our results of operations or financial position could be better or worse than planned because
of changes in foreign currency exchange rates. W e primarily hedge our foreign currency risk by borrowing in the currencies in which
we invest thereby providing a natural hedge. W e may designate the debt as a nonderivative net investment hedge. W e may also
hedge our foreign currency risk by entering into derivative financial instruments that we designate as net investment hedges, as these
amounts of fset the translation adjustments on the underlying net assets of our foreign investments. At December 31, 2018, after
consideration of our derivative and nonderivative financial instruments as discussed in Note 15 to the Consolidated Financial
Statements, we had minimal net equity denominated in a currency other than the U.S. dollar .
 
For the year ended December 31, 2018, $509 million or 18.2% of our total consolidated revenue was denominated in foreign
currencies. W e enter into other foreign currency contracts, such as forwards, to reduce fluctuations in foreign currency associated with
the translation of the future earnings of our international subsidiaries. W e have Brazilian real, British pound sterling, Canadian dollar ,
euro and Japanese yen forward contracts, which were not designated as hedges, and have an aggregate notional amount of $669
million to mitigate risk associated with the translation of the future earnings of our subsidiaries denominated in these currencies.
40
Although the impact to net earnings is mitigated through higher trans lated U.S. dollar earnings from these currencies, a  weakening of
the U.S. dollar against these c urrencies by 10% c ould result in a $ 67 million cash payment on settlement of these contracts .
 
Interest Rate Risk
 
We are also exposed to the impact of interest rate changes on future earnings and cash flows. To mitigate that risk, we generally
borrow with fixed rate debt and we may use derivative instruments to fix the interest rate on our variable rate debt. At December 31,
2018, $9.2 billion of our debt bore interest at fixed rates and therefore the fair value of these instruments is af fected by changes in
market interest rates. At December 31, 2018, $1.8 billion of our debt bore interest at variable rates. The following table summarizes
the principal payments, including net premium and debt issuance costs, by maturity date at December 31, 2018 (in millions):
 
 2019   2020   2021   2022   Thereafter   Total   Fair V alue  
Fixed rate debt (1) $264  $1,150   $818  $803  $ 6,208   $9,243   $ 9,591  
Weighted average interest
rate (2)  7.5%   0.9%   1.7%   3.1%   3.2%   2.9%     
                            
Variable rate debt                            
Credit facilities $ -  $ 51  $ -  $ -  $ -  $ 51  $ 51 
Term loans  -   499   -   271   848   1,618    1,633  
Secured mortgage debt  -   10   168   -   -   178   178 
Total variable rate debt $ -  $ 560  $168  $271  $ 848  $1,847   $ 1,862
 
 
(1) At December 31, 2018, we had interest rate swap agreements to fix $500 million of our floating rate euro senior notes issued in
January 2018, which are included in fixed rate debt.
 
(2) The interest rates represent the ef fective interest rates (including amortization of the debt issuance costs and the noncash
premiums and discounts) at December 31, 2018 for the debt outstanding and include the impact of interest rate swaps, which
effectively fix the interest rate on our variable rate debt.
 
At December 31, 2018, the weighted average ef fective interest rate on our variable rate debt was 1.8%. Changes in interest rates can
cause interest expense to fluctuate on our variable rate debt. On the basis of our sensitivity analysis, a 10% increase in interest rates
based on our average outstanding variable rate debt balances, not subject to interest rate swap agreements, would result in additional
annual interest expense of $4 million for the year ended December 31, 2018, which equates to a change in interest rates of 19 basis
points.
 
ITEM 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
 
The Consolidated Balance Sheets of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P . at December 31, 2018 and 2017, the Consolidated Statements
of Income of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P ., the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis,
L.P., the Consolidated Statements of Equity of Prologis, Inc., the Consolidated Statements of Capital of Prologis, L.P . and the
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P . for each of the years in the three-year period ended
December 31, 2018, Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements and Schedule III — Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation,
together with the reports of KPMG LLP , independent registered public accounting firm, are included under Item 15 of this report and
are incorporated herein by reference. Selected unaudited quarterly financial data are presented in Note 19 of the Consolidated
Financial Statements.
 
ITEM 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
 
None.
 
ITEM 9A. Controls and Procedures
 
Controls and Procedures (The Parent)
 
Prologis, Inc. carried out an evaluation under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive
Officer and Chief Financial Of ficer, of the ef fectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under
the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 (the “Exchange Act”)) at December 31, 2018. Based on this evaluation, the Chief Executive
Officer and the Chief Financial Of ficer have concluded that the disclosure controls and procedures are ef fective to ensure that
information required to be disclosed by us in reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed,
summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the SEC rules and forms. Subsequent to December 31, 2018, there
were no significant changes in the internal controls or in other factors that could significantly af fect these controls, including any
corrective actions with regard to significant deficiencies and material weaknesses.
 
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
There has been no change in our internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15(d)-15(f)
under the Exchange Act) that occurred during the quarter ended December 31, 2018, that has materially af fected, or is reasonably
likely to materially af fect, our internal control over financial reporting.
41
 
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
We are responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting as defined in Rules 13a-15(f)
and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act.
 
Under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer, an
evaluation of the ef fectiveness of the internal control over financial reporting was conducted at December 31, 2018, based on the
criteria described in “Internal Control — Integrated Framework” (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission. Based on this assessment, management determined that, at December 31, 2018, the internal control over
financial reporting was ef fective.
 
Our internal control over financial reporting at December 31, 2018, has been audited by KPMG LLP , an independent registered public
accounting firm, as stated in their attestation report which is included herein.
 
Limitations of the Effectiveness of Controls
 
Management’ s assessment included an evaluation of the design of the internal control over financial reporting and testing of the
operational ef fectiveness of the internal control over financial reporting. The internal control over financial reporting is a process
designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for
external purposes in accordance with GAAP . Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not
prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of ef fectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that
controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures
may deteriorate.
 
Controls and Procedures (The OP)
 
Prologis, L.P . carried out an evaluation under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive
Officer and Chief Financial Of ficer, of the ef fectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under
the Exchange Act) at December 31, 2018. Based on this evaluation, the Chief Executive Of ficer and the Chief Financial Of ficer have
concluded that the disclosure controls and procedures are ef fective to ensure that information required to be disclosed by us in reports
that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in
the SEC rules and forms. Subsequent to December 31, 2018, there were no significant changes in the internal controls or in other
factors that could significantly af fect these controls, including any corrective actions with regard to significant deficiencies and material
weaknesses.
 
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
There has been no change in our internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and 15(d)-15(f)
under the Exchange Act) that occurred during the quarter ended December 31, 2018, that has materially af fected, or is reasonably
likely to materially af fect, our internal control over financial reporting.
 
Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
 
We are responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting as defined in Rules 13a-15(f)
and 15d-15(f) under the Exchange Act.
 
Under the supervision and with the participation of management, including the Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer, an
evaluation of the ef fectiveness of the internal control over financial reporting was conducted at December 31, 2018, based on the
criteria described in “Internal Control — Integrated Framework” (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission. Based on this assessment, management determined that, at December 31, 2018, the internal control over
financial reporting was ef fective.
 
Limitations of the Effectiveness of Controls
 
Management’ s assessment included an evaluation of the design of the internal control over financial reporting and testing of the
operational ef fectiveness of the internal control over financial reporting. The internal control over financial reporting is a process
designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for
external purposes in accordance with GAAP . Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not
prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of ef fectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that
controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures
may deteriorate.
 
ITEM 9B. Other Information
 
None.
 
42
PART III
 
ITEM 10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to, including relevant sections in our 2019 Proxy Statement,
under the captions entitled Board of Directors and Corporate Governance; Executive Of ficers; Executive Compensation; Director
Compensation; Security Ownership; Equity Compensation Plans and Additional Information or will be provided in an amendment filed
on Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 11. Executive Compensation
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the relevant sections in our 2019 Proxy Statement, under
the captions entitled Board of Directors and Corporate Governance; Executive Of ficers; Executive Compensation and Director
Compensation or will be provided in an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the relevant sections in our 2019 Proxy Statement, under
the captions entitled Security Ownership and Equity Compensation Plans or will be provided in an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the relevant sections in our 2019 Proxy Statement, under
the caption entitled Board of Directors and Corporate Governance or will be provided in an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
ITEM 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services
 
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the relevant sections in our 2019 Proxy Statement, under
the caption entitled Audit Matters or will be provided in an amendment filed on Form 10-K/A.
 
PART IV
 
ITEM 15. Exhibits, Financial Statements and Schedules
 
The following documents are filed as a part of this report:
 
(a) Financial Statements and Schedules:
 
1. Financial Statements:
 
See Index to the Consolidated Financial Statements and Schedule III on page 44 of this report, which is incorporated herein
by reference.
 
2. Financial Statement Schedules:
 
Schedule III — Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
 
All other schedules have been omitted since the required information is presented in the Consolidated Financial Statements and the
related notes or is not applicable.
 
(b) Exhibits: The Exhibits required by Item 601 of Regulation S-K are listed in the Index to the Exhibits on pages 94 to 100 of this
report, which is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(c) Financial Statements: See Index to the Consolidated Financial Statements and Schedule III on page 44 of this report, which is
incorporated by reference.
 
ITEM 16. Form 10-K Summary
 
Not Applicable.
43
INDEX T O THE CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS AND SCHEDULE III
 
 Page
Number
Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P .:  
Reports of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 45
Prologis, Inc.:  
Consolidated Balance Sheets 48
Consolidated Statements of Income 49
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 50
Consolidated Statements of Equity 51
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 52
Prologis, L.P .:  
Consolidated Balance Sheets 53
Consolidated Statements of Income 54
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 55
Consolidated Statements of Capital 56
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 57
Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P .:  
Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements 58
     Note 1. Description of the Business 58
     Note 2. Summary of Significant Accounting Policies 58
     Note 3. DCT  Transaction 65
     Note 4. Real Estate 66
     Note 5. Unconsolidated Entities 68
     Note 6. Assets Held for Sale or Contribution 70
     Note 7. Other Assets and Other Liabilities 70
     Note 8. Debt 71
     Note 9. Stockholders' Equity of Prologis, Inc. 74
     Note 10. Partners' Capital of Prologis, L.P . 76
     Note 11. Noncontrolling Interests 76
     Note 12. Long-T erm Compensation 77
     Note 13. Income Taxes 80
     Note 14. Earnings Per Common Share or Unit 81
     Note 15. Financial Instruments and Fair V alue Measurements 82
     Note 16. Commitments and Contingencies 86
     Note 17. Business Segments 87
     Note 18. Supplemental Cash Flow Information 89
     Note 19. Selected Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited) 90
Schedule III — Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation 91
 
44
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
 
To the Stockholders and Board of Directors
Prologis, Inc.:
 
Opinion on the Consolidated Financial Statements
 
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Prologis, Inc. and subsidiaries (the Company) as of December
31, 2018 and 2017, the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, equity , and cash flows for each of the
years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2018, and the related notes and financial statement schedule III (collectively , the
consolidated financial statements). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements present fairly , in all material respects, the
financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of
the years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2018, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
 
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the Company’ s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in  Internal
Control – Integrated Framework (2013)  issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission, and our
report dated February 13, 2019 expressed an unqualified opinion on the ef fectiveness of the Company’ s internal control over financial
reporting.
 
Basis for Opinion
 
These consolidated financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’ s management. Our responsibility is to express an
opinion on these consolidated financial statements based on our audits. W e are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB
and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the
applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit
to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to
error or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the consolidated financial
statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included
examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial statements. Our audits also
included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall
presentation of the consolidated financial statements. W e believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
/s/ KPMG LLP
 
We have served as the Company’ s auditor since 2002.
 
Denver , Colorado
February 13, 2019
45
REPORT OF INDEP ENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
 
To the Partners
Prologis, L.P .:
 
Opinion on the Consolidated Financial Statements
 
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Prologis, L.P . and subsidiaries (the Company) as of December
31, 2018 and 2017, the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, capital, and cash flows for each of the
years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2018, and the related notes to the consolidated financial statements and financial
statement schedule III (collectively , the consolidated financial statements). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements
present fairly , in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2018, in conformity with U.S.
generally accepted accounting principles.
 
Basis for Opinion
 
These consolidated financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’ s management. Our responsibility is to express an
opinion on these consolidated financial statements based on our audits. W e are a public accounting firm registered with the Public
Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in
accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission
and the PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit
to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to
error or fraud. The Company is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial
reporting. As part of our audits, we are required to obtain an understanding of internal control over financial reporting but not for the
purpose of expressing an opinion on the ef fectiveness of the Company’ s internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly , we
express no such opinion.
 
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the consolidated financial statements,
whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test
basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating
the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the
consolidated financial statements. W e believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
/s/ KPMG LLP
 
We have served as the Company’ s auditor since 2002.
 
Denver , Colorado
February 13, 2019
46
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
 
To the Stockholders and Board of Directors
Prologis, Inc.:
 
Opinion on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
 
We have audited Prologis, Inc. and subsidiaries (the Company) internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018,
based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013)  issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations
of the Treadway Commission. In our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, ef fective internal control over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013)  issued by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission.
 
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the consolidated balance sheets of the Company as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related consolidated statements
of income, comprehensive income, equity , and cash flows for each of the years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2018,
and the related notes and financial statement schedule III (collectively , the consolidated financial statements), and our report dated
February 13, 2019 expressed an unqualified opinion on those consolidated financial statements.
 
Basis for Opinion
 
The Company’ s management is responsible for maintaining ef fective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment of
the ef fectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying Management’ s Annual Report on Internal
Control over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’ s internal control over financial reporting
based on our audit. W e are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to
the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and
Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
 
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit
to obtain reasonable assurance about whether ef fective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material
respects. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial
reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating ef fectiveness of
internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audit also included performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in
the circumstances. W e believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
 
A company’ s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of
financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles. A company’ s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the
maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the
company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements
in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only
in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding
prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’ s assets that could have a material ef fect
on the financial statements.
 
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections
of any evaluation of ef fectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in
conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
 
/s/ KPMG LLP
 
Denver , Colorado
February 13, 2019
 
 
47
PROLOGIS, INC.
 
CONSOLIDA TED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands, except per share data)
 
 December 31,  
 2018   2017  
ASSETS        
Investments in real estate properties $34,586,987  $25,838,644 
Less accumulated depreciation  4,656,680   4,059,348 
Net investments in real estate properties  29,930,307   21,779,296 
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities  5,745,294   5,496,450 
Assets held for sale or contribution  622,288   342,060 
Notes receivable backed by real estate  -   34,260 
Net investments in real estate  36,297,889   27,652,066 
        
Cash and cash equivalents  343,856   447,046 
Other assets  1,775,919   1,381,963 
Total assets $38,417,664  $29,481,075 
        
LIABILITIES AND EQUITY        
Liabilities:        
Debt $11,089,815  $9,412,631 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  760,515   702,804 
Other liabilities  766,446   659,899 
Total liabilities  12,616,776   10,775,334 
        
Equity:        
Prologis, Inc. stockholders’ equity:        
Series Q preferred stock at stated liquidation preference of $50 per share; $0.01 par value; 1,379
     shares issued and outstanding and 100,000 preferred shares authorized at December 31, 2018 and 2017  68,948   68,948 
Common stock; $0.01 par value; 629,616 and 532,186 shares issued and outstanding at December 31, 2018
     and 2017, respectively  6,296   5,322 
Additional paid-in capital  25,685,987   19,363,007 
Accumulated other comprehensive loss  (1,084,671)  (901,658)
Distributions in excess of net earnings  (2,378,467)  (2,904,461)
Total Prologis, Inc. stockholders’ equity  22,298,093   15,631,158 
Noncontrolling interests  3,502,795   3,074,583 
Total equity  25,800,888   18,705,741 
Total liabilities and equity $38,417,664  $29,481,075
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
48
PROLOGIS, INC.
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF INCOME
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Revenues:             
Rental  $1,858,889  $1,737,839  $1,734,844 
Rental recoveries   529,902   487,302   485,565 
Strategic capital   406,300   373,889   303,562 
Development management and other   9,358   19,104   9,164 
Total revenues   2,804,449   2,618,134   2,533,135 
Expenses:             
Rental   600,648   569,523   568,870 
Strategic capital   157,040   155,141   128,506 
General and administrative   238,985   231,059   222,067 
Depreciation and amortization   947,214   879,140   930,985 
Other   13,560   12,205   14,329 
Total expenses   1,957,447   1,847,068   1,864,757 
             
Operating income   847,002   771,066   668,378 
             
Other income (expense):             
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   298,260   248,567   206,307 
Interest expense   (229,141)  (274,486)  (303,146)
Interest and other income, net   14,663   13,731   8,101 
Gains on real estate transactions, net   840,996   1,182,965   757,398 
Foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net   117,096   (57,896)  7,582 
Gains (losses) on early extinguishment of debt, net   (2,586)  (68,379)  2,484 
Total other income   1,039,288   1,044,502   678,726 
Earnings before income taxes   1,886,290   1,815,568   1,347,104 
Total income tax expense   63,330   54,609   54,564 
Consolidated net earnings   1,822,960   1,760,959   1,292,540 
Less net earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests   173,599   108,634   82,608 
Net earnings attributable to controlling interests   1,649,361   1,652,325   1,209,932 
Less preferred stock dividends   5,935   6,499   6,714 
Loss on preferred stock repurchase   -   3,895   - 
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders  $1,643,426  $1,641,931  $1,203,218 
             
Weighted average common shares outstanding – Basic   567,367   530,400   526,103 
Weighted average common shares outstanding – Diluted   590,239   552,300   546,666 
             
Net earnings per share attributable to common stockholders – Basic  $ 2.90  $ 3.10  $ 2.29 
             
Net earnings per share attributable to common stockholders – Diluted  $ 2.87  $ 3.06  $ 2.27 
             
Dividends per common share  $ 1.92  $ 1.76  $ 1.68
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
 
 
49
PROLOGIS, INC.
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(In thousands )
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Consolidated net earnings  $ 1,822,960  $ 1,760,959  $ 1,292,540 
Other comprehensive income (loss):             
Foreign currency translation gains (losses), net   (190,590)  63,455   (135,958)
Unrealized gains (losses) on derivative contracts, net   (1,323)  22,591   (1,349)
Comprehensive income   1,631,047   1,847,005   1,155,233 
Net earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests   (173,599)  (108,634)  (82,608)
Other comprehensive loss (income) attributable to noncontrolling interests   8,900   (50,231)  (8,737)
Comprehensive income attributable to common stockholders  $ 1,466,348  $ 1,688,140  $ 1,063,888
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
50
PROLOGIS, INC.
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF EQUITY
(In thousands)
 
     Common Stock      Accumulated  Distributions         
     Number      Additional  Other   in Excess of  Non-     
 Preferred  of   Par  Paid-in  Comprehensive  Net   controlling  Total 
 Stock  Shares  Value  Capital  Income (Loss)  Earnings  Interests  Equity 
Balance at January 1, 2016$78,235   524,512  $5,245  $19,302,367  $ (791,429) $(3,926,483) $3,752,901  $18,420,836 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   -   -   1,209,932   82,608   1,292,540 
Effect of equity compensation
     plans  -   2,282   23   91,191   -   -   26,483   117,697 
Issuance of units related to
     acquisitions  -   -   -   -   -   -   3,162   3,162 
Conversion of noncontrolling
     interests  -   1,877   19   52,237   -   -   (52,256)  - 
Foreign currency translation
     gains (losses), net  -   -   -   -   (144,730)  -   8,772   (135,958)
Unrealized losses on
derivative
     contracts, net  -   -   -   -   (1,314)  -   (35)  (1,349)
Reallocation of equity  -   -   -   8,657   -   -   (8,657)  - 
Distributions and other  -   -   -   587   -   (893,456)  (345,919)  (1,238,788)
Balance at December 31,
2016 $78,235   528,671  $5,287  $19,455,039  $ (937,473) $(3,610,007) $3,467,059  $18,458,140 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   -   -   1,652,325   108,634   1,760,959 
Effect of equity compensation
     plans  -   2,000   20   74,506   -   -   41,446   115,972 
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   254,214   254,214 
Repurchase of preferred stock (9,287)  -   -   -   -   (3,895)  -   (13,182)
Purchase of noncontrolling
     interests  -   -   -   (202,040)  -   -   (611,807)  (813,847)
Conversion of noncontrolling
     interests  -   1,515   15   47,711   -   -   (47,726)  - 
Foreign currency translation
     gains, net  -   -   -   -   13,810   -   49,645   63,455 
Unrealized gains on derivative
     contracts, net  -   -   -   -   22,005   -   586   22,591 
Reallocation of equity  -   -   -   (12,143)  -   -   12,143   - 
Distributions and other  -   -   -   (66)  -   (942,884)  (199,611)  (1,142,561)
Balance at December 31,
2017 $68,948   532,186  $5,322  $19,363,007  $ (901,658) $(2,904,461) $3,074,583  $18,705,741 
Consolidated net earnings  -   -   -   -   -   1,649,361   173,599   1,822,960 
Effect of equity compensation
     plans  -   1,251   12   33,544   -   -   52,219   85,775 
DCT Transaction, net of
     issuance costs  -   96,179   962   6,321,667   -   -   298,092   6,620,721 
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   181,866   181,866 
Redemption of noncontrolling
     interests  -   -   -   (11,257)  -   -   (64,663)  (75,920)
Foreign currency translation
     losses, net  -   -   -   -   (181,728)  -   (8,862)  (190,590)
Unrealized losses on
derivative
     contracts, net  -   -   -   -   (1,285)  -   (38)  (1,323)
Reallocation of equity  -   -   -   (20,849)  -   -   20,849   - 
Distributions and other  -   -   -   (125)  -   (1,123,367)  (224,850)  (1,348,342)
Balance at December 31,
2018 $68,948   629,616  $6,296  $25,685,987  $ (1,084,671) $(2,378,467) $3,502,795  $25,800,888
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
51
PROLOGIS, INC.
 
CONSOLI DATED ST ATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In thousands)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Operating activities:             
Consolidated net earnings  $1,822,960  $1,760,959  $1,292,540 
Adjustments to reconcile net earnings to net cash provided by operating activities:             
Straight-lined rents and amortization of above and below market leases   (66,938)  (81,021)  (93,608)
Equity-based compensation awards   76,093   76,640   60,341 
Depreciation and amortization   947,214   879,140   930,985 
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   (298,260)  (248,567)  (206,307)
Operating distributions from unconsolidated entities   349,877   307,220   286,651 
Decrease (increase) in operating receivables from unconsolidated entities   (39,890)  (30,893)  14,823 
Amortization of debt discounts (premiums), net and debt issuance costs   12,653   751   (15,137)
Gains on real estate transactions, net   (840,996)  (1,182,965)  (757,398)
Unrealized foreign currency and derivative losses (gains), net   (120,358)  68,956   (8,052)
Losses (gains) on early extinguishment of debt, net   2,586   68,379   (2,484)
Deferred income tax expense (benefit)   1,448   (5,005)  (5,525)
Decrease (increase) in accounts receivable and other assets   (72,955)  37,278   (106,337)
Increase in accounts payable and accrued expenses and other liabilities   30,125   36,374   26,513 
Net cash provided by operating activities   1,803,559   1,687,246   1,417,005 
Investing activities:             
Real estate development   (1,953,144)  (1,606,133)  (1,641,560)
DCT Transaction, net of cash acquired   (45,870)  -   - 
Real estate acquisitions   (999,131)  (442,696)  (458,516)
Tenant improvements and lease commissions on previously leased space   (134,868)  (153,255)  (165,933)
Property improvements   (93,073)  (110,635)  (101,677)
Proceeds from dispositions and contributions of real estate properties   2,310,388   3,236,603   2,826,408 
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities   (160,358)  (249,735)  (265,951)
Acquisition of a controlling interest in unconsolidated entities, net of cash received   -   (374,605)  - 
Return of investment from unconsolidated entities   360,278   209,151   776,550 
Proceeds from repayment of notes receivable backed by real estate   34,260   32,100   202,950 
Proceeds from the settlement of net investment hedges   29,425   7,541   79,767 
Payments on the settlement of net investment hedges   (11,703)  (5,058)  - 
Net cash provided by (used in) investing activities   (663,796)  543,278   1,252,038 
Financing activities:             
Proceeds from issuance of common stock   6,891   32,858   39,470 
Dividends paid on common and preferred stock   (1,123,367)  (942,884)  (893,455)
Repurchase of preferred stock   -   (13,182)  - 
Noncontrolling interests contributions   170,066   240,925   2,168 
Noncontrolling interests distributions   (224,850)  (207,788)  (343,550)
Settlement of noncontrolling interests   (75,920)  (813,847)  (3,083)
Tax paid for shares withheld   (26,508)  (19,775)  (8,570)
Debt and equity issuance costs paid   (17,446)  (7,054)  (20,123)
Net proceeds from (payments on) credit facilities   (674,559)  283,255   33,435 
Repurchase of and payments on debt   (4,166,088)  (3,578,889)  (2,301,647)
Proceeds from the issuance of debt   4,899,680   2,419,797   1,369,890 
Net cash used in financing activities   (1,232,101)  (2,606,584)  (2,125,465)
             
Effect of foreign currency exchange rate changes on cash   (10,852)  15,790   (342)
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents   (103,190)  (360,270)  543,236 
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of year   447,046   807,316   264,080 
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year  $ 343,856  $ 447,046  $ 807,316
 
 
See Note 18 for information on noncash investing and financing activities and other information.
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
52
PROLOGIS, L.P .
 
CONSOLI DATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands)
 
 December 31,  
 2018   2017  
ASSETS        
Investments in real estate properties $ 34,586,987  $ 25,838,644 
Less accumulated depreciation  4,656,680   4,059,348 
Net investments in real estate properties  29,930,307   21,779,296 
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities  5,745,294   5,496,450 
Assets held for sale or contribution  622,288   342,060 
Notes receivable backed by real estate  -   34,260 
Net investments in real estate  36,297,889   27,652,066 
        
Cash and cash equivalents  343,856   447,046 
Other assets  1,775,919   1,381,963 
Total assets $ 38,417,664  $ 29,481,075 
        
LIABILITIES AND CAPITAL        
Liabilities:        
Debt $ 11,089,815  $ 9,412,631 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses  760,515   702,804 
Other liabilities  766,446   659,899 
Total liabilities  12,616,776   10,775,334 
        
Capital:        
Partners’ capital:        
General partner – preferred  68,948   68,948 
General partner – common  22,229,145   15,562,210 
Limited partners – common  371,281   165,401 
Limited partners – Class A common  295,045   248,940 
Total partners’ capital  22,964,419   16,045,499 
Noncontrolling interests  2,836,469   2,660,242 
Total capital  25,800,888   18,705,741 
Total liabilities and capital $ 38,417,664  $ 29,481,075
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
53
PROLOGIS, L.P .
 
CONSOL IDATED ST ATEMENTS OF INCOME
(In thousands, except per unit amounts)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Revenues:             
Rental  $1,858,889  $1,737,839  $1,734,844 
Rental recoveries   529,902   487,302   485,565 
Strategic capital   406,300   373,889   303,562 
Development management and other   9,358   19,104   9,164 
Total revenues   2,804,449   2,618,134   2,533,135 
Expenses:             
Rental   600,648   569,523   568,870 
Strategic capital   157,040   155,141   128,506 
General and administrative   238,985   231,059   222,067 
Depreciation and amortization   947,214   879,140   930,985 
Other   13,560   12,205   14,329 
Total expenses   1,957,447   1,847,068   1,864,757 
             
Operating income   847,002   771,066   668,378 
             
Other income (expense):             
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   298,260   248,567   206,307 
Interest expense   (229,141)  (274,486)  (303,146)
Interest and other income, net   14,663   13,731   8,101 
Gains on real estate transactions, net   840,996   1,182,965   757,398 
Foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net   117,096   (57,896)  7,582 
Gains (losses) on early extinguishment of debt, net   (2,586)  (68,379)  2,484 
Total other income   1,039,288   1,044,502   678,726 
Earnings before income taxes   1,886,290   1,815,568   1,347,104 
Total income tax expense   63,330   54,609   54,564 
Consolidated net earnings   1,822,960   1,760,959   1,292,540 
Less net earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests   124,712   63,620   48,307 
Net earnings attributable to controlling interests   1,698,248   1,697,339   1,244,233 
Less preferred unit distributions   5,935   6,499   6,714 
Loss on preferred unit repurchase   -   3,895   - 
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders  $1,692,313  $1,686,945  $1,237,519 
             
Weighted average common units outstanding – Basic   575,798   536,335   532,326 
Weighted average common units outstanding – Diluted   590,239   552,300   546,666 
             
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders – Basic  $ 2.90  $ 3.10  $ 2.29 
             
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders – Diluted  $ 2.87  $ 3.06  $ 2.27 
             
Distributions per common unit  $ 1.92  $ 1.76  $ 1.68
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
 
 
54
PROLOGIS, L.P .
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(In thousands)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Consolidated net earnings  $ 1,822,960  $ 1,760,959  $ 1,292,540 
Other comprehensive income (loss):             
Foreign currency translation gains (losses), net   (190,590)  63,455   (135,958)
Unrealized gains (losses) on derivative contracts, net   (1,323)  22,591   (1,349)
Comprehensive income   1,631,047   1,847,005   1,155,233 
Net earnings attributable to noncontrolling interests   (124,712)  (63,620)  (48,307)
Other comprehensive loss (income) attributable to noncontrolling interests   3,416   (49,278)  (12,601)
Comprehensive income attributable to common unitholders  $ 1,509,751  $ 1,734,107  $ 1,094,325
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
55
PROLOGIS, L.P .
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF CAPIT AL
(In thousands)
 
 General Partner   Limited Partners   Non-     
 Preferred   Common   Common   Class A Common  controlling     
 Units  Amount  Units  Amount  Units  Amount  Units  Amount  Interests  Total 
Balance at January 1,
2016  1,565  $78,235   524,512  $14,589,700   6,711  $186,683   8,894  $245,991  $3,320,227  $18,420,836 
Consolidated net earnings -   -   -   1,209,932   -   14,232   -   20,069   48,307   1,292,540 
Effect of equity
compensation
     plans  -   -   2,282   91,214   440   26,483   -   -   -   117,697 
Issuance of units related
to
     acquisitions  -   -   -   -   71   3,162   -   -   -   3,162 
Conversion of limited
partners units  -   -   1,877   52,256   (1,877)  (52,256)  -   -   -   - 
Foreign currency
translation
     gains (losses), net  -   -   -   (144,730)  -   (1,457)  -   (2,372)  12,601   (135,958)
Unrealized losses on
      derivative contracts,
net  -   -   -   (1,314)  -   (13)  -   (22)  -   (1,349)
Reallocation of capital  -   -   -   8,657   -   (12,414)  -   3,757   -   - 
Distributions and other  -   -   -   (892,869)  (22)  (14,247)  -   (23,006)  (308,666)  (1,238,788)
Balance at December 31,
2016  1,565  $78,235   528,671  $14,912,846   5,323  $150,173   8,894  $244,417  $3,072,469  $18,458,140 
Consolidated net earnings -   -   -   1,652,325   -   18,372   -   26,642   63,620   1,760,959 
Effect of equity
compensation
     plans  -   -   2,000   74,526   1,386   41,446   -   -   -   115,972 
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   -   -   254,214   254,214 
Repurchase of preferred
units  (186)  (9,287)  -   (3,895)  -   -   -   -   -   (13,182)
Purchase of noncontrolling
     interests  -   -   -   (202,040)  -   -   -   -   (587,976)  (790,016)
Redemption of limited
partnership
     units  -   -   -   -   (369)  (23,831)  -   -   -   (23,831)
Conversion of limited
partners units  -   -   1,515   47,726   (684)  (18,753)  -   -   (28,973)  - 
Foreign currency
translation
     gains, net  -   -   -   13,810   -   146   -   221   49,278   63,455 
Unrealized gains on
      derivative contracts,
net  -   -   -   22,005   -   234   -   352   -   22,591 
Reallocation of capital  -   -   -   (12,143)  -   11,829   -   314   -   - 
Distributions and other  -   -   -   (942,950)  -   (14,215)  -   (23,006)  (162,390)  (1,142,561)
Balance at December 31,
2017  1,379  $68,948   532,186  $15,562,210   5,656  $165,401   8,894  $248,940  $2,660,242  $18,705,741 
Consolidated net earnings -   -   -   1,649,361   -   24,422   -   24,465   124,712   1,822,960 
Effect of equity
compensation
     plans  -   -   1,251   33,556   2,087   52,219   -   -   -   85,775 
DCT Transaction, net of
     issuance costs  -   -   96,179   6,322,629   3,551   233,472   -   -   64,620   6,620,721 
Capital contributions  -   -   -   -   -   -   -   -   181,866   181,866 
Redemption of
noncontrolling
     interests  -   -   -   (11,257)  -   -   -   -   (11,471)  (22,728)
Redemption of limited
     partnership units  -   -   -   -   (778)  (50,390)  (45)  (2,802)  -   (53,192)
Foreign currency
translation
     losses, net  -   -   -   (181,728)  -   (3,035)  -   (2,411)  (3,416)  (190,590)
Unrealized losses on
     derivative contracts,
net  -   -   -   (1,285)  -   (21)  -   (17)  -   (1,323)
Reallocation of capital  -   -   -   (20,849)  -   (28,969)  -   49,818   -   - 
Distributions and other  -   -   -   (1,123,492)  -   (21,818)  -   (22,948)  (180,084)  (1,348,342)
Balance at December 31,
2018  1,379  $68,948   629,616  $22,229,145   10,516  $371,281   8,849  $295,045  $2,836,469  $25,800,888
 
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
56
PROLOGIS, L.P
 
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In thousands)
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
  2018   2017   2016  
Operating activities:             
Consolidated net earnings  $1,822,960  $1,760,959  $1,292,540 
Adjustments to reconcile net earnings to net cash provided by operating activities:             
Straight-lined rents and amortization of above and below market leases   (66,938)  (81,021)  (93,608)
Equity-based compensation awards   76,093   76,640   60,341 
Depreciation and amortization   947,214   879,140   930,985 
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   (298,260)  (248,567)  (206,307)
Operating distributions from unconsolidated entities   349,877   307,220   286,651 
Decrease (increase) in operating receivables from unconsolidated entities   (39,890)  (30,893)  14,823 
Amortization of debt discounts (premiums), net and debt issuance costs   12,653   751   (15,137)
Gains on real estate transactions, net   (840,996)  (1,182,965)  (757,398)
Unrealized foreign currency and derivative losses (gains), net   (120,358)  68,956   (8,052)
Losses (gains) on early extinguishment of debt, net   2,586   68,379   (2,484)
Deferred income tax expense (benefit)   1,448   (5,005)  (5,525)
Decrease (increase) in accounts receivable and other assets   (72,955)  37,278   (106,337)
Increase in accounts payable and accrued expenses and other liabilities   30,125   36,374   26,513 
Net cash provided by operating activities   1,803,559   1,687,246   1,417,005 
Investing activities:             
Real estate development   (1,953,144)  (1,606,133)  (1,641,560)
DCT Transaction, net of cash acquired   (45,870)  -   - 
Real estate acquisitions   (999,131)  (442,696)  (458,516)
Tenant improvements and lease commissions on previously leased space   (134,868)  (153,255)  (165,933)
Property improvements   (93,073)  (110,635)  (101,677)
Proceeds from dispositions and contributions of real estate properties   2,310,388   3,236,603   2,826,408 
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities   (160,358)  (249,735)  (265,951)
Acquisition of a controlling interest in unconsolidated entities, net of cash received   -   (374,605)  - 
Return of investment from unconsolidated entities   360,278   209,151   776,550 
Proceeds from repayment of notes receivable backed by real estate   34,260   32,100   202,950 
Proceeds from the settlement of net investment hedges   29,425   7,541   79,767 
Payments on the settlement of net investment hedges   (11,703)  (5,058)  - 
Net cash provided by (used in) investing activities   (663,796)  543,278   1,252,038 
Financing activities:             
Proceeds from issuance of common partnership units in exchange for contributions from
     Prologis, Inc.   6,891   32,858   39,470 
Distributions paid on common and preferred units   (1,168,133)  (980,105)  (931,559)
Repurchase of preferred units   -   (13,182)  - 
Noncontrolling interests contributions   170,066   240,925   2,168 
Noncontrolling interests distributions   (180,084)  (170,567)  (306,297)
Settlement of noncontrolling interests   (22,728)  (790,016)  (2,232)
Redemption of common limited partnership units   (53,192)  (23,831)  - 
Tax paid for shares of the Parent withheld   (26,508)  (19,775)  (8,570)
Debt and equity issuance costs paid   (17,446)  (7,054)  (20,123)
Net proceeds from (payments on) credit facilities   (674,559)  283,255   33,435 
Repurchase of and payments on debt   (4,166,088)  (3,578,889)  (2,301,647)
Proceeds from the issuance of debt   4,899,680   2,419,797   1,369,890 
Net cash used in financing activities   (1,232,101)  (2,606,584)  (2,125,465)
             
Effect of foreign currency exchange rate changes on cash   (10,852)  15,790   (342)
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents   (103,190)  (360,270)  543,236 
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of year   447,046   807,316   264,080 
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year  $343,856  $447,046  $807,316
 
 
See Note 18 for information on noncash investing and financing activities and other information.
 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these Consolidated Financial Statements.
 
 
57
 
PROLOGIS, INC. AND PROLOGIS, L.P .
NOTES T O THE CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS
 
NOTE 1. DESCRIPTION OF THE BUSINESS
 
Prologis, Inc. (or the “Parent”) commenced operations as a fully integrated real estate company in 1997, elected to be taxed as a real
estate investment trust (“REIT”) under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the “Internal Revenue Code”), and believes
the current organization and method of operation will enable it to maintain its status as a REIT . The Parent is the general partner of
Prologis, L.P . (or the “Operating Partnership” or “OP”). Through the OP , we are engaged in the ownership, acquisition, development
and management of logistics facilities with a focus on key markets in 19 countries on four continents. W e invest in real estate through
wholly owned subsidiaries and other entities through which we co-invest with partners and investors. W e maintain a significant level of
ownership in these co-investment ventures, which may be consolidated or unconsolidated based on our level of control of the entity .
Our current business strategy consists of two operating business segments: Real Estate Operations and Strategic Capital. Our Real
Estate Operations segment represents the ownership and development of logistics properties. Our Strategic Capital segment
represents the management of unconsolidated co-investment ventures and other unconsolidated entities. See Note 17 for further
discussion of our business segments. Unless otherwise indicated, the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements apply to both
the Parent and the OP . The terms “the Company ,” “Prologis,” “we,” “our” or “us” means the Parent and OP  collectively .
 
For each share of preferred or common stock the Parent issues, the OP  issues a corresponding preferred or common partnership
unit, as applicable, to the Parent in exchange for the contribution of the proceeds from the stock issuance. At December 31, 2018, the
Parent owned a 97.09% common general partnership interest in the OP  and 100% of the preferred units in the OP . The remaining
2.91% common limited partnership interests, which include 8.8 million Class A common limited partnership units (“Class A Units”) in
the OP , are owned by unaf filiated investors and certain current and former directors and of ficers of the Parent. Each partner ’s
percentage interest in the OP  is determined based on the number of OP  units held, including the number of OP  units into which Class
A Units are convertible, compared to total OP  units outstanding at each period end and is used as the basis for the allocation of net
income or loss to each partner . At the end of each reporting period, a capital adjustment is made in the OP  to reflect the appropriate
ownership interest for each of the common unitholders. These adjustments are reflected in the line items Reallocation of Equity  in the
Consolidated Statements of Equity of the Parent and Reallocation of Capital  in the Consolidated Statements of Capital of the OP .
 
As the sole general partner of the OP , the Parent has complete responsibility and discretion in the day-to-day management and
control of the OP  and we operate the Parent and the OP  as one enterprise. The management of the Parent consists of the same
members as the management of the OP . These members are of ficers of the Parent and employees of the OP  or one of its
subsidiaries. As general partner with control of the OP , the Parent is the primary beneficiary and therefore consolidates the OP .
Because the Parent’ s only significant asset is its investment in the OP , the assets and liabilities of the Parent and the OP  are the same
on their respective financial statements.
 
Information with respect to the square footage, number of buildings and acres of land is unaudited.
 
NOTE 2. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
 
Basis of Presentation.  The accompanying Consolidated Financial Statements are prepared in accordance with United States
(“U.S.”) generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”) and are presented in our reporting currency , the U.S. dollar . All material
intercompany transactions with consolidated entities have been eliminated.
 
Consolidation. We consolidate all entities that are wholly owned and those in which we own less than 100% of the equity but control,
as well as any variable interest entities (“VIEs”) in which we are the primary beneficiary . We evaluate our ability to control an entity and
whether the entity is a VIE and we are the primary beneficiary through consideration of substantive terms of the arrangement to
identify which enterprise has the power to direct the activities of the entity that most significantly impacts the entity’ s economic
performance and the obligation to absorb losses and the right to receive benefits from the entity .
 
For entities that are not defined as VIEs, we first consider whether we are the general partner or the limited partner (or the equivalent
in such investments that are not structured as partnerships). W e consolidate entities in which we are the general partner and the
limited partners in such entities that do not have rights that would preclude control. For entities in which we are the general partner but
do not control the entity as the other partners hold substantive participating or kick-out rights, we apply the equity method of
accounting since, as the general partner , we have the ability to exercise significant influence over the operating and financial policies
of the venture. For ventures for which we are a limited partner or our investment is in an entity that is not structured similar to a
partnership, we consider factors such as ownership interest, voting control, authority to make decisions and contractual and
substantive participating rights of the partners. In instances where the factors indicate that we have a controlling financial interest in
the venture, we consolidate the entity .
 
 
Reclassifications.  Certain amounts included in the Consolidated Financial Statements for 2016 have been reclassified to conform to
the 2018 financial statement presentation.
 
Use of Estimates.  GAAP  requires us to make estimates and assumptions that af fect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities,
disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements, and revenues and expenses during the reporting
period. Although we believe the assumptions and estimates we made are reasonable and appropriate, as discussed in the applicable
58
 
sections throughout the Consolidate d Financial Statements, dif ferent assumptions and estimates could materially impact our reported
results.
 
Foreign Operations.  The U.S. dollar is the functional currency for our consolidated subsidiaries and unconsolidated entities operating
in the U.S. and Mexico and certain of our consolidated subsidiaries that operate as holding companies for foreign investments. The
functional currency for our consolidated subsidiaries and unconsolidated entities operating in other countries is the principal currency
in which the entity’ s assets, liabilities, income and expenses are denominated, which may be dif ferent from the local currency of the
country of incorporation or where the entity conducts its operations. The functional currencies of entities outside of the U.S. and
Mexico generally include the Brazilian real, British pound sterling, Canadian dollar , Chinese yuan, euro, Japanese yen and Singapore
dollar . We take part in business transactions denominated in these and other local currencies where we operate.
 
For our consolidated subsidiaries whose functional currency is not the U.S. dollar , we translate their financial statements into the
U.S. dollar at the time we consolidate those subsidiaries’  financial statements. Generally , assets and liabilities are translated at the
exchange rate in ef fect at the balance sheet date. The resulting translation adjustments are included in Accumulated Other
Comprehensive Income (Loss) (“AOCI/L ”) in the Consolidated Balance Sheets. Certain balance sheet items, primarily equity and
capital-related accounts, are reflected at the historical exchange rate. Income statement accounts are translated using the average
exchange rate for the period and income statement accounts that represent significant nonrecurring transactions are translated at the
rate in ef fect at the date of the transaction. W e translate our share of the net income or loss of our unconsolidated entities at the
average exchange rate for the period and significant nonrecurring transactions of the unconsolidated entities are translated at the rate
in effect at the date of the transaction.
 
We and certain of our consolidated subsidiaries have intercompany and third-party debt that is not denominated in the entity’ s
functional currency . When the debt is remeasured against the functional currency of the entity , a gain or loss can result. The resulting
adjustment is reflected in Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net  in the Consolidated Statements of Income, unless it is
intercompany debt that is deemed to be long-term in nature and then the adjustment is reflected as a cumulative translation
adjustment in AOCI/L .
 
Acquisitions.  We apply a screen test to evaluate if substantially all the fair value of the acquired property is concentrated in a single
identifiable asset or group of similar identifiable assets to determine whether a transaction is accounted for as an asset acquisition or
business combination. As most of our real estate acquisitions are concentrated in either a single or a group of similar identifiable
assets, our real estate transactions are generally accounted for as asset acquisitions, which permits the capitalization of transaction
costs to the basis of the acquired property . The transaction costs related to the formation of equity method investments are also
capitalized. For acquisitions prior to January 1, 2017 and those subsequently accounted for as a business combination, transaction
costs were expensed as incurred. For asset acquisitions, the purchase price is allocated to the various components acquired,
including an allocation to the individual buildings, land and lease intangibles on a relative fair value basis. Other monetary assets
acquired and liabilities assumed, including debt, are recorded at fair value. Purchase price allocations for a business combination are
recorded at fair value.
 
When we obtain control of an unconsolidated entity and the acquisition qualifies as a business combination, we account for the
acquisition in accordance with the guidance for a business combination achieved in stages. W e remeasure our previously held
interest in the unconsolidated entity at its acquisition-date fair value and recognize any resulting gain or loss in earnings.
 
We allocate the purchase price using primarily Level 2 and Level 3 inputs (further defined in Fair V alue Measurements below) as
follows:
 
Investments in Real Estate Properties.  We value operating properties as if vacant. W e estimate fair value by applying an income
approach methodology using either a discounted cash flow analysis or applying a capitalization rate to the estimated NOI of a
property . Key assumptions include market rents, growth rates, and discount and capitalization rates. Estimates of future cash flows
are based on a number of factors including historical operating results, known trends and market and economic conditions. W e
determine the discount or capitalization rate by market based on recent transactions and other market data. The fair value of land is
generally based on relevant market data, such as a comparison of the subject site to similar parcels that have recently been sold or
are currently being of fered on the market for sale.
 
Lease Intangibles . We determine the portion of the purchase price related to intangible assets and liabilities as follows:
 
•Above and Below Market Leases . We recognize an asset or liability for acquired in-place leases with favorable or unfavorable
rents based on our estimate of current market rents of the applicable markets. The value is recorded in either Other Assets  or
Other Liabilities , as appropriate, and is amortized over the term of the respective leases, including any bargain renewal options,
to rental revenues.
 
•Foregone Rent . We calculate the value of the revenue and recovery of costs foregone during a reasonable lease-up period, as if
the space was vacant, in each of the applicable markets. The values are recorded in Other Assets  and amortized over the
remaining life of the respective leases to amortization expense.
 
•Leasing Commissions.  We recognize an asset for leasing commissions upon the acquisition of in-place leases based on our
estimate of the cost to lease space in the applicable markets. The value is recorded in Other Assets and amortized over the
remaining life of the respective leases to amortization expense.
59
 
 
Debt . We estimate the fair value of debt based on contractual future cash flows discounted using borrowing spreads and market
interest rates that would be available to us for the issuance of debt with similar terms and remaining maturities. In the case of publicly
traded debt, we estimate the fair value based on available market data. Any discount or premium to the principal amount is included in
the carrying value and amortized to interest expense over the remaining term of the related debt using the ef fective interest method.
 
Noncontrolling Interests . We estimate the portion of the fair value of the net assets owned by third parties based on the fair value of
the consolidated net assets, principally real estate properties and debt.
 
Working Capital . We estimate the fair value of other acquired assets and assumed liabilities on the best information available.
 
Fair V alue Measurements.  The objective of fair value is to determine the price that would be received on the sale of an asset or paid
to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date (the exit price). W e estimate fair
value using available market information and valuation methodologies we believe to be appropriate for these purposes. Considerable
judgment and a high degree of subjectivity are involved in developing these estimates and, accordingly , they are not necessarily
indicative of amounts that we would realize on disposition. The fair value hierarchy consists of three broad levels:
 
•Level 1 — Quoted prices (unadjusted) in active markets for identical assets or liabilities that the entity can access at the
measurement date.
 
•Level 2 — Inputs other than quoted prices included within Level 1 that are observable for the asset or liability , either directly or
indirectly .
 
•Level 3 — Unobservable inputs for the asset or liability .
 
Fair V alue Measurements on a Recurring Basis. We estimate the fair value of our financial instruments using available market
information and valuation methodologies we believe to be appropriate for these purposes.
 
We determine the fair value of our derivative financial instruments using widely accepted valuation techniques including discounted
cash flow analysis on the expected cash flows of each derivative. This analysis reflects the contractual terms of the derivatives,
including the period to maturity , and uses observable market-based inputs, including interest rate curves, foreign exchange rates and
implied volatilities. W e determine the fair values of our interest rate swaps using the market standard methodology of netting the
discounted future fixed cash receipts or payments and the discounted expected variable cash payments. W e base the variable cash
payments on an expectation of future interest rates, or forward curves, derived from observable market interest rate curves. W e base
the fair values of our net investment hedges on the change in the spot rate at the end of the period as compared with the strike price
at inception.
 
We incorporate credit valuation adjustments to appropriately reflect nonperformance risk for us and the respective counterparty in the
fair value measurements. In adjusting the fair value of our derivative contracts for the ef fect of nonperformance risk, we consider the
impact of netting and any applicable credit enhancements, such as collateral postings, thresholds, mutual puts and guarantees.
 
We have determined that the majority of the inputs used to value our derivatives fall within Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy . Although
the credit valuation adjustments associated with our derivatives utilize Level 3 inputs, such as estimates of current credit spreads to
evaluate the likelihood of default by us and our counterparties, we assess the significance of the impact of the credit valuation
adjustments on the overall valuation of our derivative positions and have determined that the credit valuation adjustments are not
significant to the overall valuation of our derivatives.
 
Fair V alue Measurements on a Nonrecurring Basis. Assets measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis generally consist of real
estate assets and investments in unconsolidated entities that were subject to impairment charges related to our change of intent to
sell the investments and through our recoverability analysis discussed below . We estimate fair value based on expected sales prices
in the market (Level 2) or by applying the income approach methodology using a discounted cash flow analysis (Level 3).
 
Fair V alue of Financial Instruments. We estimate the fair value of our senior notes for disclosure purposes based on quoted market
prices for the same (Level 1) or similar (Level 2) issues when current quoted market prices are available. W e estimate the fair value of
our credit facilities, term loans, secured mortgage debt and assessment bonds by discounting the future cash flows using rates and
borrowing spreads currently available to us (Level 3).
 
Real Estate Assets.  Real estate assets are carried at depreciated cost. W e capitalize costs incurred in developing, renovating,
rehabilitating and improving real estate assets as part of the investment basis. W e expense costs for repairs and maintenance as
incurred.
 
Depreciation and Amortization. We charge the depreciable portions of real estate assets to depreciation expense on a straight-line
basis over the respective estimated useful lives. Depreciation on development buildings commences when the asset is ready for its
intended use, which we define as the earlier of stabilization (90% occupied) or one year after completion of construction. W e generally
use the following useful lives: 5 to 7 years for capital improvements, 10 years for standard tenant improvements, 25 years for
depreciable land improvements, 30 years for operating properties acquired and  40 years for operating properties we develop. W e
depreciate building improvements on land parcels subject to ground leases over the shorter of the estimated building improvement life
60
 
or the contractual term of the underlying ground lease. Capitalized leasing costs are amortiz ed over the estimated remaining lease
term. Our weighted ave rage lease term on leases commenced  during 2018, based on square feet for all leases, was 64 months.
 
Capitalization of Costs. During the land development and construction periods of qualifying projects, we capitalize interest costs,
insurance, real estate taxes and general and administrative costs of the personnel performing the development, renovation and
rehabilitation; if such costs are incremental and identifiable to a specific activity to ready the asset for its intended use. W e capitalize
transaction costs related to the acquisition of land for future development and operating properties that qualify as asset acquisitions.
We capitalize costs incurred to successfully originate a lease that result directly from and are essential to acquire that lease, including
internal costs that are incremental and identifiable as leasing activities. Leasing costs that meet the requirements for capitalization are
presented as a component of Other Assets  and all other capitalized costs are included in the investment basis of the real estate
assets. Beginning January 1, 2019, we will no longer capitalize internal leasing costs.
 
Recoverability of Real Estate Assets. We assess the carrying values of our respective real estate assets, whenever events or changes
in circumstances indicate that the carrying amounts of these assets may not be fully recoverable. W e measure the recoverability of
the asset by comparing the carrying amount of the asset to the estimated future undiscounted cash flows. If our analysis indicates that
the carrying value of the real estate property is not recoverable on an undiscounted cash flow basis, we recognize an impairment
charge for the amount by which the carrying value exceeds the current estimated fair value of the real estate property .
 
We estimate the future undiscounted cash flows and fair value based on our intent as follows:
 
•for real estate properties that we intend to hold long-term; including land held for development, properties currently under
development and operating properties; recoverability is assessed based on the estimated undiscounted future net rental income
from operating the property and the terminal value, including anticipated costs to develop;
 
•for real estate properties we intend to sell, including properties currently under development and operating properties;
recoverability is assessed based on proceeds from disposition that are estimated based on future net rental income of the
property , expected market capitalization rates and anticipated costs to develop;
 
•for land parcels we intend to sell, recoverability is assessed based on estimated proceeds from disposition; and
 
•for costs incurred related to the potential acquisition of land, operating properties or development of a real estate property ,
recoverability is assessed based on the probability that the acquisition or development is likely to occur at the measurement date.
 
Assets Held for Sale or Contribution.  We classify a property as held for sale or contribution when certain criteria are met in
accordance with GAAP . Assets classified as held for sale are expected to be sold to a third party and assets classified as held for
contribution are newly developed assets we intend to contribute to an unconsolidated co-investment venture or to a third party within
twelve months. At such time, the respective assets and liabilities are presented separately in the Consolidated Balance Sheets and
depreciation is no longer recognized. Assets held for sale or contribution are reported at the lower of their carrying amount or their
estimated fair value less the costs to sell.
 
Investments in Unconsolidated Entities.  We present our investments in certain entities under the equity method. W e use the equity
method when we have the ability to exercise significant influence over operating and financial policies of the venture but do not have
control of the entity . Under the equity method, we initially recognize these investments (including advances) in the balance sheet at
our cost, including formation costs and net of deferred gains from the contribution of properties, if applicable. W e subsequently adjust
the accounts to reflect our proportionate share of net earnings or losses recognized and accumulated other comprehensive income or
loss, distributions received, contributions made and certain other adjustments, as appropriate. When circumstances indicate there
may have been a reduction in the value of an equity investment, we evaluate whether the loss in value is other than temporary . If we
conclude it is other than temporary , we recognize an impairment charge to reflect the equity investment at fair value.
 
With regard to distributions from unconsolidated entities, we have elected the nature of distribution approach as the information is
available to us to determine the nature of the underlying activity that generated the distributions. In accordance with the nature of
distribution approach, cash flows generated from the operations of an unconsolidated entity are classified as a return on investment
(cash inflow from operating activities) and cash flows that are generated from property sales, debt refinancing or sales of our
investments are classified as a return of investment (cash inflow from investing activities).
 
Cash and Cash Equivalents.  We consider all cash on hand, demand deposits with financial institutions and short-term highly liquid
investments with original maturities of three months or less to be cash equivalents. Our cash and cash equivalents are financial
instruments that are exposed to concentrations of credit risk. W e invest our cash with high-credit quality institutions. Cash balances
may be invested in money market accounts that are not insured. W e have not realized any losses in such cash investments or
accounts and believe that we are not exposed to any significant credit risk.
 
Derivative Financial Instruments. We primarily hedge our foreign currency risk by borrowing in the currencies in which we invest.
Generally , we borrow in the functional currency of our consolidated subsidiaries. W e may use derivative financial instruments, such as
foreign currency forward and option contracts to manage foreign currency exchange rate risk related to both our foreign investments
and the related earnings. In addition, we occasionally use interest rate swap and forward contracts to manage interest rate risk and
limit the impact of future interest rate changes on earnings and cash flows, primarily with variable-rate debt.
 
61
 
We do not use derivative finan cial instruments for trading or speculative purposes. Each derivative transaction is customized and not
exchange-traded. W e recognize all derivatives at fair value within the line items Other Assets  or Other Liabilities . We do not net our
derivative positi on by counterparty for purposes of balance sheet presentation and disclosure. Management reviews our derivative
positions, overall risk management strategy and hedging program, on a regular basis. W e only enter into transactions that we believe
will be hig hly ef fective at of fsetting the underlying risk. Our use of derivatives involves the risk that counterparties may default on a
derivative contract; therefore we: (i) establish exposure limits for each counterparty to minimize this risk and provide counterp arty
diversification; (ii) contract with counterparties that have long-term credit ratings of single-A  or better; (iii) enter into master agreements
that generally allow for netting of certain exposures; thereby significantly reducing the actual loss that would be incurred should a
counterparty fail to perform its contractual obligations; and (iv) set minimum credit standards that become more stringent as the
duration of the derivative financial instrument increases. Based on these factors, we consider the risk of counterparty default to be
minimal.
 
Designated Derivatives. We may choose to designate our derivative financial instruments, generally foreign currency forwards as net
investment hedges in foreign operations or interest rate swaps or foreign currency forwards as cash flow hedges. At inception of the
transaction, we formally designate and document the derivative financial instrument as a hedge of a specific underlying exposure, the
risk management objective and the strategy for undertaking the hedge transaction. W e formally assess both at inception and at least
quarterly thereafter , the ef fectiveness of our hedging transactions. Due to the high degree of ef fectiveness between the hedging
instruments and the underlying exposures hedged, fluctuations in the value of the derivative financial instruments will generally be
offset by changes in the cash flows or fair values of the underlying exposures being hedged.
 
Changes in the fair value of derivatives that are designated and qualify as net investment hedges in foreign operations and cash flow
hedges are recorded in AOCI/L . For net investment hedges, these amounts of fset the translation adjustments on the underlying net
assets of our foreign investments, which we also record in AOCI/L . The inef fective portion of a derivative financial instrument's change
in fair value, if any , is immediately recognized in earnings within the line item Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net in
the Consolidated Statements of Income. For cash flow hedges, we report the ef fective portion of the gain or loss as a component of
AOCI/ L and reclassify it to the applicable line item in the Consolidated Statements of Income, generally Interest Expense , over the
corresponding period of the underlying hedged item. The inef fective portion of a derivative financial instrument’ s change in fair value is
recognized in earnings, generally Interest Expense , at the time the inef fectiveness occurred. To the extent the hedged debt related to
our interest rate swaps and forwards is paid of f early , we write of f the remaining balance in AOCI/L  and recognize the amount in
Interest Expense  in the Consolidated Statements of Income.
 
In addition to the net investment hedges described above, we may issue debt in a currency that is not the same functional currency of
the borrowing entity to hedge our international investments. W e designate the debt and related accrued interest as a nonderivative net
investment hedge to of fset the translation and economic exposures related to our international investments. If the debt and related
accrued interest exceeds the designated amount of our international investment, the foreign currency remeasurement on the
unhedged portion of the debt during the period is recognized in Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net.
 
Undesignated Derivatives.  We also use derivatives, such as foreign currency forwards and option contracts, that are not designated
as hedges to manage foreign currency exchange rate risk related to our results of operations. The changes in fair values of these
derivatives that were not designated or did not qualify as hedging instruments are immediately recognized in earnings within the line
item Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net  in the Consolidated Statements of Income. These gains or losses are
generally of fset by lower or higher earnings as a result in exchange rates that were dif ferent than our expectations.
 
In addition, we may choose to not designate our interest rate swap and forward contracts. If a swap or forward contract is not
designated as a hedge, the changes in fair value of these instruments is immediately recognized in earnings within the line item
Interest Expense  in the Consolidated Statements of Income .
 
Noncontrolling Interests.  Noncontrolling interests represent the share of consolidated entities owned by third parties. W e recognize
each noncontrolling holder ’s respective share of the estimated fair value of the net assets at the date of formation or acquisition.
Noncontrolling interests are subsequently adjusted for the noncontrolling holder ’s share of additional contributions, distributions and
their share of the net earnings or losses of each respective consolidated entity . We allocate net income to noncontrolling interests
based on the weighted average ownership interest during the period. The net income that is not attributable to us is reflected in the
line item Net Earnings Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests . We do not recognize a gain or loss on transactions with a consolidated
entity in which we do not own 100% of the equity , but we reflect the dif ference in cash received or paid from the noncontrolling
interests carrying amount as additional paid-in-capital.
 
Certain limited partnership interests, including OP  units, are exchangeable into our common stock. Common stock issued upon
exchange of a holder ’s noncontrolling interest is accounted for at the carrying value of the surrendered limited partnership interest and
the dif ference between the carrying value and the fair value of the common stock issued is recorded to additional paid-in-capital.
 
Revenue Recognition.
Rental Revenues and Recoveries.  We lease our operating properties to customers under agreements that are classified as operating
leases. W e recognize the total minimum lease payments provided for under the leases on a straight-line basis over the lease term.
Generally , under the terms of our leases, the majority of our rental expenses are recovered from our customers. W e reflect amounts
recovered from customers as revenues in the period that the applicable expenses are incurred. W e make a provision for possible loss
if the collection of a receivable balance is considered doubtful.
 
62
 
Strategic Capital Revenues.  Strategic capital revenues include revenues we ear n from the management services we provide to
unconsolidated entities. These fees are determined in accordance with the terms specific to each arrangement and may include
recurring fees such as property and asset management fees or transactional fees for le asing, acquisition, development, construction,
financing, legal and tax services provided. W e recognize these fees as we provide the services or on a cost basis for development
fees.
 
We may also earn incentive returns (“promotes” or “promote revenues”) based on a venture’ s cumulative returns over a certain time-
period and the returns are determined by both the operating performance and real estate valuation of the venture, including highly
variable inputs such as capitalization rates, market rents, interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates. As these key inputs are
highly volatile and out of our control, and such volatility can materially impact our promotes period over period, we recognize promote
revenues at or near the end of the performance period. W e include the third-party investors’  share of promotes in Strategic Capital
Revenues.
 
We also earn fees from ventures that we consolidate. Upon consolidation, these fees are eliminated from our earnings and the third-
party share of these fees are recognized as a reduction of Net Earnings Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests.
 
Development Management and Other Revenues. Development management and other revenues principally include development and
construction management fees recognized as we provide the services or on a cost basis.
 
Gains on Real Estate T ransactions, Net.  We recognize gains on the disposition of real estate when the recognition criteria have been
met, generally at the time the risks and rewards and title have transferred and we no longer have substantial continuing involvement
with the real estate sold. W e recognize losses from the disposition of real estate when known. W e recognize gains or losses on the
remeasurement of equity investments to fair value upon acquisition of a controlling interest in any of our previously unconsolidated
entities and the transaction is considered the acquisition of a business.
 
Adoption of the new revenue recognition guidance on January 1, 2018 did not impact our recognition of sales to third parties.
Beginning January 1, 2018, we recognize the entire gain attributed to contributions of real estate properties to unconsolidated entities.
We previously recognized a gain on contribution only to the extent of the third-party ownership in the unconsolidated entity acquiring
the property and deferred the portion of the gain related to our ownership through a reduction to our investment in the applicable
unconsolidated entity . We adjusted our proportionate share of net earnings or losses recognized in future periods to reflect the entities’
recorded depreciation expense as if it were computed on our lower basis in the contributed properties rather than on the entity’ s basis.
For deferred gains from partial sales recorded prior to the adoption, we will continue to recognize these gains over the lives of the
underlying real estate properties or at the time of disposition to a third party . If our ownership interest in an unconsolidated entity
decreases and the decrease is expected to be permanent, we recognize the amounts relating to previously deferred gains to coincide
with our new ownership interest.
 
Rental Expenses.  Rental expenses principally include the cost of our property management personnel, utilities, repairs and
maintenance, property insurance, real estate taxes and the other costs of managing the properties.
 
Strategic Capital Expenses.  Strategic capital expenses generally include the direct expenses associated with the asset
management of the unconsolidated co-investment ventures provided by our employees who are assigned to our Strategic Capital
segment and the costs of our Prologis Promote Plan based on earned promotes. In addition, in order to achieve ef ficiencies and
economies of scale, all of our property management functions are provided by property management personnel who are assigned to
our Real Estate Operations segment. These individuals perform the property-level management of the properties in our owned and
managed portfolio, which include properties we consolidate and those we manage that are owned by the unconsolidated co-
investment ventures. W e allocate the costs of our property management to the properties we consolidate (included in Rental
Expenses ) and the properties owned by the unconsolidated co-investment ventures (included in Strategic Capital Expenses ) by using
the square feet owned by the respective portfolios.
 
Equity-Based Compensation.  We account for equity-based compensation by measuring the cost of employee services received in
exchange for an award of an equity instrument based on the fair value of the award on the grant date. W e recognize the cost of the
award on a straight-line basis over the period during which an employee is required to provide service in exchange for the award,
generally the vesting period.
 
Income T axes.  Under the Internal Revenue Code, REIT s are generally not required to pay federal income taxes if they distribute
100% of their taxable income and meet certain income, asset and stockholder tests. If we fail to qualify as a REIT  in any taxable year ,
we will be subject to federal income taxes at regular corporate rates (including any alternative minimum tax) and may not be able to
qualify as a REIT  for the four subsequent taxable years. Even as a REIT , we may be subject to certain foreign, state and local taxes
on our own income and property , and to federal income and excise taxes on our undistributed taxable income.
 
We have elected taxable REIT  subsidiary (“TRS”) status for some of our consolidated subsidiaries. This allows us to provide services
that would otherwise be considered impermissible for REIT s. Many of the foreign countries in which we have operations do not
recognize REIT s or do not accord REIT  status under their respective tax laws to our entities that operate in their jurisdiction. In the
U.S., we are taxed in certain states in which we operate. Accordingly , we recognize income tax expense for the federal and state
income taxes incurred by our TRSs, taxes incurred in certain states and foreign jurisdictions, and interest and penalties associated
with our unrecognized tax benefit liabilities.
 
63
 
We evaluate tax positions taken in the Consolidated Financial Statements under the interpretation for accounting for uncertainty in
income taxes. As a result of this evaluation, we may recognize a tax benef it from an uncertain tax position only if it is more likely than
not that the tax position will be sustained on examination by taxing authorities.
 
We recognize deferred income taxes in certain taxable entities. For federal income tax purposes, certain acquisitions have been
treated as tax-free transactions resulting in a carry-over basis in assets and liabilities. For financial reporting purposes and in
accordance with purchase accounting, we record all of the acquired assets and assumed liabilities at the estimated fair value at the
date of acquisition, as discussed above. For our taxable subsidiaries, including certain international jurisdictions, we recognize the
deferred income tax liabilities that represent the tax ef fect of the dif ference between the tax basis carried over and the fair value of the
tangible and intangible assets at the date of acquisition. Any subsequent increases or decreases to the deferred income tax liability
recorded in connection with these acquisitions, are reflected in earnings.
 
If taxable income is generated in these subsidiaries, we recognize a benefit in earnings as a result of the reversal of the deferred
income tax liability previously recorded at the acquisition date and we record current income tax expense representing the entire
current income tax liability . If the reversal of the deferred income tax liability results from a sale or contribution of assets, the
classification of the reversal to the Consolidated Statements of Income is based on the taxability of the transaction. W e record the
reversal to deferred income tax benefit as a taxable transaction if we dispose of the asset. W e record the reversal as Gains on Real
Estate T ransactions, Net  as a non-taxable transaction if we dispose of the entity that owns the asset.
 
Deferred income tax expense is generally a function of the period’ s temporary dif ferences (items that are treated dif ferently for tax
purposes than for financial reporting purposes) and the utilization of tax net operating losses (“NOL”) generated in prior years that had
been previously recognized as deferred income tax assets. W e provide for a valuation allowance for deferred income tax assets if we
believe all or some portion of the deferred income tax asset may not be realized. Any increase or decrease in the valuation allowance
that results from a change in circumstances that causes a change in the estimated ability to realize the related deferred income tax
asset is included in deferred tax expense.
 
Environmental Costs.  We incur certain environmental remediation costs, including cleanup costs, consulting fees for environmental
studies and investigations, monitoring costs, and legal costs relating to cleanup, litigation defense, and the pursuit of responsible third
parties. W e expense costs incurred in connection with operating properties and properties previously sold. W e capitalize costs related
to undeveloped land as development costs and include any expected future environmental liabilities at the time of acquisition. W e
maintain a liability for the estimated costs of environmental remediation expected to be incurred in connection with undeveloped land,
operating properties and properties previously sold that we adjust as appropriate as information becomes available.
 
New Accounting Pronouncements.
 
New Accounting Standards Adopted
 
Revenue Recognition . In May 2014, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“F ASB”) issued an accounting standard update
(“ASU”) that requires companies to use a five-step model to determine when to recognize revenue from customer contracts in an
effort to increase consistency and comparability throughout global capital markets and across industries. In February 2017, the F ASB
issued an additional ASU that provides the accounting treatment for gains and losses from the derecognition of non-financial assets,
including the accounting for partial sales of real estate properties.
 
We adopted the revenue recognition and derecognition of non-financial assets standard, collectively the “new revenue recognition
standard,” on January 1, 2018, on a modified retrospective basis.
 
Rental revenues and recoveries earned from leasing our operating properties are excluded from this ASU and will be assessed with
the adoption of the lease ASU discussed below . Our evaluation under the new revenue recognition standard included recurring and
transactional fees and promotes earned from our co-investment ventures as well as dispositions and contributions of real estate
properties. There is no change in our recognition of recurring and transactional fees as we will continue to recognize these fees as we
provide the services. As discussed above in our policy on Strategic Capital Revenues , promote revenues are recognized at or near
the end of the performance period.
 
For dispositions of real estate properties to third parties, the ASU did not impact the recognition of the sale. Beginning January 1,
2018, we recognized the entire gain attributed to contributions of real estate properties to unconsolidated entities.
 
We adopted the practical expedient to only assess the recognition of revenue for open contracts during the transition period and there
was no adjustment to the opening balance of retained earnings at January 1, 2018. The comparative information has not been
restated and continues to be reported under the accounting standards in ef fect for that period.
 
New Accounting Standards Issued but not yet Adopted
 
Leases.  In February 2016, the F ASB issued an ASU that provides the principles for the recognition, measurement, presentation and
disclosure of leases. In July 2018, the F ASB issued an additional ASU that provided for targeted improvements to the February 2016
ASU. W e refer to both ASUs collectively as the “new lease standard.”
 
64
 
• As a lessor . The accounting for lessors will remain largely unchanged from current GAAP; however , the new lease standard
requires that lessors expense, on an as-incurred basis, certain init ial direct costs that are not incremental in negotiating a lease.
Under existing standards, these costs are capitalizable and therefore the new lease standard will result in certain of these costs
being expensed as incurred after adoption. During 2018 , 2017 and 2016 , we capitalized $ 21.2 million,  $23.8 million  and $23.9
million , respectively , of internal costs related to our leasing activities.
 
The new lease standard provides lessors a practical expedient to not separate rental recovery revenue from the associated
rental revenue if certain criteria are met. W e assessed these criteria and concluded that the timing and pattern of transfer for
rental recoveries and the associated rental revenue are the same and our leases will continue to qualify as operating leases
under which we will recognize rental revenue, and therefore we will account for and present rental revenue and rental recovery
revenue as a single component.
 
• As a lessee. Under the new lease standard, lessees apply a dual approach, classifying leases as either finance or operating
leases. A lessee is required to record a right-of-use (“ROU”) asset and a lease liability for all leases with a term of greater
than 12 months, regardless of their lease classification. W e are a lessee of ground and of fice space leases. At December 31,
2018 we had approximately 130 ground and of fice space leases that will require us to measure and record both a ROU asset
and lease liability of approximately $400 million on January 1, 2019. W e are finalizing our discount rate analysis which is a key
driver in the measurement of the ROU asset and lease liability . The weighted average remaining lease term for our operating
leases was 27.9 years at December 31, 2018. Details of our future minimum rental payments under ground and of fice space
leases at December 31, 2018 are disclosed in Note 4.
 
We adopted the lease standard on January 1, 2019 and applied it prospectively . We elected the practical expedients available for
implementation and we will not be required to reassess the following and therefore we do not expect an adjustment to the opening
balance of retained earnings: (i) whether an expired or existing contract meets the definition of a lease; (ii) the lease classification at
the adoption date for existing leases; and (iii) whether costs previously capitalized as initial direct costs would continue to be
amortized. This allows us to continue to account for our ground and of fice space leases as operating leases, however , any new or
renewed ground leases may be classified as financing leases unless they meet certain conditions to be considered a lease involving
land owned by a government unit or authority . The new lease standard will also require new disclosures within Form 10-Q for the
quarterly period ended March 31, 2019.
 
Derivatives and Hedging . In August 2017, the F ASB issued an ASU that simplifies the application of hedge accounting guidance in
current GAAP  and improves the reporting of hedging relationships to better portray the economic results of an entity’ s risk
management activities in its consolidated financial statements. Among the simplification updates, the ASU eliminates the requirement
in current GAAP  to separately recognize periodic hedge inef fectiveness. Mismatches between the changes in value of the hedged
item and hedging instrument may still occur but they will no longer be separately reported. The ASU requires the presentation of the
earnings ef fect of the hedging instrument in the same income statement line item in which the earnings ef fect of the hedged item is
reported. W e adopted the ASU on January 1, 2019  on a modified retrospective basis and do not expect an adjustment to the opening
balance of retained earnings.
 
NOTE 3. DCT TRANSACTION
 
On August 22, 2018, DCT  Industrial Trust Inc. (“DCT  Inc.”) merged with and into Prologis, Inc., with Prologis, Inc. surviving the merger
(the “Company Merger”) and immediately prior to the ef fective time of the Company Merger , DCT  Industrial Operating Partnership LP
(“DCT  OP”) merged with and into Prologis, L.P ., with Prologis, L.P . surviving the merger (the “Partnership Merger” and, together with
the Company Merger , the “DCT  Transaction”). The term “DCT” means DCT  Inc. and DCT  OP collectively .
 
The DCT  Transaction was completed for $8.5 billion through the issuance of equity based on the closing price of Prologis’  common
stock on August 21, 2018 and the assumption of debt. In connection with the transaction, each issued and outstanding share or unit
held by a DCT  stockholder or unitholder was converted automatically into 1.02 shares of Prologis common stock or common units of
Prologis, L.P ., respectively , including shares and units under DCT’ s equity incentive plan that became fully vested at closing.  
 
Through the DCT  Transaction, we acquired a portfolio of logistics real estate assets that consisted of 408 operating properties,
aggregating 68.0 million square feet, 10 properties under development, aggregating 2.8 million square feet and 305 acres of land
parcels with build-out potential of 4.5 million square feet.
 
The aggregate equity consideration of approximately $6.6 billion is calculated below (in millions, except price per share):
 
Number of Prologis shares and units issued upon conversion of DCT  shares and units at August 21, 2018  99.73  
Multiplied by price of Prologis' common stock on August 21, 2018 $ 65.75  
Fair value of Prologis shares and units issued $ 6,557
 
 
We accounted for the DCT  Transaction as an asset acquisition and as a result the transaction costs of $50.0 million were capitalized
to the basis of the acquired properties. Transaction costs include investment banker advisory fees, legal fees and other costs.
 
65
 
Under acquisition accounting, the total purchase price was allocated to the DCT  net tangible and identifiable intangible assets
acquired and liabilities assumed based on their relative fair values as follows (in millions ):
 
Net investments in real estate $ 8,362  
Intangible assets, net of intangible liabilities  292 
Cash and other assets  24 
Debt  (1,863 )
Accounts payable, accrued expenses and other liabilities  (143 )
Noncontrolling interests  (65)
Total purchase price, including transaction costs $ 6,607
 
 
NOTE 4. REAL ESTATE
 
Investments in real estate properties consisted of the following at December 31 (dollars and square feet in thousands):
 
 Square Feet   Number of Buildings     
 2018 (1)   2017   2018 (1)   2017   2018 (1)   2017  
Operating properties:                        
Buildings and improvements  354,762    294,811    1,858    1,525   $22,587,267   $16,849,349  
Improved land                  8,044,888    5,735,978  
Development portfolio, including land costs:                        
Prestabilized  8,709    7,345    30   22   828,064    546,173  
Properties under development  27,715    22,216    70   63   1,314,737    1,047,316  
Land (2)                  1,192,220    1,154,383  
Other real estate investments (3)                  619,811    505,445  
Total investments in real estate properties                  34,586,987    25,838,644  
Less accumulated depreciation                  4,656,680    4,059,348  
Net investments in real estate properties                 $29,930,307   $21,779,296
 
 
(1) The portfolio acquired in the DCT  Transaction, excluding 49 operating properties classified as Assets Held for Sale or
Contribution,  was included in investments in real estate at December 31, 2018. See Note 3 for more information.
 
(2) At December 31, 2018 and 2017, our land is comprised of 4,929 and 5,191 acres, respectively .
 
(3) Included in other real estate investments were: (i) land parcels that are ground leased to third parties; (ii) non-logistics real
estate; (iii) our corporate headquarters; (iv) costs related to future development projects, including purchase options on land; (v)
earnest money deposits associated with potential acquisitions; and (vi) infrastructure costs related to projects we are developing
on behalf of others.
 
At December 31, 2018, we owned real estate assets in the U.S. and other Americas (Brazil, Canada and Mexico), Europe (Belgium,
the Czech Republic, France, Germany , Hungary , Italy , the Netherlands, Poland, Slovakia, Spain, Sweden and the United Kingdom
(“U.K.”)) and Asia (China, Japan and Singapore).
 
Acquisitions
 
The following table summarizes our real estate acquisition activity , excluding the DCT  Transaction (as discussed in Note 3), for the
years ended December 31 (dollars and square feet in thousands):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Number of operating properties   20   16   9 
Square feet   4,757    6,859    1,823  
Acquisition value of net investments in real estate properties (1) (2)  $1,008,718   $1,139,410   $411,706
 
 
(1) Value includes the acquisition of 1,210, 1,392 and 776 acres of land in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively .
 
(2) In August 2017, we acquired our partner ’s interest in certain joint ventures in Brazil for an aggregate price of R$1.2 billion
($381.7 million). As a result of this transaction, we began consolidating real estate properties that included twelve operating
properties, two prestabilized properties and 531 acres of undeveloped land. W e accounted for the transaction as a step-
acquisition under the business combination rules and recognized a gain. The results of operations for these real estate
properties were not significant in 2017. In January 2019, we contributed the majority of these real estate assets into a newly
formed joint venture.
 
66
 
Dispositions
 
The following table summarizes our gains on real estate transactions, net for the years ended December 31 (dollars and square feet
in thousands):
 
 2018   2017   2016  
Contributions to unconsolidated entities (1)            
Number of properties  40   222   35 
Square feet  13,115    48,171    11,624  
Net proceeds (2) $1,511,429   $3,201,986   $1,231,878  
Gains on contributions, net (2) (3) $459,107   $847,034   $267,441  
Dispositions to third parties            
Number of properties  78   110   172 
Square feet  15,447    17,147    20,360  
Net proceeds (2) (4) $1,248,487   $1,281,501   $1,760,048  
Gains on dispositions, net (2) (4) $381,889   $274,711   $353,668  
            
Total gains on contributions and dispositions, net $840,996   $1,121,745   $621,109  
Gains on revaluation of equity investments upon acquisition of a controlling interest  -   61,220    - 
Gains on redemptions of investments in co-investment ventures  -   -   136,289  
Total gains on real estate transactions, net $840,996   $1,182,965   $757,398
 
 
(1) In 2017, we contributed 190 operating properties totaling 37.1 million square feet owned by Prologis North American Industrial
Fund ("NAIF") to Prologis Targeted U.S. Logistics Fund ("USLF"), our unconsolidated co-investment venture. In exchange for
the contribution, we received cash proceeds and additional units and USLF assumed $956.0 million of secured debt.  
 
(2) Includes the contribution and disposition of land parcels.
 
(3) Amounts in 2018 reflect the adoption of the new revenue recognition standard under which we recognized the entire gain
attributed to contributions of real estate properties to unconsolidated entities. Amounts in 2017 and 2016 reflect our prior
recognition of the gain to the extent of the third-party ownership in the unconsolidated entity acquiring the property with the
deferral of a portion of the gain related to our ownership.
 
(4)In 2017, we sold our investment in Europe Logistics V enture 1.
 
Operating Lease Agreements
 
We lease our operating properties and certain land parcels to customers under agreements that are generally classified as operating
leases. Our weighted average lease term remaining, based on square feet for all leases in ef fect at December 31, 2018, was 52
months.
 
The following table summarizes our minimum lease payments on leases with lease periods greater than one year for space in our
operating properties, prestabilized development properties and leases of land subject to ground leases at December 31, 2018 (in
thousands):
 
2019  $ 2,006,475  
2020   1,867,253  
2021   1,589,102  
2022   1,278,281  
2023   990,970  
Thereafter   3,293,320  
Total  $ 11,025,401
 
 
These amounts do not reflect future rental revenues from the renewal or replacement of existing leases and exclude reimbursements
of operating expenses and rental increases that are not fixed.
 
67
 
Lease Commitments 
 
We have entered into operating ground leases as a lessee on certain land parcels, principally on-tarmac facilities and of fice space
with remaining lease terms of 1 to 90 years.
 
The following table summarizes our future minimum rental payments under non-cancelable operating leases in ef fect at December 31,
2018 (in thousands):
 
2019  $ 38,769  
2020   38,267  
2021   34,307  
2022   32,312  
2023   30,180  
Thereafter   670,147  
Total  $ 843,982
 
 
Due to the new lease standard that is ef fective January 1, 2019, as a lessee we are required to record a ROU asset and lease liability
for our ground and of fice space leases that we expect to approximate the present value of our future minimum rental payments at
December 31, 2018. See Note 2 for more information on the new lease standard.
 
NOTE 5. UNCONSOLIDATED ENTITIES
 
Summary of Investments
 
We have investments in entities through a variety of ventures. W e co-invest in entities that own multiple properties with partners and
investors and we provide asset and property management services to these entities, which we refer to as co-investment ventures.
These entities may be consolidated or unconsolidated, depending on the structure, our partner ’s participation and other rights and our
level of control of the entity . This note details our investments in unconsolidated co-investment ventures, which are accounted for
using the equity method of accounting and are related parties. See Note 11 for more detail regarding our consolidated investments
that are not wholly owned.
 
We also have other ventures, generally with one partner and that we do not manage, which we account for using the equity method.
We refer to our investments in all entities accounted for using the equity method, both unconsolidated co-investment ventures and
other ventures, collectively , as unconsolidated entities.
 
The following table summarizes our investments in and advances to our unconsolidated entities at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2018   2017  
Unconsolidated co-investment ventures  $ 5,407,838   $ 5,274,702  
Other ventures   337,456    221,748  
Total  $ 5,745,294   $ 5,496,450
 
 
Unconsolidated Co-Investment Ventures
 
The following table summarizes our investments in the individual co-investment ventures at December 31 (dollars in thousands):
 
  Ownership
Percentage  Investment in
and Advances to 
Co-Investment V enture  2018   2017   2018   2017  
Prologis Targeted U.S. Logistics Fund, L.P . (“USLF”)   27.4%  28.2% $1,456,427   $1,383,021  
FIBRA  Prologis (1)   46.7%  46.3%  536,377    533,941  
Prologis European Logistics Partners Sàrl (“PELP”) (2)   50.0%  50.0%  1,517,115    1,766,075  
Prologis European Logistics Fund (“PELF”)   27.9%  26.3%  1,198,904    1,017,361  
Prologis UK Logistics V enture (“UKL V”) (2)   15.0%  15.0%  68,002    29,382  
Nippon Prologis REIT , Inc. (“NPR”) (3)   15.1%  15.1%  472,035    406,568  
Prologis China Logistics V enture I, LP , II, LP  and III, LP
     (“Prologis China Logistics V enture”) (2)   15.0%  15.0%  141,071    116,890  
Brazil joint ventures   10.0%  10.0%  17,907    21,464  
Total          $5,407,838   $5,274,702
 
 
(1) At December 31, 2018, we owned 301.3 million units of FIBRA  Prologis that had a closing price of Ps 30.30 ($1.54) per unit on
the Mexican Stock Exchange. W e have granted FIBRA  Prologis a right of first refusal with respect to stabilized properties that
we plan to sell in Mexico.
 
68
 
(2)We have one partner in each of these co-investment ventures.
 
(3)At December 31, 2018, we owned 0.3 million units of NPR that  had a closing price of ¥231,900 ($2,110) per share on the Tokyo
Stock Exchange. For any properties we develop and plan to sell in Japan, we have committed to of fer those properties to NPR.
 
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, we had receivables from NPR of $122.0 million and $106.2 million, respectively , related to
customer security deposits that originated through a leasing company owned by us that pertain to properties previously
contributed to NPR. W e have a corresponding payable to NPR’ s customers in Other Liabilities . These amounts are repaid to us
as the leases turn over .
 
In January 2019, we formed Prologis Brazil Logistics V enture (“PBL V”), a Brazilian unconsolidated co-investment venture, with one
partner . We contributed an initial portfolio of real estate properties to PBL V consisting of 14 operating properties totaling 6.9 million
square feet and 371 acres of land. W e received cash proceeds and units for our 20% equity interest.                        
 
The amounts recognized in Strategic Capital Revenues  and Earnings from Unconsolidated Entities, Net  depend on the size and
operations of the unconsolidated co-investment ventures, the timing of revenues earned through promotes and transactional fees, as
well as fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates and our ownership interest. W e recognized Strategic Capital Expenses  for
direct costs associated with the asset management of these ventures and allocated property-level management costs for the
properties owned by the ventures.
 
The following table summarizes the Strategic Capital Revenues  we recognized in the Consolidated Statements of Income related to
our unconsolidated co-investment ventures (in thousands):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Recurring fees  $230,746   $195,513   $174,315  
Transactional fees   55,816    48,225    38,110  
Promote revenues   116,290    127,519    88,750  
Total strategic capital revenues from unconsolidated co-investment ventures (1)  $402,852   $371,257   $301,175
 
 
(1) These amounts exclude strategic capital revenues from other ventures.
 
The following table summarizes the key property information, financial position and operating information of our unconsolidated co-
investment ventures (not our proportionate share) and the amounts we recognized in the Consolidated Financial Statements related to
our unconsolidated co-investment ventures at December 31 and for the years ended December 31 (dollars and square feet in
millions):
 
 U.S. Other Americas Europe Asia Total  
As of: 2018  2017  2018  2017  2018  2017  2018  2017  2018  2017 
Key property information:                                        
Ventures  1   1   2   2   3   3   2   2   8   8 
Operating properties  566   552   209   205   669   707   125   95   1,569   1,559 
Square feet  91   88   39   37   159   166   51   41   340   332 
                                        
Financial position:                                        
Unconsolidated co-investment ventures:  
Total assets ($)  7,303   7,062   2,137   2,118   13,028   13,586   7,089   6,133   29,557   28,899 
Third-party debt ($)  2,094   2,313   838   756   2,548   2,682   2,668   2,328   8,148   8,079 
Total liabilities ($)  2,350   2,520   862   782   3,615   3,655   3,006   2,685   9,833   9,642 
                                        
Our investment balance ($) (1)  1,457   1,383   554   555   2,784   2,813   613   524   5,408   5,275 
Our weighted average ownership
(2)  27.4%  28.2%  44.4%  43.4%  33.2%  32.8%  15.1%  15.1%  28.3%  28.8%
 
 U.S.   Other Americas   Europe   Asia   Total  
Operating Information: 2018  2017  2016  2018  2017  2016  2018  2017  2016  2018  2017  2016  2018  2017  2016 
For the years ended:                                                            
Unconsolidated co-investment ventures:  
Total revenues ($)  676   533   395   217   245   242   1,101   1,030   964   457   372   342   2,451   2,180   1,943 
Net earnings ($)  150   139   57   63   71   71   509   406   333   88   182   101   810   798   562 
                                                            
Our earnings from
unconsolidated
     co-investment ventures, net
($)  45   33   10   26   26   27   193   146   138   15   29   17   279   234   192
 
 
(1) Prologis’  investment balance is presented at our adjusted basis derived from the ventures’  U.S. GAAP  information. The
difference between our ownership interest of a venture’ s equity and our investment balance at December 31, 2018 and 2017,
results principally from four types of transactions: (i) deferred gains from the contribution of property to a venture prior to
January 1, 2018 ($635.9 million and $667.3 million, respectively); (ii) recording additional costs associated with our investment
in the venture ($94.4 million and $94.2 million, respectively); (iii) receivables, principally for fees and promotes ($166.7 million
and $103.8 million, respectively); and (iv) customer security deposits retained subsequent to property contributions to NPR, as
discussed above. For deferred gains from partial sales recorded prior to January 1, 2018, we recognize these gains over the
lives of the underlying real estate properties or at the time of disposition to a third party .
69
 
 
(2)Represents our weighted average ownership interest in all unconsolidated co-investment ventures based on each entity’ s
contribution of total assets, before depreciation, net of other liabilities.
 
Equity Commitments Related to Certain Unconsolidated Co-Investment Ventures
 
Certain unconsolidated co-investment ventures have equity commitments from us and our venture partners. Our venture partners
fulfill their equity commitment with cash. W e may fulfill our equity commitment through contributions of properties or cash. The equity
contributions are generally used for the acquisition or development of properties but may be used for the repayment of debt or other
general uses. The venture may obtain financing for the acquisition of properties and therefore the acquisition price of additional
investments that the venture could make may be more than the equity commitment. Depending on market conditions, the investment
objectives of the ventures, our liquidity needs and other factors, we may make additional contributions of properties or additional cash
investments in these ventures through the remaining commitment period.
 
At December 31, 2018, our remaining equity commitments were $242.0 million, primarily for Prologis China Logistics V enture. The
equity commitments expire from 2020 to 2024.
 
NOTE 6. ASSETS HELD FOR SALE OR CONTRIBUTION
 
We had investments in certain real estate properties that met the criteria to be classified as held for sale or contribution at December
31, 2018 and 2017. At the time of classification, these properties were expected to be sold to third parties or were recently developed
and expected to be contributed to unconsolidated co-investment ventures within twelve months. The amounts included in Assets Held
for Sale or Contribution  represented real estate investment balances and the related assets and liabilities for each property .
 
Assets held for sale or contribution consisted of the following at December 31 (dollars and square feet in thousands):
 
  2018   2017  
Number of operating properties   57   22 
Square feet   8,236    5,384  
Total assets held for sale or contribution  $622,288   $342,060  
Total liabilities associated with assets held for sale or contribution – included in Other Liabilities  $ 12,972   $ 9,341
 
 
NOTE 7. OTHER ASSETS AND OTHER LIABILITIES
 
The following table summarizes our other assets, net of amortization and depreciation, if applicable, at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2018   2017  
Acquired lease intangibles  $ 450,690   $ 202,087  
Leasing commissions   346,852    306,461  
Rent leveling   346,116    311,932  
Fixed assets   112,211    109,823  
Prepaid assets   108,581    102,179  
Accounts receivable   107,141    85,118  
Value added taxes receivable   97,047    84,339  
Other notes receivable   35,338    35,406  
Derivative assets   22,731    19,139  
Management contracts   16,257    17,608  
Deferred income taxes   8,767    13,533  
Other   124,188    94,338  
Total  $1,775,919   $1,381,963
 
70
 
The following table summarizes our other liabilities, net of amortization, if applicable, at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2018   2017  
Tenant security deposits  $ 240,467   $ 209,741  
Environmental liabilities   88,863    25,728  
Unearned rents   86,083    71,392  
Acquired lease intangibles   76,087    24,769  
Income tax liabilities   59,766    56,988  
Indemnification liability   36,476    39,480  
Value added taxes payable   11,037    10,081  
Deferred income   10,088    15,754  
Derivative liabilities   8,159    32,229  
Other   149,420    173,737  
Total  $ 766,446   $ 659,899
 
 
The acquired lease intangibles from the DCT  Transaction were amortized over the terms of the respective leases with a weighted
average remaining lease term of 44 months.
The following table summarizes the expected future amortization of leasing commissions and forgone rent (included in acquired lease
intangibles) into amortization expense and above and below market leases (included in acquired lease intangibles) and rent leveling
net assets into rental revenues, all based on the balances at December 31, 2018 (in thousands):
 
  Amortization
Expense   Net (Increase) Decrease to
Rental Revenues 
2019  $ 192,962   $ (28,646 )
2020   153,851    20,947  
2021   117,338    40,580  
2022   88,279    46,408  
2023   65,102    43,317  
Thereafter   137,245    190,188  
Total  $ 754,777   $ 312,794
 
 
NOTE 8. DEBT
 
All debt is incurred by the OP  or its consolidated subsidiaries. The following table summarizes our debt at December 31 (dollars in
thousands):
 
 2018   2017  
 Weighted Average
Interest Rate (1)   Amount
Outstanding (2) (3)   Weighted Average
Interest Rate (1)   Amount
Outstanding (2)  
Credit facilities  3.4% $ 50,500    1.8% $ 317,392  
Senior notes (4)  2.7%  8,304,147    3.0%  6,067,277  
Term loans and unsecured other  1.8%  1,921,428    1.7%  2,060,491  
Secured mortgage (5)  5.1%  813,740    5.3%  967,471  
Total  2.7% $ 11,089,815    2.9% $ 9,412,631
 
 
(1) The interest rates presented represent the ef fective interest rates (including amortization of debt issuance costs and the
noncash premiums or discounts) at the end of the period for the debt outstanding and include the impact of undesignated and
designated interest rate swaps, which ef fectively fix the interest rate on our variable rate debt.
 
(2) We borrow in the functional currencies of the countries where we invest. Included in the outstanding balances at December 31
were borrowings denominated in the following currencies:
 
   2018   2017  
   Amount Outstanding   % of T otal   Amount Outstanding   % of T otal  
 British pound sterling  $ 635,972    5.8% $ 671,522    7.1%
 Canadian dollar   266,337    2.4%  451,080    4.8%
 Euro   4,893,693    44.1%  3,839,422    40.8%
 Japanese yen   1,951,844    17.6%  1,306,380    13.9%
 U.S. dollar   3,341,969    30.1%  3,144,227    33.4%
 Total  $ 11,089,815       $ 9,412,631     
 
 
(3) Through the DCT  Transaction, we assumed $1.9 billion of debt with a weighted average interest rate of 3.4%, which includes
noncash premium. During the third quarter of 2018, we paid down $1.8 billion of the assumed debt through the senior note
71
 
issuances described below . We incurred prepayment penalt ies of $48.7 million upon extinguishment tha t was reduced by the
$46.5 million premium  recorded upon  assumption of this debt in the DCT  Transaction, resulting in a loss of  $2.2 million .
 
(4) Notes are due January 2020 to September 2048 with ef fective interest rates ranging from 0.0% to 4.5% at December 31, 2018.
The senior notes issued in January 2018, as described below , hold an ef fective interest rate of 0.0% due to the amortization of
the net premium on the debt and associated cash flow hedge.
 
(5) Debt is due January 2019 to November 2027 with ef fective interest rates ranging from 0.3% to 7.8% at December 31, 2018. The
debt is principally secured by 133 operating properties and one prestabilized development property with an aggregate
undepreciated cost of $2.2 billion at December 31, 2018.
 
Credit Facilities
 
We have a global senior credit facility (the “Global Facility”), under which we may draw in British pounds sterling, Canadian dollars,
euro, Japanese yen and U.S. dollars on a revolving basis up to $3.0 billion (subject to currency fluctuations). Pricing under the Global
Facility , including the spread over LIBOR, facility fees and letter of credit fees, varies based on the public debt ratings of the OP . The
Global Facility was scheduled to mature in April 2020.
 
In January 2019, we upsized our Global Facility to draw in British pounds sterling, Canadian dollars, euro, Japanese yen, Mexican
pesos and U.S. dollars on a revolving basis up to $3.5 billion (subject to currency fluctuations). The upsized Global Facility is
scheduled to mature in January 2023; however , we may extend the maturity date for six months on two occasions, subject to the
satisfaction of certain conditions and payment of extension fees. W e have the ability to increase the Global Facility to $4.5 billion,
subject to currency fluctuations and obtaining additional lender commitments.
 
We also have a Japanese yen revolver (the “Revolver”) with availability of ¥50.0 billion ($454.9 million at December 31, 2018). W e
have the ability to increase the Revolver to ¥65.0 billion ($591.4 million at December 31, 2018), subject to obtaining additional lender
commitments. Pricing under the Revolver , including the spread over LIBOR, facility fees and letter of credit fees, varies based on the
public debt ratings of the OP . The Revolver is scheduled to mature in February 2021; however , we may extend the maturity date for
one year , subject to the satisfaction of certain conditions and payment of extension fees.
 
We refer to the Global Facility and the Revolver , collectively , as our “Credit Facilities.”
 
The following table summarizes information about our Credit Facilities (dollars in millions):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
For the years ended December 31:             
Weighted average daily interest rate   3.1%  1.3%  1.4%
Weighted average daily borrowings  $ 253  $ 111  $ 128 
Maximum borrowings outstanding at any month-end  $ 485  $ 317  $ 307 
At December 31:             
Aggregate lender commitments  $ 3,470   $ 3,490   $ 3,306  
Less:             
Borrowings outstanding   51   317   35 
Outstanding letters of credit   31   33   36 
Current availability  $ 3,388   $ 3,140   $ 3,235  
            
 
Senior Notes
 
The senior notes are unsecured and our obligations are ef fectively subordinated in certain respects to any of our debt that is secured
by a lien on real property , to the extent of the value of such real property . The senior notes require interest payments be made
quarterly , semi-annually or annually . All of the senior notes are redeemable at any time at our option, subject to certain prepayment
penalties. Such repurchase and other terms are governed by the provisions of indenture agreements, various note purchase
agreements or trust deeds.
 
The following table summarizes the issuances of senior notes during 2018 (principal in thousands):
 
Initial Borrowing Date  Principal (1)   Stated Interest Rate   Maturity Date
  Borrowing
Currency   USD        
January (2)  € 400,000   $ 494,180   Euribor + 0.3%   January 2020
June  $ 700,000   $ 700,000   3.9% – 4.4%   September 2028 – 2048
July  € 700,000   $ 818,720   1.9%   January 2029
September  ¥ 55,100,000   $ 488,714   0.7% – 1.5%   September 2025 – 2038
 
(1) The exchange rate used to calculate into U.S. dollars was the spot rate at the settlement date.
 
72
 
(2) In association with the issuance, we entered into cash flow hedges to ef fectively fix the intere st rate, as discussed in Note 15 .
 
We issued senior notes as described above principally to pay down $1.8 billion of debt assumed in the DCT  Transaction and other
debt, as well as for capital improvements to properties and general corporate purposes.
 
Term Loans
 
The following table summarizes our outstanding term loans at December 31 (dollars and borrowing currency in thousands):
 
Term LoanBorrowing
Currency Initial
Borrowing
Date  Lender Commitment at
2018   Amount
Outstanding
at 2018  Amount
Outstanding
at 2017  Interest Rate  Maturity Date
     Borrowing
Currency USD  USD   USD        
2017 Term Loan (1)USD, EUR,
JPY and GBP June 2014 $ 500,000 $500,000  $ 500,000  $ 500,000  LIBOR + 0.9%  May 2020
2015 Canadian
     Term Loan (2) CAD  December
2015  $ 170,506 $125,107   125,107   296,595  CDOR + 0.9%  February 2023
2016 Yen Term
     Loan JPY  August
2016  ¥100,000,000 $909,813   909,813   1,065,965  Yen LIBOR +
0.7%   August 2022 –
2023
March 2017 Yen
     Term Loan JPY  March 2017 ¥12,000,000 $109,178   109,178   106,597  0.9% and
1.0%   March 2027 –
2028
October 2017 Yen
     Term Loan JPY  October
2017  ¥10,000,000 $90,981   90,981   88,830  0.9%   October 2032
December 2018 Yen
     Term Loan JPY  December
2018  ¥20,000,000 $181,963   181,963   -  1.2% and Yen
LIBOR + 0.7%  December 2031
– June 2033
Subtotal             1,917,042   2,057,987       
Debt issuance costs, net            (8,230)  (11,042)      
Total            $1,908,812  $2,046,945       
 
(1) We may increase the borrowings on the 2017 Term Loan up to $1.0 billion, subject to obtaining additional lender commitments.
We paid down $2.0 billion and $1.2 billion and reborrowed $2.0 billion and $1.5 billion in 2018 and 2017, respectively . We may
extend the maturity date twice, by one year each, subject to satisfaction of certain conditions and the payment of an extension
fee.
 
(2) During 2018, we paid down CAD 201.4 million ($158.9 million) on the 2015 Canadian Term Loan. In association with the pay
down, we terminated our Canadian-denominated cash flow hedges. See Note 15 for more information.
 
Long-Term Debt Maturities
 
Principal payments due on our debt, for each year through the period ended December 31, 2023, and thereafter were as follows at
December 31, 2018 (in thousands):
 
 Unsecured        
  Credit   Senior   Term Loans   Secured      
Maturity  Facilities   Notes   and Other   Mortgages   Total  
2019 (1)  $ -  $ -  $ 868  $ 272,188   $ 273,056  
2020 (2)   50,500    1,145,000    500,723    24,466    1,720,689  
2021   -   801,500    778   199,560    1,001,838  
2022   -   801,500    273,786    12,103    1,087,389  
2023   -   850,000    762,887    39,248    1,652,135  
Thereafter   -   4,766,808    390,616    268,795    5,426,219  
Subtotal   50,500    8,364,808    1,929,658    816,360    11,161,326  
Premiums (discounts), net   -   (26,173 )  -   945   (25,228 )
Debt issuance costs, net   -   (34,488 )  (8,230 )  (3,565 )  (46,283 )
Total  $ 50,500   $8,304,147   $ 1,921,428   $ 813,740   $11,089,815 
 
(1) We expect to repay the amounts maturing in the next twelve months with cash generated from operations, proceeds from
dispositions of real estate properties, or as necessary , with borrowings on our Credit Facilities.
 
(2) Included in the 2020 maturities was the Global Facility that was recast in 2019 and now can be extended to 2024 and the 2017
Term Loan that can be extended until 2022.
 
73
 
Interest Expense
 
The following table summarizes the components of interest expense for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Gross interest expense  $ 268,942   $ 328,228   $ 383,098  
Amortization of debt premiums, net   (590 )  (13,728 )  (30,596 )
Amortization of debt issuance costs, net   13,243    14,479    15,459  
Interest expense before capitalization  $ 281,595   $ 328,979   $ 367,961  
Capitalized amounts   (52,454 )  (54,493 )  (64,815 )
Net interest expense  $ 229,141   $ 274,486   $ 303,146  
Total cash paid for interest, net of receipts and amounts capitalized  $ 205,485   $ 278,313   $ 322,442
 
 
Early Extinguishment of Debt
 
Over the last three years, we repurchased or repaid certain debt before the maturity date in an ef fort to reduce our borrowing costs
and extend our debt maturities. As a result, we recognized gains or losses represented by the dif ference between the recorded debt
(including premiums and discounts and related debt issuance costs) and the consideration we paid to retire the debt, including fees.
Fees associated with the restructuring of debt that meets the modification criteria, along with existing unamortized premium or
discount and debt issuance costs, are amortized over the term of the new debt. W e recognized a net loss in 2018 (excluding the
payof f of $1.8 billion of debt assumed in the DCT  Transaction, discussed above) and 2017 of $0.4 million and $68.4 million,
respectively , and a gain in 2016 of $2.5 million.
 
The following table summarizes the activity related to the repurchase of debt and net loss on early extinguishment of debt for 2017 (in
millions):
 
Senior notes:     
Original principal amount  $ 1,495.3  
Cash purchase price  $ 1,566.5  
Secured mortgage debt:     
Original principal amount  $ 538.3  
Cash repayment price  $ 538.3  
Total:     
Original principal amount  $ 2,033.6  
Cash purchase/repayment price  $ 2,104.8  
Losses on early extinguishment of debt  $ 68.4 
 
Financial Debt Covenants
 
We have $8.3 billion of senior notes and $1.9 billion of term loans outstanding at December 31, 2018 that were subject to certain
financial covenants under their related indentures. W e are also subject to financial covenants under our Credit Facilities and certain
secured mortgage debt. At December 31, 2018, we were in compliance with all of our financial debt covenants.
 
Guarantee of Finance Subsidiary Debt
 
In 2018, we formed finance subsidiaries as part of our operations in Europe (Prologis Euro Finance LLC), Japan (Prologis Yen
Finance LLC) and the U.K. (Prologis Sterling Finance LLC).
 
These entities are 100% indirectly owned by the OP  and all unsecured debt issued or to be issued by each entity is or will be fully and
unconditionally guaranteed by the OP . There are no restrictions or limits on the OP’ s ability to obtain funds from its subsidiaries by
dividend or loan. In reliance on Rule 3-10 of Regulation S-X, the separate financial statements of Prologis Euro Finance LLC, Prologis
Yen Finance LLC and Prologis Sterling Finance LLC are not provided.
 
NOTE 9. STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY OF PROLOGIS, INC.
 
Shares Authorized
 
At December 31, 2018, 1.1 billion shares were authorized to be issued by the Parent, of which 1.0 billion shares represent common
stock. Our board of directors (the “Board”) may , without stockholder approval, classify or reclassify any unissued shares of our stock
from time to time by setting or changing the preferences, conversion or other rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to
distributions, qualifications and terms or conditions of redemption of such shares.
 
74
 
Common Stock
 
On August 22, 2018, we issued 96.2 million common shares in the DCT  Transaction. See Note 3 for more detail on the transaction.
 
We did not issue any shares of common stock under our at-the-market program during 2018, 2017 and 2016. W e have an equity
distribution agreement that allows us to sell up to $750 million aggregate gross sales proceeds of shares of common stock, of which
$535.2 million remains available for sale, through six designated agents, who earn a fee of up to 2% of the gross proceeds, as agreed
to on a transaction-by-transaction basis.
 
Under the 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan, certain of our employees and outside directors are able to participate in equity-based
compensation plans. See Note 12 for additional information on equity-based compensation plans.
 
Preferred Stock
 
At December 31, 2018 and 2017 our Series Q preferred stock outstanding had a dividend rate of 8.54%, and will be redeemable at
our option on or after November 13, 2026. Holders have, subject to certain conditions, limited voting rights and all holders are entitled
to receive cumulative preferential dividends based on liquidation preference. The dividends are payable quarterly in arrears on the last
day of each quarter . Dividends are payable when, and if, they have been declared by the Board, out of funds legally available for the
payment of dividends.
 
Ownership Restrictions
 
For us to qualify as a REIT , five or fewer individuals may not own more than 50% of the value of our outstanding stock at any time
during the last half of our taxable year . Therefore, our charter restricts beneficial ownership (or ownership generally attributed to a
person under the REIT  rules), by a person, or persons acting as a group, of issued and outstanding common and preferred stock that
would cause that person to own or be deemed to own more than 9.8% (by value or number of shares, whichever is more restrictive) of
our issued and outstanding capital stock. Furthermore, subject to certain exceptions, no person shall at any time directly or indirectly
acquire ownership of more than 25% of any of the preferred stock. These provisions assist us in protecting and preserving our REIT
status and protect the interests of stockholders in takeover transactions by preventing the acquisition of a substantial block of
outstanding shares of stock.
 
Shares of stock owned by a person or group of people in excess of these limits are subject to redemption by us. The provision does
not apply where a majority of the Board, in its sole and absolute discretion, waives such limit after determining that our status as a
REIT  for federal income tax purposes will not be jeopardized.
 
Dividends
 
To comply with the REIT  requirements of the Internal Revenue Code, we are generally required to make common and preferred stock
dividends (other than capital gain distributions) to our stockholders in amounts that together at least equal (i) the sum of (a) 90% of
our “REIT  taxable income” computed without regard to the dividends paid deduction and net capital gains and (b) 90% of the net
income (after tax), if any , from foreclosure property , minus (ii) certain excess noncash income. Our common stock distribution policy is
to distribute a percentage of our cash flow that ensures that we will meet the distribution requirements of the Internal Revenue Code
and that allows us to also retain cash to meet other needs, such as capital improvements and other investment activities.
 
Our tax return for the year ended December 31, 2018 has not been filed. The taxability information presented for our dividends paid in
2018 is based on management’ s estimate. Our tax returns for open tax years have not been examined by the Internal Revenue
Service, other than those discussed in Note 13. Consequently , the taxability of dividends is subject to change.
 
In 2018, 2017 and 2016, we paid all of our dividends in cash.
 
The following summarizes the taxability of our common and preferred stock dividends for the years ended December 31:
 
  2018 (1)   2017   2016  
Common Stock:             
Ordinary income  $ 1.34  $ 1.23  $ 0.60 
Qualified dividend   0.03   0.01   0.15 
Capital gains   0.55   0.52   0.93 
Total distribution  $ 1.92  $ 1.76  $ 1.68 
Preferred Stock – Series Q:             
Ordinary income  $ 2.98  $ 2.91  $ 2.02 
Qualified dividend   0.06   0.08   0.29 
Capital gains   1.23   1.28   1.96 
Total dividend  $ 4.27  $ 4.27  $ 4.27
 
 
(1) Taxability for 2018 is estimated.
 
75
 
Common stock dividends are characterized for federal income tax purposes as ordinary income, qualified dividend, capital gains, non-
taxable return of capital or a combination of the four . Common stock dividen ds that exceed our current and accumulated earnings and
profits (calculated for tax purposes) constitute a return of capital rather than a dividend and generally reduce the stockholder ’s basis in
the common stock. To the extent that a dividend exceeds both  current and accumulated earnings and profits and the stockholder ’s
basis in the common stock, it will generally be treated as a gain from the sale or exchange of that stockholder ’s common stock. At the
beginning of each year , we notify our stockholders of  the taxability of the common stock dividends paid during the preceding year .
 
Pursuant to the terms of our preferred stock, we are restricted from declaring or paying any dividend with respect to our common
stock unless and until all cumulative dividends with respect to the preferred stock have been paid and suf ficient funds have been set
aside for dividends that have been declared for the relevant dividend period with respect to the preferred stock.
 
NOTE 10. PARTNERS’ CAPITAL OF PROLOGIS, L.P.
 
Distributions paid on the common limited partnership units, and the taxability of those distributions, are similar to dividends paid on the
Parent’ s common stock disclosed above.
 
On August 22, 2018, we issued 3.6 million common limited partnership units in the OP  in the DCT  Transaction. See Note 3 for more
detail on the transaction.
 
We issued Class A Units in the OP  through an acquisition of a portfolio of properties in 2015. The Class A Units generally have the
same rights as the existing common limited partnership units of the OP , except that the Class A Units are entitled to a quarterly
distribution equal to $0.64665 per unit so long as the common limited partnership units receive a quarterly distribution of at least $0.40
per unit (in the event the common limited partnership units receive a quarterly distribution of less than $0.40 per unit, the Class A Unit
distribution would be reduced by a proportionate amount). Class A Units are convertible into common limited partnership units at an
initial conversion rate of one-for-one. The conversion rate will be increased or decreased to the extent that, at the time of conversion,
the net present value of the distributions paid with respect to the Class A Units are less or more than the distributions paid on common
limited partnership units from the time of issuance of the Class A Units until the time of conversion. At December 31, 2018 and 2017,
the Class A Units were convertible into 8.4 million and 8.5 million common limited partnership units. The OP  may redeem the Class A
Units at any time after October 7, 2025, for an amount in cash equal to the then-current number of the common limited partnership
units into which the Class A Units are convertible, multiplied by $43.11, subject to the holders’  right to convert the Class A Units into
common limited partnership units. Dividends paid to the Class A Units were $2.58660 annually during the years ended December 31,
2018, 2017 and 2016.
 
NOTE 11. NONCONTROLLING INTERESTS
 
Prologis, L.P.
 
We report noncontrolling interests related to several entities we consolidate but of which we do not own 100% of the equity . These
entities include two real estate partnerships that have issued limited partnership units to third parties. Depending on the specific
partnership agreements, these limited partnership units are redeemable for cash or , at our option, into shares of the Parent’ s common
stock, generally at a rate of one share of common stock to one unit. W e also consolidate certain entities in which we do not own 100%
of the equity but the equity of these entities is not exchangeable into our common stock.
 
As discussed in Note 1, the Parent has complete responsibility , power and discretion in the day-to-day management of the OP . The
Parent, through its majority interest, has the right to receive benefits from and incur losses of the OP . In addition, the OP  does not
have either substantive liquidation rights or substantive kick-out rights without cause or substantive participating rights that could be
exercised by a simple majority of noncontrolling interests. The absence of such rights renders the OP  as a VIE. Accordingly , the
Parent is the primary beneficiary and therefore consolidates the OP .
 
Prologis, Inc.
 
The noncontrolling interests of the Parent include the noncontrolling interests presented above for the OP , as well as the limited
partnership units in the OP  that are not owned by the Parent. The outstanding limited partnership units receive quarterly cash
distributions equal to the quarterly dividends paid on our common stock pursuant to the terms of the applicable partnership
agreements.
 
The following table summarizes our ownership percentages and noncontrolling interests and the consolidated entities’  total assets and
total liabilities at December 31 (dollars in thousands):
 
 Our Ownership
Percentage   Noncontrolling
Interests   Total Assets   Total Liabilities  
 2018   2017   2018   2017   2018   2017   2018   2017  
Prologis U.S. Logistics V enture  55.0%  55.0% $2,697,095   $2,581,629   $6,072,087   $6,030,819   $92,782   $284,162  
Other consolidated entities (1) various   various    139,374    78,613    1,045,202    806,138    53,145    30,330  
Prologis, L.P .          2,836,469    2,660,242    7,117,289    6,836,957    145,927    314,492  
Limited partners in Prologis,
L.P. (2) (3)          666,326    414,341    -   -   -   - 
Prologis, Inc.         $3,502,795   $3,074,583   $7,117,289   $6,836,957   $145,927   $314,492
 
76
 
 
(1) Includes our two partnerships that have issued limited partnership units to third parties, as discussed above, along with various
other consolidated entities. The limited partnership units outstanding at December 31, 2018 and 2017 were exchangeable into
cash or , at our option, 0.7 million and 1.0 million shares of the Parent’ s common stock, respectively .
 
(2) We had 8.8 million and 8.9 million Class A Units that were convertible into 8.4 million and 8.5 million limited partnership units of
the OP  at December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively . See Note 10 for further discussion of our Class A Units.
 
(3) At December 31, 2018 and 2017, excluding the Class A Units, there were limited partnership units in the OP  that were
exchangeable into cash or , at our option, 7.2 million and 4.1 million shares of the Parent’ s common stock, respectively . Also
included are the vested OP  Long-T erm Incentive Plan Units associated with our long-term compensation plan. See further
discussion of Long-T erm Incentive Plan Units in Note 12. 
 
NOTE 12. LONG-TERM COMPENSATION
 
The 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (“2012 L TIP”) provides for grants of awards to of ficers, directors, employees and consultants of
the Parent or its subsidiaries. Awards can be in the form of: full value awards, stock appreciation rights, stock options (non-qualified
options and incentive stock options) and cash incentive awards. Full value awards generally consist of: (i) common stock; (ii) restricted
stock units (“RSUs”); (iii) OP  LTIP units (“L TIP Units”) and (iv) Prologis Outperformance Plan (“POP”) OP  LTIP units (“POP  LTIP
Units”).
 
The awards under the 2012 L TIP have been issued under the following components of our equity-based compensation plans and
programs at December 31, 2018: (i) POP; (ii) Prologis Promote Plan (“PPP”); (iii) annual long-term incentive (“L TI”) equity award
program (“Annual L TI Award”); and (iv) annual bonus exchange program. Under all of these components, certain employees may elect
to receive their equity award payout either in the form of RSUs or other equity of the Parent or L TIP Units of the OP . No participant can
be granted more than 1.5 million shares of common stock under the 2012 L TIP in any one calendar year . Awards may be made under
the 2012 L TIP until it is terminated by the Board or until the ten-year anniversary of the ef fective date of the plan.
 
We have 27.2 million shares reserved for issuance, of which 15.9 million shares of common stock were available for future issuance
at December 31, 2018. Each L TIP Unit counts as one share of common stock for purposes of calculating the limit on shares that may
be issued.
 
Equity-Based Compensation Plans and Programs
 
Prologis Outperformance Plan (“POP”)
 
We allocate participation points to participants under our POP  corresponding to three-year performance periods beginning January 1.
The fair value of the awards is measured at the grant date and amortized over the period from the grant date to the date at which the
awards would become vested. The performance hurdle (the “Outperformance Hurdle”) at the end of the initial three-year performance
period requires our three-year compound annualized total stockholder return (“TSR”) to exceed a threshold set at the three-year
compound annualized TSR for the Morgan Stanley Capital International (“MSCI”) US REIT  Index for the same period plus 100 basis
points (“Index”). If the Outperformance Hurdle is met, a compensation pool will be formed equal to 3.0% of the excess value created,
subject to a maximum as described by performance period below . POP  awards cannot be paid at a time when our absolute TSR is
negative. If after seven years our absolute TSR has not become positive, the awards will be forfeited.
 
For the 2016 – 2018 and 2017 – 2019 performance periods, awards (“Initial Awards”), equaling in aggregate up to $75 million of the
applicable compensation pool, will be paid after the end of the initial three-year performance period (to the extent the Outperformance
Hurdle is met). One-third of any compensation pool amount in excess of $75 million (up to 0.5% of our equity market capitalization)
can be earned at the end of each of the three years after the Initial Awards are earned, if our performance meets or exceeds the Index
at the end of each of such three years. In addition, participants will not be able to sell or transfer any equity they receive as awards
until three years after the end of the initial performance period.
 
Beginning with the 2018 – 2020 performance period, the POP  award structure was amended. The plan requires an absolute maximum
cap of $100 million on the compensation pool for the 2018 – 2020 performance period. If an award is earned at the end of the initial
three-year performance period, then 20% of the POP  award is paid at the end of the initial performance period and the remaining 80%
is subject to additional seven-year clif f vesting. The 20% that is paid at the end of the initial three-year performance period is subject to
an additional three-year holding requirement. In 2018, our Named Executive Of ficers (“NEOs”) adopted the vesting construct of the
2018 – 2020 performance period retroactively for the 2016 – 2018 and 2017 – 2019 performance periods. The change in vesting did
not result in a remeasurement event under the accounting rules.
 
Each participant is eligible to receive a percentage of the total compensation pool based on the number of participation points
allocated to the participant, or in the case of certain NEOs, a set percentage of the compensation pool. If the performance criteria are
met, the participants’  points or compensation pool percentage will be paid in the form of common stock or POP  LTIP Units, as elected
by the participant. Annually , a participant may exchange their participation points or compensation pool percentage for POP  LTIP
Units. If the performance criteria are not met, the participants’  points, compensation pool percentage and POP  LTIP Units will be
forfeited.
 
77
 
At December 31, 2018, all awards were equity classified. W e use a Mont e Carlo valuation model to value the participation points
allocated under the POP .
 
The following table details the assumptions used for each grant based on the year it was granted (dollars in thousands):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Risk free interest rate   2.1%  1.5%  1.0%
Expected volatility   16.5%  22.2%  20.5%
Aggregate fair value  $23,300   $20,400   $26,600
 
 
Total remaining compensation cost related to the POP  at December 31, 2018, was $33.9 million, prior to adjustments for capitalized
amounts due to our development activities. The remaining compensation cost will be recognized through 2027, with a weighted
average period of 3.2 years.
 
The performance criteria were met for the 2016 – 2018, 2015 – 2017 and 2014 – 2016 performance periods, which resulted in the
pool being awarded in January 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively , in the form of common stock and POP  LTIP Units. See below for
details on these performance periods (dollars and units in thousands):
 
  2016 – 2018   2015 – 2017   2014 – 2016  
Performance pool  $ 75,000   $ 110,230   $ 62,220  
Common stock shares   379   582   486 
POP  LTIP Units and L TIP Units   824   1,170    698 
Grant date fair value  $ 62.38   $ 62.65   $ 52.53
 
 
Other Equity-Based Compensation Plans and Programs
 
Awards may be issued in the form of RSUs or L TIP Units at the participants’  elections under the following equity-based compensation
plans and programs. RSUs and L TIP Units are valued based on the market price of the Parent’ s common stock on the date the award
is granted and the grant date value is charged to compensation expense over the service period. Beginning with the February 2018
grants, the service period was lengthened from three to four years. Dividends and distributions are paid with respect to both RSUs
and L TIP Units during the vesting period, and therefore they are considered participating securities. W e do not allocate undistributed
earnings to participating securities as our net earnings per share or unit would not be materially dif ferent. The value of the dividend is
charged to retained earnings for RSUs and the distribution is charged to Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interests  in the OP
for LTIP Units in the Consolidated Financial Statements of the Parent.
 
Prologis Promote Plan (“PPP”)
 
Under the PPP , we establish a compensation pool for certain employees that is equal to 40% of the third-party portion of promotes
earned by Prologis from the co-investment ventures. The awards may be settled in some combination of cash and full value awards,
at our election.
 
Annual LTI Equity Award Program (“Annual LTI Award”)
 
The Annual L TI Award provides for grants to certain employees subject to our performance against benchmark indices that relate to
the most recent year ’s performance.
 
Annual Bonus Exchange Program
 
Under our bonus exchange program, generally all our employees may elect to receive all or a portion of their annual cash bonus in
equity . Equity awards granted through the bonus exchange are generally valued at a premium to the cash bonus exchanged,
excluding the NEOs.
78
 
 
Summary of Award Activity
 
RSUs
 
Each RSU represents the right to receive one share of common stock of the Parent.
 
The following table summarizes the activity for RSUs for the year ended December 31, 2018 (units in thousands):
 
  Unvested RSUs   Weighted Average Grant
Date Fair V alue  
Balance at January 1, 2018   1,374   $ 45.57  
Granted   761   61.20  
Vested and distributed   (787 )  45.40  
Forfeited   (93)  54.84  
Balance at December 31, 2018   1,255   $ 54.48
 
 
The fair value of stock awards granted and vested was $38.5 million and $32.9 million for 2017 and $32.5 million and $33.7 million for
2016, respectively , based on the weighted average grant date fair value per unit.
 
Total remaining compensation cost related to RSUs outstanding at December 31, 2018, was $38.5 million, prior to adjustments for
capitalized amounts due to our development activities. The remaining compensation cost will be recognized through 2022, with a
weighted average period of 1.2 years.
 
LTIP Units
 
An LTIP Unit represents a partnership interest in the OP . After vesting and the satisfaction of certain conditions, an L TIP Unit may be
exchangeable for a common limited partnership unit in the OP  and then redeemable for a share of common stock (or cash at our
option).
 
The following table summarizes the activity for L TIP Units for the year ended December 31, 2018 (units in thousands):
 
  Vested L TIP
Units   Unvested L TIP
Units   Unvested W eighted
Average Grant Date
Fair V alue  
Balance at January 1, 2018   1,532    1,829   $ 46.48  
Granted   -   1,346    61.36  
Forfeited   -   (81)  48.23  
Vested L TIP Units   917   (917 )  44.88  
Vested POP  LTIP Units (1)   1,170    -  N/A 
Conversion to common limited partnership units   (326 )  -  N/A 
Balance at December 31, 2018   3,293    2,177   $ 56.05
 
 
 
(1) Vested units were based on the POP  performance criteria being met for the 2015 – 2017 performance period and represented
the earned award amount. V ested units are included in the POP  award table above. Unvested POP  LTIP Units for the 2015 –
2017 performance period were forfeited to the extent not earned.
 
The fair value of stock awards granted and vested was $53.2 million and $28.3 million for 2017 and $38.0 million and $18.8 million for
2016, respectively , based on the weighted average grant date fair value per unit.
 
Total remaining compensation cost related to L TIP Units at December 31, 2018, was $77.2 million, prior to adjustments for capitalized
amounts due to our development activities. The remaining compensation cost will be recognized through 2022, with a weighted
average period of 1.1 years.
 
Stock Options
 
We have 0.3 million stock options outstanding and exercisable at December 31, 2018, with a weighted average exercise price of
$27.17 and a weighted average life of 1.5 years. The aggregate intrinsic value of exercised options was $13.8 million, $28.6 million,
and $45.6 million for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively . No stock options were granted in the three-
year period ended December 31, 2018.
 
79
 
Other Plans
 
The Prologis 401(k) Plan (the “401(k) Plan”) provides for matching employer contributions of $0.50 for every dollar contributed by an
employee, up to 6% of the employee’ s annual compensation (within the statutory compensation limit). In the 401(k) Plan, vesting in
the matching employer contributions is based on the employee’ s years of service, with 100% vesting at the completion of one year of
service. Our contributions under the matching provisions were $2.9 million, $2.8 million and $2.7 million for the years ended
December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively .
 
We have a non-qualified savings plan that allows highly compensated employees the opportunity to defer the receipt and income
taxation of a certain portion of their compensation in excess of the amount permitted under the 401(k) Plan. There has been no
employer matching in the three-year period ended December 31, 2018 .
 
NOTE 13. INCOME TAXES
 
Components of Earnings Before Income Taxes
 
The following table summarizes the components of earnings before income taxes for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Domestic  $1,078,678   $1,207,503   $719,018  
International   807,612    608,065    628,086  
Earnings before income taxes  $1,886,290   $1,815,568   $1,347,104
 
 
Summary of Current and Deferred Income Taxes
 
The following table summarizes the components of the provision for income taxes for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Current income tax expense:             
U.S. federal  $ 1,727   $ 214  $ 7,153  
International   50,731    45,185    38,493  
State and local   9,424    14,215    14,443  
Total current income tax expense   61,882    59,614    60,089  
             
Deferred income tax expense (benefit):             
U.S. federal   (317 )  2,533    (3,306 )
International   1,765    (7,538 )  (2,219 )
Total deferred income tax expense (benefit)   1,448    (5,005 )  (5,525 )
Total income tax expense  $63,330   $54,609   $54,564
 
 
Current Income Taxes
 
Current income tax expense incurred in international jurisdictions over the last three years is due to tax charged on the following: (i)
the contribution of real estate properties to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures and sales to third-parties; (ii) recurring and
transactional fees earned; and (iii) taxable earnings from unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
For the year ended December 31, 2016, we recognized a net expense of $0.3 million for uncertain tax positions. For the years ended
December 31, 2018 and 2017, we did not recognize any expense for uncertain tax positions.
 
During the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, cash paid for income taxes, net of refunds, was $60.3 million, $46.7
million and $29.3 million, respectively .
 
Deferred Income Taxes
 
The deferred income tax benefits recognized in 2017 and 2016 were principally due to the reversal of deferred tax liabilities from the
contribution and disposition of properties.
 
80
 
The following table summarizes the deferred income tax assets and liabilities at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2018   2017  
Gross deferred income tax assets:         
NOL carryforwards  $336,485   $334,358  
Basis dif ference – real estate properties   55,198    53,902  
Basis dif ference – equity investments   5,448    2,567  
Basis dif ference – intangibles   1,076    2,173  
Section 163(j) interest limitation   4,771    26,280  
Capital loss carryforward   1   10,566  
Other – temporary dif ferences   3,487    5,724  
Total gross deferred income tax assets   406,466    435,570  
Valuation allowance   (379,987 )  (410,896 )
Gross deferred income tax assets, net of valuation allowance   26,479    24,674  
Gross deferred income tax liabilities:         
Basis dif ference – real estate properties   69,157    63,246  
Basis dif ference – equity investments   2,380    1,114  
Other – temporary dif ferences   2,941    769 
Total gross deferred income tax liabilities   74,478    65,129  
Net deferred income tax liabilities  $ 47,999   $ 40,455
 
 
The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, enacted on December 22, 2017, reduced the corporate federal tax rate in the U.S. to 21.0%, ef fective
upon enactment. As such, deferred tax assets and liabilities for entities in the U.S. were measured using the lower corporate federal
tax rate at December 31, 2018 and 2017. At December 31, 2018, we have finalized the accounting for the income tax ef fects of the
Tax Cuts and Jobs Act.
 
At December 31, 2018, we had NOL  carryforwards as follows (in thousands):
 
 U.S.   Europe   Mexico   Japan   Other  
Gross NOL  carryforward $ 160,882   $ 646,521   $ 358,070   $ 115,176   $ 44,843  
Tax-ef fected NOL  carryforward  38,943    153,876    110,152    22,517    10,997  
Valuation allowance  (37,516 )  (145,460 )  (110,152 )  (22,517 )  (8,794 )
Net deferred tax asset – NOL  carryforward $ 1,427   $ 8,416   $ -  $ -  $ 2,203  
Expiration periods 2022 – indefinite   2019 – indefinite   2019 – 2029   2019 – 2027   2019 – indefinite
 
 
The deferred tax asset valuation allowance at December 31, 2018, was adequate to reduce the total deferred tax asset to an amount
that we estimate will more likely than not be realized.
 
Liability for Uncertain Tax Positions
 
During the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, we believe that we have complied with the REIT  requirements of the
Internal Revenue Code. The statute of limitations for our tax returns is generally three years. As such, our tax returns that remain
subject to examination would be primarily from 2015 and thereafter .
 
The liability for uncertain tax positions was $3.0 million for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, and primarily consisted of
estimated income tax liabilities in Mexico.
 
NOTE 14. EARNINGS PER COMMON SHARE OR UNIT
 
We determine basic earnings per share or unit based on the weighted average number of shares of common stock or units
outstanding during the period. W e compute diluted earnings per share or unit based on the weighted average number of shares or
units outstanding combined with the incremental weighted average ef fect from all outstanding potentially dilutive instruments.
 
81
 
The computation of our basic and diluted earnings per share and unit for the years ended December 31 (in  thousands, except per
share and unit amounts) was as follows:
 
Prologis, Inc.  2018   2017   2016  
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders – Basic  $1,643,426   $1,641,931   $1,203,218  
Net earnings attributable to exchangeable limited partnership units (1)   49,743    46,280    37,079  
Adjusted net earnings attributable to common stockholders – Diluted  $1,693,169   $1,688,211   $1,240,297  
             
Weighted average common shares outstanding – Basic   567,367    530,400    526,103  
Incremental weighted average ef fect on exchange of limited partnership units (1)   17,768    15,945    16,833  
Incremental weighted average ef fect of equity awards   5,104    5,955    3,730  
Weighted average common shares outstanding – Diluted (2)   590,239    552,300    546,666  
             
Net earnings per share attributable to common stockholders:             
Basic  $ 2.90  $ 3.10  $ 2.29 
Diluted  $ 2.87  $ 3.06  $ 2.27
 
 
Prologis, L.P .  2018   2017   2016  
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders  $1,692,313   $1,686,945   $1,237,519  
Net earnings attributable to Class A Units   (24,465 )  (26,642 )  (20,069 )
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders – Basic   1,667,848    1,660,303    1,217,450  
Net earnings attributable to Class A Units   24,465    26,642    20,069  
Net earnings attributable to exchangeable other limited partnership units   856   1,266    2,778  
Adjusted net earnings attributable to common unitholders – Diluted  $1,693,169   $1,688,211   $1,240,297  
             
Weighted average common units outstanding – Basic   575,798    536,335    532,326  
Incremental weighted average ef fect on exchange of Class A Units   8,446    8,607    8,775  
Incremental weighted average ef fect on exchange of other limited partnership units   891   1,403    1,835  
Incremental weighted average ef fect of equity awards of Prologis, Inc.   5,104    5,955    3,730  
Weighted average common units outstanding – Diluted (2)   590,239    552,300    546,666  
             
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders:             
Basic  $ 2.90  $ 3.10  $ 2.29 
Diluted  $ 2.87  $ 3.06  $ 2.27
 
 
(1) The exchangeable limited partnership units include the units as discussed in Note 11. Earnings allocated to the exchangeable
OP units not held by the Parent have been included in the numerator and exchangeable common units have been included in
the denominator for the purpose of computing diluted earnings per share for all periods as the per share and unit amount is the
same.
 
(2) Our total weighted average potentially dilutive shares and units outstanding for the years ended December 31 consisted of the
following:
 
  2018   2017   2016  
 Class A Units  8,446    8,607    8,775  
 Other limited partnership units  891   1,403    1,835  
 Equity awards  8,175    9,183    8,444  
 Prologis, L.P .  17,512    19,193    19,054  
 Common limited partnership units  8,431    5,935    6,223  
 Prologis, Inc.  25,943    25,128    25,277
 
 
NOTE 15. FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS AND FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
 
Derivative Financial Instruments
 
In the normal course of business, our operations are exposed to market risks, including the ef fect of changes in foreign currency
exchange rates and interest rates. W e may enter into derivative financial instruments to of fset these underlying market risks. See Note
2 for our derivative financial instruments policy .
82
 
 
The following table presents the fair value of our derivative financial instruments recognized within Other Assets and Other Liabilities
on the Consolidated Balance Sheets at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2018   2017  
  Asset   Liability   Asset   Liability  
Undesignated derivatives                 
Foreign currency contracts                 
     Forwards                 
          Brazilian real  $ 80  $ -  $ -  $ - 
          British pound sterling   2,266    324   2,440    8,103  
          Canadian dollar   3,336    53   -   1,698  
          Euro   7,895    1,922    2   14,234  
          Japanese yen   3,334    1,318    6,474    931 
          Mexican peso   159   -   -   - 
                 
Interest rate swaps                 
  U.S. dollar   27   -   -   - 
                 
Designated derivatives                 
Foreign currency contracts                 
     Net investment hedges                 
          Brazilian real   -   3,165    -   - 
          British pound sterling   -   949   -   - 
          Canadian dollar   5,634    -   -   7,263  
                 
Interest rate swaps                 
     Cash flow hedges                 
          Canadian dollar   -   -   10,223    - 
          Euro   -   428   -   - 
Total fair value of derivatives  $ 22,731   $ 8,159   $ 19,139   $ 32,229  
                
 
Undesignated Derivative Financial Instruments
 
Foreign Currency Contracts
 
The following table summarizes the activity of our undesignated foreign currency contracts for the years ended December 31 (in
millions, except for weighted average forward rates and number of active contracts):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
  BRL  CAD  EUR  GBP  JPY  Other  CAD  EUR  GBP  JPY  EUR  GBP  JPY  Other 
Notional amounts at
January 1  $ -  $56  $233  $132  $153  $ -  $38  $197  $78  $144  $310  $148  $109  $50 
New contracts   324   28   252   55   102   99   41   143   151   75   413   -   146   15 
Matured, expired or
settled contracts   (319)  (29)  (171)  (69)  (78)  (99)  (23)  (107)  (97)  (66)  (526)  (70)  (111)  (27)
Notional amounts at
December 31  $ 5  $55  $314  $118  $177  $ -  $56  $233  $132  $153  $197  $78  $144  $38 
                                                         
Weighted average
forward rate at
     December 31   3.74   1.28   1.21   1.32   105.17   -   1.29   1.17   1.29   106.25   1.13   1.54   107.68   - 
Active contracts at
December 31   1   24   35   24   34   -   24   29   20   34   24   8   30   16
 
 
 
The following table summarizes the undesignated derivative financial instruments exercised and associated realized gains (losses)
and unrealized gains (losses) in Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net in the Consolidated Statements of Income for
the years ended December 31 (in millions, except for number of exercised contracts):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Exercised contracts   89   44   49 
Realized gains (losses) on the matured, expired or settled contracts  $ (3) $ 13  $ 3 
Unrealized gains (losses) on the change in fair value of outstanding contracts  $ 29  $ (51) $ 19
 
 
83
 
Designated Derivative Financial Instruments
 
Foreign Currency Contracts
 
The following table summarizes the activity of our foreign currency contracts designated as net investment hedges for the years
ended December 31 (in millions, except for weighted average forward rates and number of active contracts):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
  BRL   CAD   EUR   GBP   CAD   GBP   CAD   GBP   JPY 
Notional amounts at January 1  $ -  $99  $ -  $ -  $100  $46  $ -  $386  $- 
New contracts   1,568    100   1,053    127   99   127   100   131   99 
Matured, expired or settled contracts   (1,108 )  (99)  (1,053 )  -   (100 )  (173 )  -   (471 )  (99)
Notional amounts at December 31  $460  $100  $ -  $127  $99  $ -  $100  $46  $- 
                                     
Weighted average forward rate at
     December 31   3.91   1.28   -   1.28   1.34   -   1.33   1.51   - 
Active contracts at December 31   1   2   -   2   2   -   2   2   -
 
 
Interest Rate Swaps
 
The following table summarizes the activity of our interest rate swaps designated as cash flow hedges for the years ended December
31 (in millions):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
  CAD   EUR   USD   CAD   CAD   JPY  
Notional amounts at January 1  $ 271  $ -  $ -  $ 271  $ 271  $ 925 
New contracts (1)   -   500   300   -   -   - 
Matured, expired or settled contracts (2)
(3)   (271 )  -   (300 )  -   -   (925 )
Notional amounts at December 31  $ -  $ 500  $ -  $ 271  $ 271  $ - 
                        
 
(1) During 2018, we entered into two interest rate swap contracts with an aggregated notional amount of €400.0 million ( $499.7
million) to ef fectively fix the interest rate on our senior notes bearing a floating rate of Euribor plus 0.3% issued in January 2018.
 
(2) During 2018, we repaid CAD 201.4 million ($158.9 million) on our 2015 Canadian Term Loan. At that time, we settled the
interest rate swaps related to the 2015 Canadian Term Loan as we determined it was no longer probable that we would continue
to have the future cash flows as originally hedged. As a result, the $12.5 million gain in AOCI/L  at the time of settlement was
reclassified to Interest Expense during 2018.
 
(3) During 2016, we entered into the 2016 Yen Term Loan and repaid our 2014, 2015 and 2016 Japanese yen term loans. At that
time, we settled the outstanding contracts related to the previously outstanding term loans for $26.3 million. The fair value of the
contracts that qualified for hedge accounting at the date of repayment was recorded to AOCI/L  and will be amortized to Interest
Expense  over the life of the original term loans. W e had $7.6 million remaining in  AOCI/L  at December 31, 2018. During the year
ended December 31, 2016, we recorded a loss of $9.9 million related to the change in fair value on the unhedged portion of the
contracts.
 
Ineffectiveness
 
During the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, we had no losses due to hedge inef fectiveness.
 
Designated Nonderivative Financial Instruments
 
The following table summarizes our debt and accrued interest, designated as a hedge of our net investment in international
subsidiaries at December 31 (in millions):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
British pound sterling  $ 269  $ 436  $ - 
Euro  $ 2,645   $ 3,620   $ 3,403
 
 
84
 
The following table summarizes the recognized unrealized gains  (losses)  in Foreign Currency and Derivative Gains (Losses), Net on
the remeasurement of the unhedged portion of our debt and accrued interest for the years ended December 31 (in millions):
 
  2018   2017  
Unrealized gains (losses) on the unhedged portion  $ 96  $ (23)
 
There were no unrealized gains or losses recognized during the year ended December 31, 2016.
 
Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
 
The change in Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)  in the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income during the periods
presented is due to the translation into U.S. dollars on consolidation of the financial statements of our consolidated subsidiaries whose
functional currency is not the U.S. dollar . The change in fair value of the ef fective portion of our derivative financial instruments that
have been designated as net investment hedges and cash flow hedges and the translation of our nonderivative financial instruments
as discussed above are also included in Other Comprehensive Income (Loss).
 
The following table presents these changes in Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)  for the years ended December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2018   2017   2016  
Derivative net investment hedges  $ 26,457   $ (12,762 ) $ 55,460  
Nonderivative net investment hedges   151,083    (477,755 )  112,591  
Cumulative translation adjustment   (368,130 )  553,972    (304,009 )
Total foreign currency translation gains (losses), net  $ (190,590 ) $ 63,455   $ (135,958 )
             
Cash flow hedges (1)  $ (5,815 ) $ 12,726   $ (551 )
Our share of derivatives from unconsolidated co-investment ventures   4,492    9,865    (798 )
Total unrealized gains (losses) on derivative contracts, net  $ (1,323 ) $ 22,591   $ (1,349 )
Total change in other comprehensive income (loss)  $ (191,913 ) $ 86,046   $ (137,307 )
            
 
(1) We estimate an additional expense of $4.2 million will be reclassified to Interest Expense over the next 12 months from
December 31, 2018, due to the amortization of previously settled derivatives designated as cash flow hedges.
 
Fair Value Measurements
 
We have estimated the fair value of our financial instruments using available market information and valuation methodologies we
believe to be appropriate for these purposes. Considerable judgment and a high degree of subjectivity are involved in developing
these estimates and, accordingly , they are not necessarily indicative of amounts that we would realize on disposition. See Note 2 for
more information on our fair value measurements policy .
 
Fair Value Measurements on a Recurring Basis
 
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, other than the derivatives discussed previously , we did not have any significant financial assets or
financial liabilities that were measured at fair value on a recurring basis in the Consolidated Financial Statements. All of our derivatives
held at December 31, 2018 and 2017, were classified as Level 2 of the fair value hierarchy .
 
Fair Value Measurements on Nonrecurring Basis
 
Acquired properties and assets we expect to sell or contribute met the criteria to be measured on a nonrecurring basis at fair value
and the lower of their carrying amount or their estimated fair value less the costs to sell, respectively , at December 31, 2018 and 2017.
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, we estimate the fair value of our properties using Level 2 or Level 3 inputs from the fair value
hierarchy . See more information on our acquired properties and assets held for sale or contribution in Notes 3, 4 and 6, respectively .
 
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
 
At December 31, 2018 and 2017, the carrying amounts of certain financial instruments, including cash and cash equivalents, accounts
and notes receivable, accounts payable and accrued expenses were representative of their fair values.
 
The dif ferences in the fair value of our debt from the carrying value in the table below were the result of dif ferences in interest rates or
borrowing spreads that were available to us at December 31, 2018 and 2017, as compared with those in ef fect when the debt was
issued or assumed, including reduced borrowing spreads due to our improved credit ratings. The senior notes and many of the
issuances of secured mortgage debt contain pre-payment penalties or yield maintenance provisions that could make the cost of
refinancing the debt at lower rates exceed the benefit that would be derived from doing so.
 
85
 
The following table reflects the carrying amounts and estimated fair values of our debt at December 31 (in thousands):
 
  2018   2017  
  Carrying V alue   Fair V alue   Carrying V alue   Fair V alue  
Credit Facilities  $ 50,500   $ 50,513   $ 317,392   $ 317,496  
Senior notes   8,304,147    8,606,864    6,067,277    6,537,100  
Term loans and unsecured other   1,921,428    1,946,335    2,060,491    2,075,002  
Secured mortgage   813,740    849,417    967,471    1,026,197  
Total  $ 11,089,815   $ 11,453,129   $ 9,412,631   $ 9,955,795
 
 
NOTE 16. COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
 
Environmental Matters
 
A majority of the properties we acquire, including land, are subjected to environmental reviews either by us or the previous owners. In
addition, we may incur environmental remediation costs associated with certain land parcels we acquire in connection with the
development of the land. W e have acquired certain properties that may have been leased to or previously owned by companies that
discharged hazardous materials. W e establish a liability at the time of acquisition to cover such costs and adjust the liabilities as
appropriate when additional information becomes available. W e record our environmental liabilities in Other Liabilities . We purchase
various environmental insurance policies to mitigate our exposure to environmental liabilities. W e are not aware of any environmental
liabilities that would have a material adverse ef fect on our business, financial condition or results of operations.
 
Indemnification Agreements
 
We may enter into agreements whereby we indemnify certain co-investment ventures, or our venture partners, outside of the U.S. for
taxes that may be assessed with respect to certain properties we contributed to these ventures. Our contributions to these ventures
are generally structured as contributions of shares of companies that own the real estate assets. Accordingly , the capital gains
associated with the step up in the value of the underlying real estate assets, for tax purposes, are deferred and transferred at
contribution. W e have generally indemnified these ventures to the extent that the ventures: (i) incur capital gains or withholding tax as
a result of a direct sale of the real estate asset, as opposed to a transaction in which the shares of the company owning the real estate
asset are transferred or sold or (ii) are required to grant a discount to the buyer of shares under a share transfer transaction as a
result of the ventures transferring the embedded capital gain tax liability to the buyer of the shares in the transaction. The agreements
limit the amount that is subject to our indemnification with respect to each property to 100% of the actual tax liabilities related to the
capital gains that are deferred and transferred by us to the ventures at the time of the initial contribution less any deferred tax assets
transferred with the property .
 
The outcome under these agreements is uncertain as it depends on the method and timing of dissolution of the related venture or
disposition of any properties by the venture. W e record liabilities related to the indemnification agreements in Other Liabilities . We
continue to monitor these agreements and the likelihood of the sale of assets that would result in recognition and will adjust the
potential liability in the future as facts and circumstances dictate.
 
Off-Balance Sheet Liabilities
 
We have issued performance and surety bonds and standby letters of credit in connection with certain development projects.
Performance and surety bonds are commonly required by public agencies from real estate developers. Performance and surety bonds
are renewable and expire on the completion of the improvements and infrastructure. At December 31, 2018 and 2017, we had $212.6
million and $178.4 million, respectively , outstanding under such arrangements.
 
We may be required under capital commitments or we may choose to make additional capital contributions to certain of our
unconsolidated entities, representing our proportionate ownership interest, should additional capital contributions be necessary to fund
development or acquisition costs, repayment of debt or operational shortfalls. See Note 5 for further discussion related to equity
commitments to our unconsolidated co-investment ventures.
 
Litigation
 
From time to time, we are party to a variety of legal proceedings arising in the ordinary course of business. W e believe that, with
respect to any such matters that we are currently a party to, the ultimate disposition of any such matter will not have material adverse
effect on our business, financial position or results of operations.
 
86
 
NOTE 17. BUSINESS SEGMENTS
 
Our current business strategy includes two operating segments: Real Estate Operations and Strategic Capital. W e generate
revenues, earnings, net operating income and cash flows through our segments, as follows:
 
• Real Estate Operations.  This operating segment represents the ownership and development of operating properties and is the
largest component of our revenues and earnings. W e collect rent from our customers through operating leases, including
reimbursements for the majority of our property operating costs. Each operating property is considered to be an individual
operating segment with similar economic characteristics; these properties are combined within the reportable business segment
based on geographic location. Our Real Estate Operations segment also includes development activities that lead to rental
operations, including land held for development and properties currently under development. Within this line of business, we
utilize the following: (i) our land bank; (ii) the development expertise of our local teams; and (iii) our customer relationships. Land
we own and lease to customers under ground leases is also included in this segment.
 
• Strategic Capital.  This operating segment represents the management of unconsolidated co-investment ventures. W e generate
strategic capital revenues primarily from our unconsolidated co-investment ventures through asset management and property
management services and we earn additional revenues by providing leasing, acquisition, construction, development, financing
and disposition services. Depending on the structure of the venture and the returns provided to our partners, we also earn
revenues through promotes periodically during the life of a venture or upon liquidation. Each unconsolidated co-investment
venture we manage is considered to be an individual operating segment with similar economic characteristics; these ventures
are combined within the reportable business segment based on geographic location.
 
87
 
Reconciliations are presented below for: (i) each reportable business segment’ s revenues from external customers to Total Revenues ;
(ii) each reportable business segment’ s net operating income from external customers to Operating Income and Earnings Before
Income T axes ; and (iii) each reportable business segment’ s assets to Total Assets . Our chief operating decision makers rely primarily
on net operating income and similar measures to make decisions about allocating resources and assessing segment performance.
The applicable components of Total Re venues, Operating Income, Earnings Before Income T axes  and Total Assets  are allocated to
each reportable business segment’ s revenues, net operating income and assets. Items that are not directly assignable to a segment,
such as certain corporate income and  expenses, are not allocated but reflected as reconciling items. The following reconciliations are
presented in thousands:
 
  Years Ended December 31,  
   2018    2017    2016  
Revenues:             
Real estate operations segment:             
U.S.  $2,173,279   $2,025,184   $2,040,308  
Other Americas   119,954    84,789    58,519  
Europe   54,405    73,708    75,602  
Asia   50,511    60,564    55,144  
Total real estate operations segment   2,398,149    2,244,245    2,229,573  
Strategic capital segment:             
U.S.   74,618    176,720    39,360  
Other Americas   32,434    28,494    22,799  
Europe   174,898    106,862    186,652  
Asia   124,350    61,813    54,751  
Total strategic capital segment   406,300    373,889    303,562  
             
Total revenues   2,804,449    2,618,134    2,533,135  
             
Segment net operating income:             
Real estate operations segment:             
U.S. (1)   1,621,665    1,519,164    1,520,571  
Other Americas   89,044    58,842    38,114  
Europe   34,807    51,277    54,406  
Asia   38,425    33,234    33,283  
Total real estate operations segment   1,783,941    1,662,517    1,646,374  
Strategic capital segment:             
U.S. (1)   4,712    106,471    (1,622 )
Other Americas   19,874    16,811    12,777  
Europe   136,240    68,127    144,132  
Asia   88,434    27,339    19,769  
Total strategic capital segment   249,260    218,748    175,056  
             
Total segment net operating income   2,033,201    1,881,265    1,821,430  
             
Reconciling items:             
General and administrative expenses   238,985    231,059    222,067  
Depreciation and amortization expenses   947,214    879,140    930,985  
Operating income   847,002    771,066    668,378  
Earnings from unconsolidated entities, net   298,260    248,567    206,307  
Interest expense   (229,141 )  (274,486 )  (303,146 )
Interest and other income, net   14,663    13,731    8,101  
Gains on real estate transactions, net   840,996    1,182,965    757,398  
Foreign currency and derivative gains (losses), net   117,096    (57,896 )  7,582  
Gains (losses) on early extinguishment of debt, net   (2,586 )  (68,379 )  2,484  
Earnings before income taxes  $1,886,290   $1,815,568   $1,347,104
 
 
 
 
 
88
 
  December 31,  
   2018    2017  
Segment assets:         
Real estate operations segment:         
U.S.  $27,666,200   $19,058,610  
Other Americas   1,712,862    1,767,385  
Europe   1,040,061    1,008,340  
Asia   1,012,253    1,083,764  
Total real estate operations segment   31,431,376    22,918,099  
Strategic capital segment (2):         
U.S.   15,802    16,818  
Europe   25,280    25,280  
Asia   455   544 
Total strategic capital segment   41,537    42,642  
Total segment assets   31,472,913    22,960,741  
         
Reconciling items:         
Investments in and advances to unconsolidated entities   5,745,294    5,496,450  
Assets held for sale or contribution   622,288    342,060  
Notes receivable backed by real estate   -   34,260  
Cash and cash equivalents   343,856    447,046  
Other assets   233,313    200,518  
Total reconciling items   6,944,751    6,520,334  
Total assets  $38,417,664   $29,481,075
 
 
(1) This includes compensation and personnel costs for employees who were located in the U.S. but also support other regions.
 
(2) Represents management contracts and goodwill recorded in connection with business combinations associated with the
Strategic Capital segment. Goodwill was $25.3 million at December 31, 2018 and 2017.
 
NOTE 18. SUPPLEMENTAL CASH FLOW INFORMATION
 
Our significant noncash investing and financing activities for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 included the
following:
 
• We completed the  DCT  Transaction on August 22, 2018 for $8.5 billion through the issuance of equity and the assumption of
debt. See Note 3 for more information on this transaction.
 
• We capitalized $26.4 million, $28.8 million and $25.8 million in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively , of equity-based
compensation expense resulting from our development and leasing activities.
 
• We received $386.7 million, $153.3 million and $135.3 million of ownership interests in certain unconsolidated co-investment
ventures as a portion of our proceeds from the contribution of properties to these entities during 2018, 2017 and 2016,
respectively , as disclosed in Note 5.
 
• We formed a consolidated venture into which our partner contributed $11.8 million of land in 2018.
 
• We issued 1.5 million shares and 1.9 million shares in 2017 and 2016, respectively , of the Parent’ s common stock upon
redemption of an equal number of common limited partnership units in the OP .
 
• We received $53.8 million of notes receivable backed by real estate in exchange for the disposition of real estate in 2017.  
 
• We contributed operating properties owned by NAIF to USLF in 2017. As a result, we received $1.1 billion of units or ownership
interest in USLF as a portion of our proceeds from this contribution. In addition, USLF acquired the $19.5 million note receivable
backed by real estate we received in 2017 and assumed $956.0 million of secured mortgage debt.
 
89
 
NOTE 19. SELECTED QUARTERLY FINANCIAL DATA (UNAUDITED)
 
The following table details our selected quarterly financial data (in thousands, except per share and unit data):
 
  Three Months Ended,  
Prologis, Inc.  March 31,   June 30,   September
30,   December 31,  
2018:                 
Rental revenues  $ 427,901   $ 426,549   $ 476,865   $ 527,574  
Rental recoveries  $ 128,042   $ 118,130   $ 132,109   $ 151,621  
Total revenues  $ 693,656   $ 621,276   $ 682,432   $ 807,085  
Rental expenses  $ (142,941 ) $ (133,329 ) $ (147,184 ) $ (177,194 )
Operating income  $ 237,107   $ 187,294   $ 181,521   $ 241,080  
Consolidated net earnings  $ 391,959   $ 364,991   $ 375,520   $ 690,490  
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders  $ 365,902   $ 334,611   $ 346,345   $ 596,568  
Net earnings per share attributable to common
     stockholders – Basic (1)  $ 0.69  $ 0.63  $ 0.60  $ 0.95 
Net earnings per share attributable to common
     stockholders – Diluted (1) (2)  $ 0.68  $ 0.62  $ 0.60  $ 0.94 
2017:                 
Rental revenues  $ 439,884   $ 447,960   $ 416,427   $ 433,568  
Rental recoveries  $ 127,049   $ 128,417   $ 114,755   $ 117,081  
Total revenues  $ 629,155   $ 766,183   $ 602,874   $ 619,922  
Rental expenses  $ (152,656 ) $ (147,794 ) $ (128,735 ) $ (140,338 )
Operating income  $ 161,886   $ 275,272   $ 175,491   $ 158,417  
Consolidated net earnings  $ 220,689   $ 287,980   $ 913,417   $ 338,873  
Net earnings attributable to common stockholders  $ 203,255   $ 266,943   $ 876,218   $ 295,515  
Net earnings per share attributable to common
     stockholders – Basic (1)  $ 0.38  $ 0.50  $ 1.65  $ 0.56 
Net earnings per share attributable to common
     stockholders – Diluted (1) (2)  $ 0.38  $ 0.50  $ 1.63  $ 0.55 
                 
Prologis, L.P .                 
2018:                 
Rental revenues  $ 427,901   $ 426,549   $ 476,865   $ 527,574  
Rental recoveries  $ 128,042   $ 118,130   $ 132,109   $ 151,621  
Total revenues  $ 693,656   $ 621,276   $ 682,432   $ 807,085  
Rental expenses  $ (142,941 ) $ (133,329 ) $ (147,184 ) $ (177,194 )
Operating income  $ 237,107   $ 187,294   $ 181,521   $ 241,080  
Consolidated net earnings  $ 391,959   $ 364,991   $ 375,520   $ 690,490  
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders  $ 376,425   $ 344,633   $ 356,765   $ 614,490  
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders
–
     Basic (1)  $ 0.69  $ 0.63  $ 0.60  $ 0.95 
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders
–
     Diluted (1) (2)  $ 0.68  $ 0.62  $ 0.60  $ 0.94 
2017:                 
Rental revenues  $ 439,884   $ 447,960   $ 416,427   $ 433,568  
Rental recoveries  $ 127,049   $ 128,417   $ 114,755   $ 117,081  
Total revenues  $ 629,155   $ 766,183   $ 602,874   $ 619,922  
Rental expenses  $ (152,656 ) $ (147,794 ) $ (128,735 ) $ (140,338 )
Operating income  $ 161,886   $ 275,272   $ 175,491   $ 158,417  
Consolidated net earnings  $ 220,689   $ 287,980   $ 913,417   $ 338,873  
Net earnings attributable to common unitholders  $ 208,878   $ 274,320   $ 900,331   $ 303,416  
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders
–
     Basic (1)  $ 0.38  $ 0.50  $ 1.65  $ 0.56 
Net earnings per unit attributable to common unitholders
–
     Diluted (1) (2)  $ 0.38  $ 0.50  $ 1.63  $ 0.55
 
 
(1) Quarterly earnings per common share or unit amounts may not total to the annual amounts due to rounding and the changes in
the number of weighted average common shares or units outstanding included in the calculation of basic and diluted shares or
units.
 
(2) Income allocated to the exchangeable OP  units not held by the Parent has been included in the numerator and exchangeable
OP units have been included in the denominator for the purpose of computing diluted earnings per share for all periods since
the per share and unit is the same.
90
 
PROLOGIS, INC. AND PROLOGIS, L.P.
SCHEDULE III – REAL ESTATE AND ACCUMULATED DEPRECIATION
DECEMBER 31, 2018
(In thousands of U.S. dollars, as applicable)
 
        Initial Cost to
Prologis   Costs
Capitalized  Gross Amounts at Which Carried
at December 31, 2018        
Description  No. of
Bldgs.  Encum-
brances Land  Building &
Improvements  Subsequent
to
Acquisition  Land  Building &
Improvements  Total
(a,b)   Accumulated
Depreciation
(c)   Date of
Construction/
Acquisition
Operating Properties (d)                                     
                                     
U.S. Markets                                     
Atlanta  104  (d)  222,503   888,970   231,746   223,511   1,119,708   1,343,219   (180,067) 1994-2018
Austin  10     12,783   52,335   5,857   12,837   58,138   70,975   (20,935) 1994-2015
Baltimore/Washington D.C. 52  (d)  136,540   405,342   100,977   137,506   505,353   642,859   (90,071) 1995-2018
Central and Eastern
Pennsylvania  42     252,910   843,408   170,423   256,884   1,009,857   1,266,741   (160,081) 2002-2018
Central Valley  28  (d)  144,651   386,853   443,563   155,518   819,549   975,067   (123,925) 1999-2018
Charlotte  16  (d)  15,202   32,889   58,907   17,465   89,533   106,998   (37,484) 1994-2015
Chicago  176  (d)  557,482   1,836,175   297,389   570,289   2,120,757   2,691,046   (451,793) 1995-2018
Cincinnati  27  (d)  41,002   181,564   64,238   43,226   243,578   286,804   (38,851) 1996-2018
Columbus  18  (d)  24,685   116,621   49,173   25,078   165,401   190,479   (65,578) 1996-2015
Dallas/Fort Worth  130  (d)  250,669   996,978   297,481   255,128   1,290,000   1,545,128   (276,508) 1994-2018
Denver  33  (d)  85,275   295,412   79,889   83,610   376,966   460,576   (92,381) 1993-2018
Houston  103  (d)  168,410   696,672   129,473   168,477   826,078   994,555   (135,283) 1993-2018
Indianapolis  19  (d)  15,970   85,015   39,181   15,970   124,196   140,166   (41,477) 1995-2018
Jacksonville  1     -   2,892   257   -   3,149   3,149   (1,950) 2011
Kansas City  2     -   14,411   164   -   14,575   14,575   (8,137) 2011
Las Vegas  49  (d)  111,489   270,443   135,626   105,980   411,578   517,558   (62,436) 1996-2017
Louisville  11     42,979   226,263   36,679   43,285   262,636   305,921   (54,823) 2005-2015
Nashville  21     60,581   264,972   42,079   62,170   305,462   367,632   (34,467) 1995-2018
New Jersey/New York City 108  (d)  875,466   1,505,680   485,999   876,393   1,990,752   2,867,145   (431,538) 1996-2018
Orlando  48     82,256   320,781   60,495   82,683   380,849   463,532   (60,061) 1994-2018
Phoenix  31     54,079   188,727   48,885   54,070   237,621   291,691   (45,022) 1992-2018
Portland  17  (d)(e)  36,733   100,728   18,085   35,396   120,150   155,546   (24,749) 2006-2018
Reno  17  (d)  23,919   143,324   84,636   25,393   226,486   251,879   (60,116) 1994-2015
San Antonio  20  (d)  25,735   95,828   38,938   25,958   134,543   160,501   (46,024) 1994-2016
San Francisco Bay Area  208  (d)  802,386   1,513,171   294,059   807,623   1,801,993   2,609,616   (505,996) 1993-2018
Savannah  1     2,161   14,680   1,462   2,161   16,142   18,303   (3,921) 2011
Seattle  83  (d)(e)  533,163   960,214   140,698   553,190   1,080,885   1,634,075   (133,022) 2008-2018
South Florida  96  (d)  352,027   778,818   162,149   356,442   936,552   1,292,994   (183,113) 1994-2018
Southern California  309  (d)(e)  2,477,437   3,825,024   803,913   2,553,245   4,553,129   7,106,374   (997,117) 2005-2018
Subtotal U.S. Markets:   1,780     7,408,493   17,044,190   4,322,421   7,549,488   21,225,616   28,775,104   (4,366,926)  
                                     
Other Americas Markets                                     
Brazil   14     129,566   273,445   31,155   119,552   314,614   434,166   (9,799) 2017
Canada  31  (d)  197,503   363,279   158,973   201,955   517,800   719,755   (89,382) 2008-2018
Mexico   7     70,233   2,287   86,131   74,417   84,234   158,651   (1,344) 2011-2018
Subtotal Other Americas
Markets:   52     397,302   639,011   276,259   395,924   916,648   1,312,572   (100,525)  
                                     
Europe Markets                                     
France  2     4,854   -   24,863   3,855   25,862   29,717   (2,295) 2012-2018
Germany  2     10,638   5,522   604   10,638   6,126   16,764   (3,343) 2011
Spain  5     7,044   37,040   13,634   6,825   50,893   57,718   (11,795) 2011-2017
Sweden  2     1,047   1,544   45,917   13,770   34,738   48,508   (9,969) 2011-2017
U.K.  7     28,504   23,422   14,575   28,660   37,841   66,501   (515) 2016-2018
Subtotal Europe Markets:  18     52,087   67,528   99,593   63,748   155,460   219,208   (27,917)  
                                     
Asia Markets                                     
China  2     1,395   8,457   136   1,202   8,786   9,988   (2,107) 2011
Japan  1     33,450   -   143,495   34,526   142,419   176,945   (6,190) 2016
Singapore  5     -   135,475   2,863   -   138,338   138,338   (47,293) 2011
Subtotal Asia Markets:   8     34,845   143,932   146,494   35,728   289,543   325,271   (55,590)  
Total Operating Properties   1,858     7,892,727   17,894,661   4,844,767   8,044,888   22,587,267   30,632,155   (4,550,958)  
 
91
 
PROLOGIS, INC. AND PROLOGIS, L.P.
SCHEDULE III – REAL ESTATE AND ACCUMULATED DEPRECIATION
DECEMBER 31, 2018
(In thousands of U.S. dollars, as applicable)
 
        Initial Cost to
Prologis   Costs
Capitalized  Gross Amounts at Which Carried
at December 31, 2018       Date of
Description  No. of
Bldgs.  Encum-
brances Land  Building &
Improvements  Subsequent
to
Acquisition  Land  Building &
Improvements  Total
(a,b)   Accumulated
Depreciation
(c)   Construction/
Acquisition
(f)
Development Portfolio (d)                                     
                                     
U.S. Markets                                     
Atlanta  1     3,927   14,240   10,927   3,927   25,167   29,094       
Baltimore/Washington D.C.  2     7,893   -   31,726   7,893   31,726   39,619       
Central Valley  3     6,483   -   58,845   6,483   58,845   65,328      2018
Chicago  6     42,852   9,201   48,107   42,852   57,308   100,160      2018
Cincinnati  2     6,006   119   26,199   6,006   26,318   32,324       
Dallas/Fort Worth  4     7,371   -   17,097   7,371   17,097   24,468      2018
Denver  3     17,555   -   31,795   17,555   31,795   49,350      2018
Indianapolis  1     418   -   6,871   418   6,871   7,289      2018
Las Vegas  5     15,681   -   38,066   15,681   38,066   53,747      2018
Nashville  1     5,668   -   13,523   5,668   13,523   19,191       
New Jersey/New York City  2     58,001   -   32,426   58,001   32,426   90,427       
Orlando  1     1,116   6,326   414   1,116   6,740   7,856      2018
Phoenix  4     15,053   -   20,019   15,053   20,019   35,072       
San Francisco Bay Area  4     32,744   7,532   19,494   32,744   27,026   59,770       
Seattle  4     70,233   28,431   130,994   70,233   159,425   229,658      2018
South Florida  4     20,712   -   42,962   20,712   42,962   63,674      2018
Southern California  13     97,501   5,143   88,553   97,501   93,696   191,197      2018
Subtotal U.S. Markets:   60     409,214   70,992   618,018   409,214   689,010   1,098,224       
                                     
Other Americas Markets                                     
Canada  1     17,257   -   24,230   17,257   24,230   41,487       
Mexico  4     38,521   -   28,193   38,521   28,193   66,714      2018
Subtotal Other Americas
Market:   5     55,778   -   52,423   55,778   52,423   108,201       
                                     
Europe Markets                                     
Czech Republic  3     15,667   -   32,204   15,667   32,204   47,871      2018
France  4     9,424   -   23,943   9,424   23,943   33,367       
Germany  4     41,530   -   103,331   41,530   103,331   144,861      2018
Italy  4     13,847   -   4,311   13,847   4,311   18,158       
Netherlands  5     39,188   -   44,014   39,188   44,014   83,202       
Poland  2     3,275   -   13,097   3,275   13,097   16,372      2018
Slovakia  3     5,318   -   11,295   5,318   11,295   16,613      2018
Spain  2     16,050   -   10,908   16,050   10,908   26,958      2018
Sweden  1     4,356   -   17,064   4,356   17,064   21,420       
U.K.  1     6,199   -   11,878   6,199   11,878   18,077      2018
Subtotal Europe Markets:   29     154,854   -   272,045   154,854   272,045   426,899       
                                     
Asia Markets                                     
Japan  6  (d)  141,283   -   368,194   141,283   368,194   509,477      2018
Subtotal Asia Markets:   6     141,283   -   368,194   141,283   368,194   509,477       
Total Development Portfolio   100     761,129   70,992   1,310,680   761,129   1,381,672   2,142,801       
                                     
GRAND TOTAL   1,958     8,653,856   17,965,653   6,155,447   8,806,017   23,968,939   32,774,956   (4,550,958)  
 
Schedule III – Footnotes
 
(a) The following table reconciles real estate assets per Schedule III to the Consolidated Balance Sheets in Item 8. Financial
Statements and Supplementary Data at December 31, 2018 (in thousands):
 
 Total per Schedule III  $ 32,774,956  (g)
 Land   1,192,220   
 Other real estate investments   619,811   
 Total per Consolidated Balance Sheets  $ 34,586,987   
 
(b) The aggregate cost for federal tax purposes at December 31, 2018, of our real estate assets was approximately $24.0 billion
(unaudited).
 
(c) Real estate assets (excluding land balances) are depreciated over their estimated useful lives. These useful lives are generally
5 to 7 years for capital improvements, 10 years for standard tenant improvements, 25 years for depreciable land improvements,
30 years for operating properties acquired and 40 years for operating properties we develop.
 
92
 
The following table reconciles accumulated depreciation per Schedule III to the Consolidated Balance Sheet s in Item 8.
Financial Statements and Supplementary Data at December 31, 201 8 (in thousands):
 
 Total accumulated depreciation per Schedule III  $ 4,550,958  (g)
 Accumulated depreciation on other real estate investments   105,722   
 Total per Consolidated Balance Sheets  $ 4,656,680   
 
(d) Properties with an aggregate undepreciated cost of $2.2 billion secure $774.6 million of mortgage notes. See Note 8 to the
Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data for more information related to our
secured mortgage debt.
 
(e) Assessment bonds of $12.6 million are secured by assessments (similar to property taxes) on various underlying real estate
properties with an aggregate undepreciated cost of $1.0 billion. The assessment bonds are included in term loans and
unsecured other debt in Note 8 to the Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary
Data.
 
(f) Date of construction is provided for properties in the development portfolio that were completed but not yet stabilized.
 
(g)The following table summarizes our real estate assets and accumulated depreciation for the years ended December 31 (in
thousands):
 
   2018   2017   2016  
 Real estate assets:             
 Balance at beginning of year  $24,178,816   $25,375,539   $25,608,648  
 Acquisitions of and improvements to operating properties and
development
     activity , and net ef fect of changes in foreign exchange rates and other   10,106,651    2,680,484    1,883,888  
 Basis of operating properties disposed of   (1,461,458 )  (3,697,798 )  (1,359,186 )
 Change in the development portfolio balance, including the acquisition of
     properties   549,312    161,408    (440,821 )
 Assets transferred to held for sale   (598,365 )  (340,817 )  (316,990 )
 Balance at end year  $32,774,956   $24,178,816   $25,375,539  
              
 Accumulated depreciation:             
 Balance at beginning of year  $3,971,501   $3,679,479   $3,207,855  
 Depreciation expense   703,215    614,756    668,686  
 Balances retired upon disposition of operating properties and net ef fect of
     changes in foreign exchange rates and other   (119,029 )  (313,584 )  (195,895 )
 Assets transferred to held for sale   (4,729 )  (9,150 )  (1,167 )
 Balance at end of year  $4,550,958   $3,971,501   $3,679,479
 
 
 
 
93
 
Certain of the following documents are filed herewith. Certain other of the following documents that have been previously filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission and, pursuant to Rule 12b-32, are incorpo rated herein by reference.
 
2.1
 Agreement and Plan of Merger , dated as of April 29, 2018, by and among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P ., DCT  Industrial
Trust Inc., and DCT  Industrial Operating Partnership LP  (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 to Prologis’  Current
Report on Form 8-K filed April 29, 2018).
 
3.1
 Articles of Incorporation of Prologis (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Registration Statement on
Form S-11 (No. 333-35915) filed September 18, 1997).
 
3.2  Articles Supplementary establishing and fixing the rights and preferences of the Series Q Cumulative Redeemable
Preferred Stock of Prologis (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.4 to Prologis’  Registration Statement on Form 8-A
filed June 2, 2011).
 
3.3  Articles of Merger of New Pumpkin Inc., a Maryland corporation, with and into Prologis, Inc., a Maryland corporation,
changing the name of “AMB Property Corporation” to “Prologis, Inc.”, as filed with the Stated Department of
Assessments and Taxation of Maryland on June 2, 2011, and ef fective June 3, 2011 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 8, 2011).
 
3.4  Articles of Amendment (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 8,
2012).
 
3.5  Thirteenth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of the Operating Partnership (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3.6 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 8, 2011).
 
3.6  First Amendment to Thirteenth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of Prologis, L.P ., dated
February 27, 2014, (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February
27, 2014).
 
3.7  Second Amendment to the Thirteenth Amended and Restated Agreement of the Limited Partnership of Prologis, L.P .,
dated October 7, 2015 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October
13, 2015).
 
3.8  Amended and Restated Certificate of Limited Partnership of the Operating Partnership (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.7 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 8, 2011).
 
3.9  Articles Supplementary dated April 3, 2014, (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form
8-K filed on April 3, 2014).
 
3.10  Eighth Amended and Restated Bylaws of Prologis, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to Prologis’  Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on September 23, 2016).
 
4.1  Form of Certificate for Common Stock of Prologis (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Registration
Statement on Form S-4/A  (No. 333-172741) filed April 12, 2011).
 
4.2  Form of Certificate for the Series Q Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock of Prologis (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Registration Statement on Form S-4/A  (No. 333-172741) filed April 28, 2011).
 
4.3  Indenture, dated as of June 8, 2011, by and among the Operating Partnership, as issuer , Prologis, as guarantor , and
U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Registration Statement
on Form S-3 (No. 333-177112) filed September 30, 2011).
 
4.4  Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 15, 2013, among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P . and U.S. Bank National
Association (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed August 15, 2013).
 
4.5  Form of Sixth Supplemental Indenture among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P ., Elavon Financial Services Limited, UK
Branch, Elavon Financial Services Limited and U.S. Bank National Association (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1
to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed December 2, 2013).
 
4.6  Form of Seventh Supplemental Indenture among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P ., Elavon Financial Services Limited, UK
Branch, Elavon Financial Services Limited and U.S. Bank National Association (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1
to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed February 18, 2014).
 
4.7  Form of Eighth Supplemental Indenture among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P ., U.S. Bank National Association and Elavon
Financial Services DAC, UK Branch (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed
on June 6, 2017).
 
94
 
4.8  Indenture, dated as of June 30, 1998, by and among the Operating Partnership, Prologis and State Street Bank and
Trust Company of California, N.A., as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on
Form 8-K filed August 10, 2006 and also incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Operating Partnership’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed August 10, 2006).
 
4.9  First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 30, 1998, by and among the Operating Partnership, Prologis and State
Street Bank and Trust Company of California, N.A., as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’
Registration Statement on Form S-11 (No. 333-49163) filed April 2, 1998).
 
4.10  Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 30, 1998, by and among the Operating Partnership, Prologis and
State Street Bank and Trust Company of California, N.A., as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Registration Statement on Form S-11 (No. 333-49163) filed April 2, 1998).
 
4.11  Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of June 30, 1998, by and among the Operating Partnership, Prologis and State
Street Bank and Trust Company of California, N.A., as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’
Registration Statement on Form S-11 (No. 333-49163) filed April 2, 1998).
 
4.12  Seventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 10, 2006, by and among the Operating Partnership, Prologis and
U.S. Bank National Association, as successor-in-interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company of California, N.A., as
trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed August 10, 2006 and also
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Operating Partnership’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed August 10,
2006).
 
4.13  Eighth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 20, 2009, by and among the Operating Partnership, Prologis and
U.S. Bank National Association, as successor-in-interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company of California, N.A., as
trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed November 20, 2009).
 
4.14  Ninth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 20, 2009, by and among the Operating Partnership, Prologis and
U.S. Bank National Association, as successor-in-interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company of California, N.A., as
trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed November 20, 2009).
 
4.15  Tenth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of August 9, 2010, by and among the Operating Partnership, Prologis and U.S.
Bank National Association, as successor-in-interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company of California, N.A., as
trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed August 9, 2010).
 
4.16  Eleventh Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 12, 2010, by and among the Operating Partnership, Prologis
and U.S. Bank National Association, as successor-in-interest to State Street Bank and Trust Company of California,
N.A., as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed November 10,
2010).
 
4.17  Indenture dated as of August 1, 2018 among Prologis Euro Finance LLC, Prologis, L.P . and U.S. Bank National
Association, as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Registration Statement on Form 8-K/A  filed
on August 1, 2018).
 
4.18  First Supplemental Indenture dated as of August 1, 2018 among Prologis Euro Finance LLC, Prologis, L.P ., U.S. Bank
National Association, as trustee, transfer agent and security registrar and Elavon Financial Services DAC, UK Branch, as
paying agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Registration Statement on Form 8-K/A  filed on August
1, 2018).
 
4.19  Form of lndenture dated as of September 25, 2018 among Prologis Yen Finance LLC, Prologis, L.P . and U.S. Bank
National Association, as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.9 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on
September 24, 2018).
 
4.20  Form of First Supplemental Indenture dated as of September 25, 2018 among Prologis Yen Finance LLC, Prologis, L.P .,
U.S. Bank National Association, as trustee, transfer agent, paying agent and security registrar (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 4.10 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on September 24, 2018).
 
4.21  Form of 2.750% Notes due 2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed
August 15, 2013).
 
4.22  Form of 4.250% Notes due 2023 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed
August 15, 2013).
 
4.23  3.350% Notes due 2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed
November 1, 2013).
 
95
 
4.24  Form of 3.000% Notes due 2022 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed
December 2, 2013).
 
4.25  Form of 3.375% Notes due 2024 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed
February 18, 2014).
 
4.26  Form of 3.00% Notes due 2026 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
May 28, 2014).
 
4.27  Form of 1.375% Notes due 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on October 6, 2014).
 
4.28  Form of 1.375% Notes due 2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 of Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed
May 12, 2015).
 
4.29  Form of 3.750% Notes due 2025 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 of Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed
October 30, 2015).
 
4.30  Form of Floating Rate Notes due 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K
filed on January 26, 2018).
 
4.31  Form of 2.250% Notes due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 6, 2017).
 
4.32  Form of Floating Rate Notes due 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K
filed on January 26, 2018).
 
4.33  Form of 3.875% Notes Due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 20, 2018).
 
4.34  Form of 4.375% Notes Due 2048 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on
June 20, 2018).
 
4.35  Form of 1.875% Notes Due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on
July 31, 2018).
 
4.36  Form of 0.652% Notes due 2025 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed
on September 24, 2018).
 
4.37  Form of 0.972% Notes due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed
on September 24, 2018).
 
4.38  Form of 1.077% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed
on September 24, 2018).
 
4.39  Form of 1.470% Notes due 2038 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed
on September 24, 2018).
 
4.40  Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 3.375% Notes due 2024 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed February 18, 2014).
 
4.41  Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to the 3.00% Notes due 2026 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 28, 2014).
 
4.42  Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to 1.375% Notes due 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 6, 2014).
 
4.43  Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 1.375% Notes due 2021 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 12, 2015).
 
4.44  Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to the 3.750% Notes due 2025 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 30, 2015).
 
4.45  Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to 2.250% Notes due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on June 6, 2017).
 
96
 
4.46  Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to Floating Rate Notes due 2020 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to
Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on January 26, 2018.
 
4.47 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to 3.875% Notes Due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on June 20, 2018).
 
4.48 Form of Of ficer’s Certificate related to 4.375% Notes Due 2048 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on June 20, 2018).
 
4.49 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to 0.652% Notes due 2025 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on September 24, 2018).
 
4.50 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to 0.972% Notes due 2028 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on September 24, 2018).
 
4.51 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to 1.077% Notes due 2030 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.7 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on September 24, 2018).
 
4.52 Form of Of ficers’  Certificate related to 1.470% Notes due 2038 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K/A  filed on September 24, 2018).
 
4.53 Officer’s Certificate related to 1.875% Notes Due 2029 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to Prologis’  Registration
Statement on Form 8-K/A  filed on August 1, 2018).
 
Other debt instruments are omitted in accordance with Item 601(b)(4)(iii)(A) of Registration S-K. Copies of such instruments will be
furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission upon request.
 
10.1  Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of ProLogis Fraser , L.P., dated as of August 4, 2004
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Trust’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2004).
 
10.2  Fifteenth Amended and Restated Agreement of Limited Partnership of Prologis 2, L.P ., (f/k/a AMB Property II, L.P .) dated
February 19, 2010 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended
December 31, 2009).
 
10.3*  Amended and Restated 2002 Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to
Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed October 4, 2006  and also incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the
Operating Partnership’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed October 4, 2006).
 
10.4*  The Amended and Restated 2002 Stock Option and Incentive Plan of AMB Property Corporation and AMB Property , L.P.
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 15, 2007  and also
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Operating Partnership’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 15, 2007).
 
10.5*  Prologis Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed
December 22, 2011).
 
10.6*  Prologis, Inc. 2016 Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form
8-K filed on August 16, 2016).
 
10.7*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2016 Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2
to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 16, 2016).
 
10.8*  Form of Participation Points and L TIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February 27, 2014).
 
10.9*  Second Amended and Restated Prologis Promote Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on August 1, 2014).
 
10.10*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Second Amended and Restated Prologis Promote Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed on August 18, 2014).
 
10.11*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (General) (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 to Prologis’  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014).
 
10.12*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (L TIP Unit election) (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.27 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015).
 
97
 
10.13*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.5 to Prologis’  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014).
 
10.14*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan Restricted Stock Unit Agreement (Bonus exchange) (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to Prologis’  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2014).
 
10.15*  ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Trust’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed June 2, 2006).
 
10.16*  First Amendment of the ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Trust’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2010).
 
10.17*  Second Amendment of the ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the
Trust’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 19, 2010).
 
10.18*  Third Amendment of the ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the
Trust’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2010).
 
10.19*  Form of Non-Qualified Share Option Award Terms; The Trust 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.25 to the Trust’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009).
 
10.20*  Form of Restricted Share Award Terms; ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.27 to the Trust’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009).
 
10.21*  Form of Performance Share Award Terms; ProLogis 2006 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.26 to the Trust’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2009).
 
10.22*  ProLogis 2000 Share Option Plan for Outside Trustees (as Amended and Restated Ef fective as of December 31, 2008)
(incorporated by reference to exhibit 10.13 to ProLogis’  Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2008).
 
10.23*  ProLogis Deferred Fee Plan for Trustees (As Amended and Restated Ef fective as of May 14, 2010) (incorporated by
reference to exhibit 10.3 to ProLogis’  Form 8-K filed on May 19, 2010).
 
10.24*  Form of Indemnification Agreement between ProLogis and certain directors and executive of ficers (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 8, 2011).
 
10.25*  Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement; Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2012).
 
10.26*  Prologis, Inc. 2012 Long-T erm Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on
Form 8-K filed May 8, 2012).
 
10.27*  Form of Director Deferred Stock Unit Award terms (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Current Report
on Form 8-K filed May 8, 2012).
 
10.28*  Form of Change of Control and Noncompetition Agreement by and between Prologis, Inc. and its executive of ficers
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed August 16, 2013).
 
10.29*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (General form 2015) (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.57 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.30*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (Bonus exchange) (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2015).
 
10.31*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (General form 2016) (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.48 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015).
 
10.32*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit Exchange Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.58 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.33*  Form of Prologis, Inc. Long-T erm Incentive Plan Equity Exchange Of fer LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.59 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.34*  Amended and Restated Prologis, Inc. 2011 Notional Account Deferred Compensation Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.60 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
98
 
10.35*  Amended and Restated Prologis, Inc. Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.61 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.36*  Second Amended and Restated Prologis 2005 Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.62 to Prologis’  Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014).
 
10.37*  Prologis, Inc. 2018 Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K
filed on January 18, 2018).
 
10.38*  Prologis, Inc. Amended and Restated 2018 Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’
Current Report Form 8-K filed on March 27, 2018).
 
10.39*  Form of Prologis, Inc. 2018 Amendment to Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreements (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on March 27, 2018).
 
10.40*  Amended and Restated Director Deferred Stock Unit Award Terms (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 7, 2018).
 
10.41  Form of Time-Sharing Agreement for Hamid Moghadam (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current
Report on Form 10-Q filed on October 22, 2018).
 
10.42*  Prologis, Inc. Second Amended and Restated 2018 Outperformance Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to
Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.43*  Form of Outperformance Plan L TIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Current
Report Form 8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.44*  Form of L TIP Unit Award Agreement (Bonus Exchange) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to Prologis’  Current
Report Form 8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.45*  Form of L TIP Unit Award Agreement (Omnibus) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to Prologis’  Current Report
Form 8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.46*  Form of RSU Agreement (Global) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed
on August 28, 2018).
 
10.47*  Form of RSU Agreement (L TIP Unit Election) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 to Prologis’  Current Report Form
8-K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.48*  Form of NEO Retirement Eligibility W aiver (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.7 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-
K filed on August 28, 2018).
 
10.49  Term Loan Agreement dated as of August 18, 2016 among Prologis GK Holdings Y.K., as borrower , Prologis, Inc. and
Prologis, L.P ., as guarantors, the banks listed on the signature pages thereof, and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation,
as Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
August 22, 2016).
 
10.50  Guaranty of Payment dated as of August 18, 2016 among Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P ., as guarantors, and Sumitomo
Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative Agent, for the banks that are from time to time parties to the Term Loan
Agreement dated as of August 18, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to Prologis’  Current Report on Form
8-K filed on August 22, 2016).
 
10.51  Letter Agreement dated February 3, 2017 by and between Prologis, Inc. and Hamid R. Moghadam (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 3, 2017).
 
10.52  Fifth Amended and Restated Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of February 16, 2017, among Prologis Marunouchi
Finance Investment Limited Partnership, as initial borrower , Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P ., as guarantors, the lenders
listed on the signature pages thereof, and Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative Agent (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 21, 2017).
 
10.53  Guaranty of Payment, date as of February 16, 2017, among Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P ., as guarantors, Sumitomo
Mitsui Banking Corporation, as Administrative Agent, for the banks that are from time to time parties to the Fifth Amend
and Restated Revolving Credit Agreement, dated as of February 16, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to
Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K filed on February 22, 2017).
 
99
 
10.54  Amended and Restated Senior Term Loan Agreement dated as of May 4, 2017 among Prologis, Inc., Prologis, L.P .,
various af filiates of Prologis, L.P ., various lenders and Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K on May 8, 2017).
 
10.55  Second Amended and Restated Global Senior Credit Agreement, dated as of January 16, 2019, by and among Prologis,
Inc., Prologis, L.P ., various af filiates of Prologis, L.P ., various lenders and Bank of America, N.A., as Global
Administrative Agent (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to Prologis’  Current Report Form 8-K on January 16,
2019).
 
21.1†  Subsidiaries of Prologis, Inc. and Prologis, L.P .
 
23.1†  Consent of KPMG LLP  with respect to Prologis, Inc.
 
23.2†  Consent of KPMG LLP  with respect to Prologis, L.P .
 
24.1†  Power of Attorney for Prologis, Inc. (included in signature page of this annual report).
 
24.2†  Power of Attorney for Prologis, L.P . (included in signature page of this annual report).
 
31.1†  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer of Prologis, Inc.
 
31.2†  Certification of Chief Financial Of ficer of Prologis, Inc.
 
31.3†  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer for Prologis, L.P .
 
31.4†  Certification of Chief Financial Of ficer for Prologis, L.P .
 
32.1†  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer of Prologis, Inc., pursuant to Section 906 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 
32.2†  Certification of Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer for Prologis, L.P ., pursuant to Section 906 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
 
99.1  Supplemental United States Federal Income Tax Considerations (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 99.1 to Prologis’
Current Report on Form 8-K filed June 20, 2016).
 
101. INS†  XBRL  Instance Document
 
101. SCH†  XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Schema
 
101. CAL†  XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase
 
101. DEF†  XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase
 
101. LAB†  XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase
 
101. PRE†  XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase
 
* Management Contract or Compensatory Plan or Arrangement
† Filed herewith
 
 
 
 
 
100
 
SIGNA TURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report
to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
PROLOGIS, INC.
   
By: /s/ Hamid R. Moghadam
  Hamid R. Moghadam
  Chief Executive Of ficer
 
Date: February 13, 2019
 
POWER OF ATTORNEY
 
KNOW ALL MEN BY  THESE PRESENTS, that we, the undersigned of ficers and directors of Prologis, Inc., hereby severally constitute
Hamid R. Moghadam, Thomas S. Olinger and Edward S. Nekritz, and each of them singly , our true and lawful attorneys with full
power to them, and each of them singly , to sign for us and in our names in the capacities indicated below , the Form 10-K filed
herewith and any and all amendments to said Form 10-K, and generally to do all such things in our names and in our capacities as
officers and directors to enable Prologis, Inc. to comply with the provisions of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, and all
requirements of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, hereby ratifying and confirming our signatures as they may be signed
by our said attorneys, or any of them, to said Form 10-K and any and all amendments thereto.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
 
Signature  Title  Date
     
/s/ Hamid R. Moghadam  Chairman of the Board and Chief
Executive Of ficer February 13, 2019
Hamid R. Moghadam   
     
/s/ Thomas S. Olinger  Chief Financial Of ficer  February 13, 2019
Thomas S. Olinger   
     
/s/ Lori A. Palazzolo  Managing Director and Chief
Accounting Of ficer February 13, 2019
Lori A. Palazzolo   
     
/s/ Cristina G. Bita  Director  February 13, 2019
Cristina G. Bita   
     
/s/ George L. Fotiades  Director  February 13, 2019
George L. Fotiades   
     
/s/ Philip L. Hawkins  Director  February 13, 2019
Philip L. Hawkins     
     
/s/ Lydia H. Kennard  Director  February 13, 2019
Lydia H. Kennard     
     
/s/ J. Michael Losh  Director  February 13, 2019
J. Michael Losh   
     
/s/ Irving F . Lyons III  Director  February 13, 2019
Irving F . Lyons III     
     
/s/ David P . O’Connor  Director  February 13, 2019
David P . O’Connor     
     
/s/ Olivier Piani  Director  February 13, 2019
Olivier Piani     
     
/s/ Jef frey L. Skelton  Director  February 13, 2019
Jeffrey L. Skelton     
     
/s/ Carl B. W ebb  Director  February 13, 2019
Carl B. W ebb     
     
/s/ William D. Zollars  Director  February 13, 2019
William D. Zollars     
101
 
SIGNA TURES
 
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report
to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
PROLOGIS, L.P .
By: Prologis, Inc., its general partner
   
By: /s/ Hamid R. Moghadam
  Hamid R. Moghadam
  Chief Executive Of ficer
 
Date: February 13, 2019
 
POWER OF ATTORNEY
 
KNOW ALL MEN BY  THESE PRESENTS, that we, the undersigned of ficers and directors of Prologis, L.P ., hereby severally constitute
Hamid R. Moghadam, Thomas S. Olinger and Edward S. Nekritz, and each of them singly , our true and lawful attorneys with full
power to them, and each of them singly , to sign for us and in our names in the capacities indicated below , the Form 10-K filed
herewith and any and all amendments to said Form 10-K, and generally to do all such things in our names and in our capacities as
officers and directors to enable Prologis, L.P . to comply with the provisions of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, and all
requirements of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, hereby ratifying and confirming our signatures as they may be signed
by our said attorneys, or any of them, to said Form 10-K and any and all amendments thereto.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
 
Signature  Title  Date
     
/s/ Hamid R. Moghadam  Chairman of the Board and Chief
Executive Of ficer February 13, 2019
Hamid R. Moghadam   
     
/s/ Thomas S. Olinger  Chief Financial Of ficer  February 13, 2019
Thomas S. Olinger   
     
/s/ Lori A. Palazzolo  Managing Director and Chief
Accounting Of ficer February 13, 2019
Lori A. Palazzolo   
     
/s/ Cristina G. Bita  Director  February 13, 2019
Cristina G. Bita   
     
/s/ George L. Fotiades  Director  February 13, 2019
George L. Fotiades   
     
/s/ Philip L. Hawkins  Director  February 13, 2019
Philip L. Hawkins     
     
/s/ Lydia H. Kennard  Director  February 13, 2019
Lydia H. Kennard     
     
/s/ J. Michael Losh  Director  February 13, 2019
J. Michael Losh   
     
/s/ Irving F . Lyons III  Director  February 13, 2019
Irving F . Lyons III     
     
/s/ David P . O’Connor  Director  February 13, 2019
David P . O’Connor     
     
/s/ Olivier Piani  Director  February 13, 2019
Olivier Piani     
     
/s/ Jef frey L. Skelton  Director  February 13, 2019
Jeffrey L. Skelton     
     
/s/ Carl B. W ebb  Director  February 13, 2019
Carl B. W ebb     
     
/s/ William D. Zollars  Director  February 13, 2019
William D. Zollars     
 
102
